Benefits,Contraindication,Yoga Asan
"Corrects bad posture by straightening the spine, Improves the alignment of your body, Counters the degenerative effects of ageing 
on the spine legs and feet, Tones the buttock muscles","If you have Parkinson’s disease or a spinal disc disorder, you may find it helpful to stand facing a wall with your palms placed on it, People with scoliosis should 
rest the spine against the 
protruding edge of two 
adjoining walls",TADASANA or MOUNTAIN POSTURE
"Relieves gastritis indigestion acidity and flatulence , Improves the flexibility of the spine , Alleviates backache ,Corrects alignment of the shoulders , Helps to treat neck sprains , Massages and tones the pelvic area , Strengthens the ankles , Reduces discomfort during menstruation","If you are prone to dizzy spells vertigo or high blood pressure look down at the floor in the final pose, Do not turn your head up, If you have a cardiac condition practise against a wall, Do not raise the arm but rest it along your hip",UTTHITA TRIKONASANA or EXTENDED TRIANGLE POSE
"Improves breathing capacity by expanding the chest, Helps in the treatment of a prolapsed or slipped disc, Alleviates the condition of a broken fused or deviated tailbone, Reduces fat around the hips, Relieves lower backache","Do not practise if you have a cardiac condition, palpitations, heartburn, diarrhoea, or dysentery, Women with menorrhagia and metrorrhagia should avoid this asana",VIRABHADRASANA 2 or WARRIOR POSE 2
"Enhances lung capacity , Tones the muscles of the heart, Relieves sciatic and arthritic pain, Improves digestion and helps the elimination of waste, Reduces fat on the waist and hips","If you have high blood pressure avoid this asana, If you have cervical spondylosis do not turn your neck or look up",UTTHITA PARSVAKONASANA or EXTENDED SIDE STRETCH
"Cools the brain and soothes the nerves, Relieves arthritis of the neck, shoulders, elbows, and wrists , Strengthens the abdominal organs , Improves digestion , Tones the liver and spleen, Reduces menstrual pain","If you have high blood pressure or a cardiac condition, omit Step 4, If you have dysentery or an abdominal hernia, practise this asana up to Step 4",PARSVOTTANASANA or INTENSE TORSO STRETCH
"Calms the brain and gently stimulates the nerves , Slows down the heartbeat , Reduces stiffness in the shoulder blades and arthritis in the shoulder joints, Strengthens the ankles and tones the legs, Relieves pain in the heels and softens calcaneal spurs, Checks heavy menstrual flow, Helps to prevent hot flushes during menopause","If you have high blood pressure or frequent headaches, support your head with a bolster, If you are prone to dislocation of the shoulders, ensure that your arms do not rotate outward, Do not practise this asana in an advanced stage of pregnancy",ADHOMUKHA SVANASANA or DOWNWARD-FACING DOG STRETCH
"Relieves mental and physical exhaustion , Slows down the heartbeat , Tones the liver, spleen, and kidneys , Relieves stomach ache , Reduces abdominal and back pain during menstruation","If you have a spinal disc disorder, stop at Step 3, Ensure that your spine is concave throughout the asana, Those prone to acidity or dizziness should practise this asana with the legs positioned slightly apart",UTTANASANA or INTENSE FORWARD STRETCH
"Relieves backache, lumbago, and sciatica , Strengthens the back muscles, Tones the abdominal muscles, Relieves acidity and improves digestion, Strengthens the bladder and corrects a displaced uterus, Relieves pain and heavy flow during menstruation, (In such cases, practise this pose in the time between menstrual periods – avoid during menstruation)",Do not practise this asana if you have high blood pressure or a cardiac condition.,VIRABHADRASANA 1 or WARRIOR POSE 1
"Relieves breathlessness, choking, and throat congestion in asthmatics, Strengthens the muscles of the chest, Tones the abdominal organs and lifts sagging abdominal walls, Reduces heartburn and flatulence, Tones the spinal and leg muscles, Lengthens the ligaments of the legs","If your spine has a tendency to sag, or if you are experiencing a severe asthma attack, practise this asana with the length of your spine supported against a wall",DANDASANA or STAFF POSE
"Keeps the kidneys and prostate gland healthy , Helps to treat urinary tract disorders, Reduces sciatic pain, Prevents hernia, Relieves heaviness and pain in the testicles, if practised regularly, Keeps the ovaries healthy, Corrects irregular menstruation , Helps to open blocked fallopian tubes and reduces vaginal irritation , Relieves menstrual pain and checks heavy menstruation",Do not practise this asana if you have a displaced or prolapsed uterus,BADDHAKONASANA or FIXED ANGLE POSE
"Tones and stimulates the abdominal organs, Assists digestion and counters the effects of excess bile secretion, Reduces flatulence and constipation ,Creates flexibility in the knee joints, Corrects dropped arches and flat feet","Avoid this asana if you have diarrhoea. Do not twist your torso or allow it to lean towards the outer side of your extended leg, as this could strain your spine or abdominal organs.",TRIANGA MUKHAIKAPADA PASCHIMOTTANASANA
"Relieves pain in the neck, shoulders, and back, Helps to keep the spine and shoulders supple, Eases a painful, stiff, sprained, or fused lumbar spine, Reduces discomfort in the dorsal spine area, Increases the flexibility of the back and hips","Do not practise this asana if you have eye strain, a stress-related headache, or a migraine. The asana should not be attempted if you have diarrhoea or dysentery",BHARADVAJASANA or LATERAL TWIST OF THE SPINE
"Increases energy levels, Tones and massages the abdominal organs, Improves the functioning of the liver, spleen, pancreas, kidneys, and intestines , Reduces fat around the waistline , Alleviates backache , Relieves lumbago","Do not practise this asana if you have diarrhoea or dysentery. Avoid this pose if you have a headache, migraine, insomnia, or when you are feeling fatigued. Do not practise during menstruation.","MARICHYASANA
or TORSO AND LEG STRETCH"
"Builds stamina, Alleviates insomnia, Reduces the occurrence of heart palpitations, Helps to cure halitosis, Strengthens the lungs, Improves the function of the pituitary and pineal glands, Increases the haemoglobin content in the blood, Relieves the symptoms of colds, coughs, and tonsillitis, Brings relief from digestive and eliminatory problems when practised in conjunction with Salamba Sarvangasana","Do not practise this asana if you have high blood pressure, cervical spondylosis, a backache, headache, or migraine. Do not start your yoga session with this pose if you have low blood pressure. Perform the asana only once in a session and do not repeat it – your body should not be overworked. Do not practise this asana during menstruation.",SALAMBA SIRSASANA or HEADSTAND
"Relieves fatigue and boosts energy levels, Controls hypertension, Rejuvenates the abdominal organs and improves digestion, Lengthens the spine, and improves its alignment, Helps to treat hernias and haemorrhoids if practised with legs separated, Relieves pain or cramps in the fingers, hands, wrists, elbows, and shoulders, if practised with arms and interlocked fingers extended towards the legs","Do not practise this asana if you have ischaemia, cervical spondylosis, or diarrhoea. Avoid this pose during menstruation. If you are prone to headaches, migraine, asthma, breathing difficulties, high blood pressure, physical and mental fatigue, or are overweight, practise Halasana with props (see page 232) and with your eyes closed.",HALASANA or PLOUGH POSE
"Prevents the arteries of the heart from thickening, and ensures healthy blood circulation throughout the body, Tones the spine, Strengthens the abdominal and pelvic organs, Stimulates the pituitary, pineal, and thyroid glands ,Prevents prolapse of the uterus, Helps to prevent excess menstrual flow and eases menstrual cramps","Do not practise this asana if your blood pressure is too high or too low. Avoid this pose if you have constipation or diarrhoea, or when you are feeling tired. Do not practise during a migraine attack or a severe headache. If you have a cardiac condition or ischaemia, practise Viparita Dandasana (see page 238) instead of this pose.",URDHVA DHANURASANA or BOW POSE
"Helps to treat depression, Improves incorrect posture, Strengthens the knee joints, Revitalizes the feet and corrects flat feet, Reduces sciatic pain, Prevents haemorrhoids, Improves bladder control, Tones and lifts the pelvis and abdomen","Do not practise this asana if you have stressrelated headaches, a migraine, eye strain, low blood pressure, osteoarthritis of the knees, bulimia, diarrhoea, insomnia, or leukorrhoea. If you have a problem with balance, practise this asana with your feet about 25cm",TADASANA SAMASTHITHI or STEADY AND FIRM MOUNTAIN POSE
"Rotates and flexes the vertebral joints, keeping the spinal muscles supple, Tones the lumbar and sacral spine, relieving backache, Corrects misalignment of the shoulders, Helps relieve sciatica, Improves circulation in the feet, Relieves gastritis and acidity, Corrects a prolapsed uterus This is the only standing asana that removes fatigue, provided it is done against a wall","Do not practise this asana if you have stressrelated headaches, a migraine, eye strain, varicose veins, diarrhoea, or insomnia. If you have hypertension, do not look up at your raised arm. Look straight ahead",ARDHA CHANDRASANA or HALF MOON POSE
"Relieves lower and middle backache, Reduces stiffness in the neck, Tones the kidneys and the abdominal organs, Relieves haemorrhoids, Massages the reproductive and pelvic organs, improving their functioning, Prevents prostate gland enlargement, Regulates menstrual flow and relieves menstrual disorders, Corrects a prolapsed uterus","Avoid this asana if you are tired, have low blood pressure, stress-related headaches, a migraine, eye strain, insomnia, or diarrhoea. If you have osteoarthritis of the knees place a block under your bent knee.",URDHVAMUKHA JANU SIRSASANA or UPWARD-FACING BENT KNEE POSE
"Removes physical and mental fatigue,
Relaxes and soothes the sympathetic 
nervous system,
Helps to treat high blood pressure, 
and relieves migraine and stressrelated headaches,
Alleviates the symptoms of respiratory 
diseases and eases breathing,
Speeds up recuperation after illness,
Helps towards refreshing, dreamless sleep, 
especially for those with sleep disorders","A very distracted mind is going to find it difficult to relax and by pushing the body, it will only backfire and cause more irritation and bring a headache",SAVASANA
"Helps to prevent arterial blockages by 
gently massaging and strengthening the 
heart and increasing coronary blood flow,
Increases the elasticity of lung tissue,
Enhances resistance to infections,
Relieves indigestion, acidity, and flatulence,
Corrects a prolapsed uterus, and tones 
the pelvic organs,
Relieves lower backache,
Reduces inflammation in the knees, 
and relieves gout and rheumatic pain, Relieves pain in the legs and feet and 
rests them, alleviating the effects of 
long hours of standing,
Helps to correct flat feet","If you have angina or 
partially blocked arteries, 
or are recovering from 
bypass surgery, only 
practise the pose under 
expert supervision.",SUPTA VIRASANA
"Enhances resistance to infections,
Stimulates the adrenal, pituitary, pineal, 
and thyroid glands,
Increases lung capacity and helps to maintain 
the elasticity of lung tissue,
Tones the liver, kidneys, and spleen,
Tones the spine, relieving lower backache 
and arthritic pain in the back,
Helps to prevent varicose veins by toning 
the legs, hamstrings, and ankles,
Helps to correct a prolapsed uterus, by 
stretching the pelvic area,
Improves blood circulation to the ovaries 
and tones them,
Relieves menstrual pain and the symptoms 
of menopause","Avoid this asana if you 
have a migraine, stress-related 
headaches, eye strain, rheumatoid 
arthritis, osteoarthritis of the knees, 
diarrhoea, constipation, or if 
you are prone to insomnia. 
Do not practise the pose 
during menstruation.",USTRASANA
"Soothes and relaxes the brain,
Builds up emotional stability and 
self-confidence,
Stimulates the adrenal, thyroid, pituitary, 
and pineal glands,
Gently massages and strengthens the 
heart, preventing arterial blockage,
Increases lung capacity,
Relieves indigestion and flatulence, Increases the flexibility of the spine,
Alleviates lower backache,
Corrects a displaced bladder or 
prolapsed uterus,
Relieves menstrual pain and helps to 
treat the symptoms of menopause","Do not practise this 
asana during a migraine 
attack. Avoid the pose if you 
have stress-related headaches, 
eye strain, constipation, diarrhoea, 
or insomnia. Discontinue the asana 
if you feel dizzy. If you suffer from 
backache, you must practise 
a few twists before and 
after this pose.",VIPARITA DANDASANA
"Helps to prevent arterial blockages or cardiac 
arrest by resting the heart muscles and 
increasing blood circulation to the arteries,
Combats fluctuating blood pressure, 
hypertension, and depression by soothing 
the brain and expanding the chest,
Relieves eye or ear ailments, migraines, 
stress-related headaches, nervous exhaustion, 
and insomnia,
Improves digestion and strengthens the 
abdominal organs ,
Relieves backache, strengthens the spine, 
and relieves neck strain,
Helps to rest tired legs and prevent 
varicose veins","Injury and Surgery, Since this pose requires lifting the hips and the back on a supported shoulder, students with neck and shoulder injuries and sprains need to completely avoid it. Also, the feet support the legs in this pose and hence students with an ankle injury or sprain need to avoid it. Since this is a back-bending pose, students who have undergone spinal, shoulder and hip surgeries need to avoid this",SETUBANDHA SARVANGASANA
"Regulates blood pressure,
Helps to treat cardiac disorders,
Helps to treat ear and eye ailments, stressrelated headaches, and migraine,
Relieves palpitations, breathlessness, asthma, 
bronchitis, and throat ailments,
Alleviates arthritis and cervical spondylosis,
Relieves indigestion, diarrhoea, and nausea,
Helps to treat kidney disorders,
Prevents varicose veins","People suffering from heart condition, high blood pressure,cervical problem or slipped disc should not practice this asana, women should not practice this asana during pregnancy or menstruation",VIPARITA KARANI
"Reduces fatigue, insomnia, and anxiety,
Relieves stress-related headaches, migraine, 
and hypertension,
Relieves palpitation and breathlessness,
Improves the functioning of the thyroid and 
parathyroid glands,
Alleviates throat ailments, asthma, bronchitis, 
colds, and congestion,
Relieves backache, lumbago, and arthritis 
of the back and spine","Do not practise this 
asana if you have cervical 
spondylosis. Do not attempt this 
pose during menstruation. If you 
suffer from osteoarthritis of the 
hips, backache, peptic ulcers, or 
premenstrual stress; or if you are 
overweight, separate your legs in the 
final pose. If you experience a 
choking feeling in the throat or 
heaviness in the head in the 
final pose, separate 
your legs.",HALASANA
"Relieves stress and nervous disorders,
Eases migraines and stress-related headaches,
Alleviates hypertension and insomnia,
Reduces palpitation,
Improves the functioning of the thyroid and 
parathyroid glands,
Relieves cervical spondylosis and shoulder pain,
Relieves bronchitis, asthma, sinusitis, and 
congestion,
Prevents varicose veins,
Alleviates ulcers, colitis, chronic constipation, 
and haemorrhoids","Do not practise this 
asana during menstruation. 
During practice, ensure 
that your shoulders do not 
slide off the bolster onto 
the floor. This will compress 
the neck and might 
cause injury",SALAMBA SARVANGASANA
"Improves digestion and cures flatulence 
by exercising the abdominal muscles,
Relieves lower backache,
Alleviates gout, rheumatism, and inflammation 
of the knees,
Lessens stiffness in the hip joints, and makes 
the hamstrings supple,
Reduces pain in the calves, ankles, and heels,
Strengthens the arches of the feet and 
corrects flat feet or calcaneal spurs,
Releases a catch or sprain in the shoulders 
and neck","Avoid practising this 
asana if you have a 
migraine, headaches, severe 
eye strain, bronchitis, a cold 
and congestion in the chest, 
or diarrhoea. Do not practise if 
you are prone to depression, 
extreme fatigue, 
or insomnia.",PARSVA VIRASANA
"Relieves stiffness in the neck and shoulders,
Improves the alignment of the spinal column 
and keeps it supple,
Alleviates pain in the lower back, hips, 
and tailbone,
Prevents the shortening of the leg muscles 
associated with ageing,
Prevents sciatica,
Cures indigestion,
Relieves flatulence","Do not practise this asana 
if you have a serious cardiac 
condition, blocked arteries, high or low 
blood pressure, a migraine, severe eye 
strain, a cold, bronchitis, breathlessness, 
chronic fatigue, depression, insomnia, 
diarrhoea, constipation, or osteoarthritis 
of the knees. Women should avoid this 
asana during menstruation.","UTTHITA MARICHYASANA
"
"Alleviates lower backache and
cervical spondylosis,
Increases blood circulation to the 
abdominal organs,
Aids digestion and reduces flatulence,
Helps in the treatment of hernia,
Tones the liver and kidneys","Do not practise if you 
have a cardiac condition, 
a migraine, headache, a cold 
or chest congestion, diarrhoea, 
constipation, chronic fatigue 
syndrome, insomnia, 
and depression.","MARICHYASANA
"
"Alleviates stiffness and pain in the 
lower back, neck, and shoulders,
Reduces pain in the hip joints, calves, 
heels, and ankles,
Makes the hamstrings supple,
Helps to treat disorders of the kidneys, 
liver, spleen, and gall bladder,
Relieves indigestion and flatulence,
Tones the muscles of the uterus","Do not practise this 
asana if you have a cardiac 
condition, a migraine, 
headaches, severe eye strain, 
a cold or chest congestion, 
diarrhoea, chronic fatigue 
syndrome, depression, 
and insomnia.",BHARADVAJASANA
"Soothes the sympathetic nervous 
system, relieving stress and fatigue,
Relieves migraines and stress-related 
headaches,
Relieves palpitation and breathlessness,
Helps to prevent nausea and vomiting,
Relieves pain in the hip joints,
Rests tired legs and improves blood 
circulation in the knees","Students with a current or recent abdominal surgery or with injuries at the hips, knees, or lower back should not attempt the pose","ADHOMUKHA 
SWASTIKASANA"
"Relieves breathlessness, dizziness, 
fatigue, and headaches, Reduces high blood pressure,
Stretches and tones the spine, relieving 
pain in the back and neck,
Reduces acidity and flatulence,
Alleviates menstrual pain and depression 
associated with menstruation","Do not practise
this asana if you are 
incontinent. If you have a 
migraine or a stress-related 
headache, wrap a crepe 
bandage around your 
eyes and forehead.",ADHOMUKHA VIRASANA
"Sharpens the memory,
Relieves chronic headaches, migraine, 
or eye strain,
Helps to normalize blood pressure,
Reduces angina pain,
Reduces stress-related 
appetite loss,
Vitalizes the adrenal gland and relaxes 
the thyroid gland,
Improves bladder control,
Prevents enlargement 
of the prostate gland,
Reduces menstrual cramps and relieves 
dryness and itching in the vagina,
Prevents fibroids and regulates 
menstrual flow","Avoid the pose if you 
have diarrhoea as it will 
aggravate the condition. If your 
knees are stiff, or if you have 
osteoarthritis of the knees, practise 
with a wooden block nder the bent 
knee. If you have a stress-related 
headache or migraine, practise 
the asana with a crepe 
bandage over 
your eyes.",JANU SIRSASANA
"Relieves stress-related appetite loss,
Helps in the treatment of acidity, ulcers, 
anorexia, bulimia, and alcoholism,
Tones the liver and kidneys,
Relieves lower backache","Do not practise this 
asana if you have an 
attack of diarrhoea, or if you 
are experiencing the 
symptoms of asthma 
or bronchitis","ADHOMUKHA 
PASCHIMOTTANASANA"
"Sharpens memory,
Soothes the sympathetic nervous system,
Prevents fatigue,
Rests the heart, normalizes blood 
pressure and the pulse rate,
Relieves chronic headaches, migraine, 
and eye strain,
Reduces stress in the facial muscles,
Alleviates stress-related compression or 
a feeling of tightness in the throat and 
diaphragm,
Improves blood circulation in the pelvic 
area, toning the pelvic organs,
Regulates blood supply to the endocrine 
glands, activating the adrenal glands, 
and relaxing the thyroid gland,
Cools the temperature of the skin,
Strengthens the vertebral joints and 
stretches the ligaments of the spine","Do not practise this 
asana if you have 
asthma, bronchitis, or 
diarrhoea. Do not practise 
this pose if you have 
cervical spondylosis.",PASCHIMOTTANASANA
"Helps to treat arthritis of the hips,
Relieves sciatic pain,
Helps to prevent and relieve hernias,
Massages the organs of the reproductive system,
Stimulates the ovaries, regulates menstrual flow, 
and relieves menstrual pain and disorders,
Corrects a prolapsed uterus or bladder","If you have asthma, you 
must practise this asana 
sitting on a folded blanket 
close to the wall. Lift and 
open the chest, allowing for 
easy breathing",UPAVISTA KONASANA
"Rests tired feet and legs,
Reduces inflammation of the veins 
in the legs,
Makes the hip joint and groin supple,
Strengthens the cartilage of the knees 
and relieves pain in the knees,
Improves circulation and reduces 
inflammation in the knees","students injured at the hips, knees, and ankles should avoid the same, The sciatic nerve gets compressed when seated in Swastikasana reducing blood supply to the nerve. This can become painful and unsafe for those suffering from sciatica, hence best to avoid",SWASTIKASANA
"Boosts confidence and helps to 
treat depression,
Alleviates cervical spondylosis,
Improves breathing by opening 
up the chest,
Strengthens the knee joints,
Reduces sciatic pain,
Corrects flat feet","Avoid this asana if you 
have a cardiac condition, 
stress-related headaches, a 
migraine, eye strain, insomnia, low 
blood pressure, osteoarthritis of the 
knees, diarrhoea, or leukorrhoea. If you 
have had polio, or any congenital deformity 
of the legs, or are knock-kneed, keep your 
feet about 25cm (10in) apart. If you have 
backache, a slipped disc, a prolapsed 
uterus, or pain in the wrist,",TADASANA GOMUKHASANA
"Reduces depression and 
boosts confidence,
Soothes the brain and the sympathetic 
nervous system,
Energizes the heart and lungs,
Reduces blood pressure,
Relieves stress-related headaches, 
migraine, and fatigue,
Tones the abdominal organs,
Relieves stomachache by neutralizing 
acidity,
Relieves lower backache,
Strengthens the knee joint and makes 
the hip joint supple,
Regulates menstrual flow","Do not hold this asana 
for more than 1 minute, 
especially if you are a 
beginner. If you have low blood 
pressure, come out of the pose 
gradually to avoid dizziness. Do 
not tilt your head or compress 
your neck while practising 
this pose",PRASARITA PADOTTANASANA
"Tones and relaxes the nervous system, helping to relieve depression and anxiety • Cures breathlessness, palpitations, extreme fatigue, and sunstroke • Stabilizes blood pressure and heart rate • Helps relieve chronic constipation, indigestion, and excess bile formation • Relieves arthritis in the shoulders, wrists, and fingers • Reduces lower backache • Increases the flexibility of the hip, knee, and ankle joints • Strengthens the ligaments and tendons of the legs • Counters the damage to the cartilage of the knee or hamstring muscles caused by jogging, walking, and other sports • Strengthens the arches of the feet and prevents calcaneal spurs","Do not practise this asana if you have diarrhoea. Patients with rheumatoid arthritis who have fever should avoid this asana. If you have a stiff spine or high blood pressure, or are prone to recurrent headaches or varicose veins, always practise all these variations with your head supported by a block. Beginners should not hold the final pose for more than 30 seconds. Gradually increase the duration of the pose to 1 minute",ADHOMUKHA SVANASANA or DOWNWARD-FACING DOG STRETCH
Improves digestion • Tones the kidneys • Helps to prevent sciatic pain • Stretches and activates the muscles of the legs • Prevents tiredness in the feet by stretching the muscles of the feet,"If you have asthma, bronchitis, breathlessness, rheumatoid arthritis, ulcers, or bulimia, or are experiencing premenstrual stress, practise the asana with your back supported by a wall. Practise against a wall during menstruation.",DANDASANA STAFF POSE
"• Reduces stiffness in the hip joints • Reduces inflammation in the blood vessels of the legs caused by standing for long periods • Alleviates pain or inflammation in the knees and tones knee cartilage • Relieves gout and rheumatic pain • Tones the hamstring muscles • Strengthens the arches of the feet, and relieves pain in the calves, ankles, and heels","If you experience cramps in the legs while practising this asana, stretch your legs out in Dandasana (see page 102). Avoid practising this asana if you have a headache, migraine, or diarrhoea.",VIRASANA HERO POSE
"BENEFITS • Relieves lower and middle backache • Reduces stiffness in the neck • Tones the kidneys and the abdominal organs • Relieves haemorrhoids • Massages the reproductive and pelvic organs, improving their functioning • Prevents prostate gland enlargement • Regulates menstrual flow and relieves menstrual disorders • Corrects a prolapsed uterus","Avoid this asana if you are tired, have low blood pressure, stress-related headaches, a migraine, eye strain, insomnia, or diarrhoea. If you have osteoarthritis of the knees place a block under your bent knee.",URDHVAMUKHA JANU SIRSASANA UPWARD-FACING BENT KNEE POSE
"Stimulates the heart and improves circulation in the pelvic region • Tones the spine, and the abdominal and pelvic organs • Prevents hernia • Alleviates sciatica and varicose veins • Reduces menstrual pain, irregular periods, and leukorrhoea","Practise this asana sitting against a wall if you have asthma, bronchitis, breathlessness, rheumatoid arthritis, cardiac conditions, or premenstrual stress. Ensure that your lower spine does not become concave, as this will strain your waist and hips.",BADDHAKONASANA FIXED ANGLE POSE
• Rests tired feet and legs • Reduces inflammation of the veins in the legs • Makes the hip joint and groin supple • Strengthens the cartilage of the knees and relieves pain in the knees • Improves circulation and reduces inflammation in the knees,"If your legs ache while performing the asana, place a folded blanket under them",SWASTIKASANA CROSS-LEGGED POSE
• Increases the body’s metabolic rate • Improves blood circulation in the abdomen • Tones the abdominal muscles and organs • Relieves indigestion and flatulence • Tones the kidneys • Reduces lower backache by strengthening the spinal muscles,"Do not practise this asana if you have a cardiac condition or low blood pressure. Avoid the pose if you have breathlessness, asthma, bronchitis, a cold and congestion, a migraine, chronic fatigue syndrome, or insomnia, cervical spondylosis, severe backache, diarrhoea, or menstrual disorders.",PARIPURNA NAVASANA COMPLETE BOAT POSE
,"Position the belt around your upper back, and not lumbar or middle back as that can cause pain.",PARIPURNA NAVASANA
"• Helps to treat arthritis of the hips • Relieves sciatic pain • Helps to prevent and relieve hernias • Massages the organs of the reproductive system • Stimulates the ovaries, regulates menstrual flow, and relieves menstrual pain and disorders • Corrects a prolapsed uterus or bladder","If you have asthma, you must practise this asana sitting on a folded blanket close to the wall. Lift and open the chest, allowing for easy breathing",UPAVISTA KONASANA SEATED WIDE-ANGLE POSE
"• Sharpens memory • Soothes the sympathetic nervous system • Prevents fatigue • Rests the heart, normalizes blood pressure and the pulse rate • Relieves chronic headaches, migraine, and eye strain • Reduces stress in the facial muscles • Alleviates stress-related compression or a feeling of tightness in the throat and diaphragm • Improves blood circulation in the pelvic area, toning the pelvic organs • Regulates blood supply to the endocrine glands, activating the adrenal glands, and relaxing the thyroid gland • Cools the temperature of the skin • Strengthens the vertebral joints and stretches the ligaments of the spine","Do not practise this asana if you have asthma, bronchitis, or diarrhoea. Do not practise this pose if you have cervical spondylosis",PASCHIMOTTANASANA INTENSE BACK STRETCH
"• Relieves stress-related appetite loss • Helps in the treatment of acidity, ulcers, anorexia, bulimia, and alcoholism • Tones the liver and kidneys • Relieves lower backache","Do not practise this asana if you have an attack of diarrhoea, or if you are experiencing the symptoms of asthma or bronchitis",ADHOMUKHA PASCHIMOTTANASANA
"Sharpens the memory • Relieves chronic headaches, migraine, or eye strain • Helps to normalize blood pressure • Reduces angina pain • Reduces stress-related appetite loss • Vitalizes the adrenal gland and relaxes the thyroid gland • Improves bladder control • Prevents enlargement of the prostate gland • Reduces menstrual cramps and relieves dryness and itching in the vagina • Prevents fibroids and regulates menstrual flow","Avoid the pose if you have diarrhoea as it will aggravate the condition. If your knees are stiff, or if you have osteoarthritis of the knees, practise with a wooden block nder the bent knee. If you have a stress-related headache or migraine, practise the asana with a crepe bandage over your eyes.",JANU SIRSASANA HEAD-ON-KNEE POSE
"Neti is the best method of preventing and eliminating colds. An effective cure for the common cold has not yet been found. Neti is not foolproof, but it goes a long way to solving the problem. A cold indicates something significant, namely that your body is in a weakened condition. If this was not the case, the cold virus would be unable to penetrate the def ences of your system; your autotherapeutic powers would be strong enough to withstand such an attack. The cold virus flourishes in nerve tissue, particularly the olfactory nerves in the nose. During a cold, neti greatly helps by removing the accumulated mucus in the nose, this being 
a breeding ground","People who suffer from chronic bleeding of the nose should not do neti without expert advice. Make sure that the water is not too hot when you introduce it into the nostrils. Do not breathe in and out too deeply when removing the moisture from the nose; we are trying to improve the condition of your nose, not damage it. Also, if the sinuses are blocked with mucus, be careful not to blow your nose hard. It is very easy to push the mucus further into the cavities. Ensure that the salt fully dissolves in the water before pouring it into your nose. Be careful to hold the head correctly and not to hold the neti pot too low. In order for the water to flow into one nostril and out the other, the water level in the pot must be higher than the region at the back of the nose, where the two nostrils merge with each other. If you tilt your head too much then the water will go down your throat instead of the other nostril. If you tilt the pot too much the water will merely overflow out of the pot. You must adjust the position of your head and the pot so that they are at correct levels. People who have great difficulty passing water through the nose may have a structural blockage such as a polyp. Expert advice should be sought. If there is a slight burning sensation in the nose during your first attempt with salt water, don't worry. This will disappear as your nose tissue becomes accustomed to contact with water.",JALA NETI
"Basically shavasana relaxes the whole physiological-psychological system. A relaxed mind allows you to see and relate to the world and the people around you in a more realistic light, carry out your work more smoothly and attain more happiness in life.","This practice gives maximum benefits if your attention is totally involved in the practice. If you do shavasana without enthusiasm then it will not give the required results. A little mental effort is necessary, but without mental strain. The duration of the practice should suit the time that is available; the longer the better",SHAVASANA (CORPSE POSE)
"This is a good asana to loosen up the legs and prepare them for meditative asanas. Most people have very stiff spines, so stiff in fact that it is difficult to believe the spinal column is composed of thirty-one separate bones which allow suppleness in the back and neck. This asana helps to loosen up the spine and return it to its correct condition. In the final position the abdomen is compressed, which gives a valuable massage to the internal organs, especially those concerned with digestion. This massage squeezes out stagnant, impure blood and encourages it to flow back to the heart and lungs for oxygenation. The deep breathing is most important for it accentuates the massage imparted to the abdominal organs.",,SAITHALY ASANA (ANIMAL RELAXATION POSE)
"This asana supplements the previous asana (saithalyasana) in that it loosens up the spine. Those people with rigid spines and chronic back or neck ache are especially advised to do marjari-asana regularly. The pelvic and abdominal regions are well massaged, with a beneficial influence on the internal organs. The organs of digestion, reproduction and elimination are innervated 53 by nerves in and around the spine. Marjariasana gently stretches and stimulates these spinal nerves. This has a supplementary influence which improves the function of the internal organs. Many women suffer from ailments of their sexual organs. This asana has been found to be very useful in improving the health of these organs and helping to eliminate reproductive disorders. Women suffering from menstrual irregularities and leucorrhoea have achieved enormous benefits from regular practice of this asana. At the time of menstruation this asana can help give relief from menstrual cramps. This is an excellent asana for post-pregnancy cases as it tightens the abdominal muscles and encourages the abdomen to resume its normal shape.",,MARJARI-ASANA (CAT STRETCH POSE)
"Vajrasana is one of the few asanas which can be performed after taking meals, as asanas in general are strictly contraindicated after food. We actually recommend that vajrasana be practised for five or ten minutes after meals T h e reason is simple: vajrasana is a very relaxing position, conducive to a calm mind a n d body and it stimulates the digestive processes working in the stomach. As we have already explained, vajrasana is an excellent meditative asana and in fact is the only practical meditative asana for people who suffer from sciatica or sacral infections. Vajrasana has one notable advantage over sukhasana: one tends to automatically hold the spine straight while doing vajrasana. whereas in sukhasana there is mor e of a tendency to slump forwards. For this reason vajrasana is far superior to sukhasana once it is mastered.",,VAJRASANA (THUNDERBOLT OR DIAMOND POSE)
This is an excellent practice in preparing the lungs for more advanced practices of pranayama. At the time of retention the amount of oxygen taken up by the blood and the amount of carbon dioxide which is discharged by the blood into the lungs is increased. When people breathe quickly and shallowly the exchange between the circulating blood and the lungs is very small. Th e increased exchange during samaveta pranayama helps to revitalize the body and improve the health.,,Samaveta Pranayama
"T h e tonsils depend on a good blood supply for efficient functioning. Th e blood often becomes congested in this region especially when one's system is particularly toxic and during tonsillitis. Simha kriya massages the throat region and squeezes out stagnant, impure blood so that it returns to the kidneys for purification. At the end of practising simha kriya, the muscles and blood vessels of the throa t ar e relaxed. This allows a freshly oxygenated supply of blood to circulate in this region, which has a wonderful rejuvenating effect on the tonsils, helping to improve the health of the whole body as well as removing the causes of tonsillitis. In the throat there are many other vital organs. These include the thyroid glands, the pharynx, the larynx, the salivary glands as well as the auditoiy system in general. All of these receive a wonderful massage in the same way as described for the tonsils. Since these provide essential functions of the body, the improvement in their health through the simple practice of simha kriya can have vast repercussions on our lives. All nerves connecting the body to the brain must pass through the neck region. It is a vital crossroad. Also in the throat region there are various nerve plexuses which control the organs of the throat. Simha kriya stretches these nerves and removes stagnant blood, allowing an influx of fresh blood. This together with the stimulation that the nerves also receive results in better nerve connections to the brain and in turn increased efficiency in the glands and organs of the body. Simha kriya is a useful practice for preventing and removing pharyngitis, lary ngitis and general throat ailments.",,Simha Kriya: The Lion's Yawn
"Shashankasana is a reasonably simple asana yet it gives many benefits. Most people have very stiff backs. Shashankasana stretches the back muscles and separates the individual vertebrae from each other. This releases pressure on the discs that keep the vertebrae apart. Often nerve connections emanating from the spinal cord are squeezed by these discs giving rise to various forms of backache and sciatica. The separation of the discs during shashankasana helps to relieve these pains and encourage the discs to resume their correct locations. The stretch imparted to the back muscles removes sluggish and depleted blood. On completing the asana fresh blood is soaked up into the muscles in the same way that water is absorbed by a sponge. This regenerates both the back muscles and the all important spinal nerves. The deep breathing in the final position applies a gentle yet powerful massage to the abdominal organs. As such this asana is very useful in helping to remove and prevent various abdominal disorders such as constipation and indigestion. This asana tones the pelvic organs and is found beneficial in alleviating sexual disorders. Women will find this asana advantageous. All of us become angry. It takes a mere second to feel anger but far longer to regain normality. Deep and slow breathing helps to calm anger. Shashankasana induces this and quickly brings about relaxation. Breath awareness accentuates this process by withdrawing our thoughts away from the cause of our anger. The by-product of emotional upsets such as anger is over-stimulation of the adrenal glands. These two glands inject adrenaline directly into the bloodstream causing overactivity of the bodily functions and stress. Shashankasana regulates these organs, helping to bring about a relaxed mind and body. This is a very comfortable asana. In fact it is so comfortable that we know of some people who can sleep in this pose and often do.",This variation particularly directs an extra supply of blood to the brain. As such it is helpful in removing tiredness and mental fatigue and certain types of headache. People who suffer from high blood pressure or vertigo should practise with caution.,SHASHANKASANA (POSE OF THE MOON OR HARE POSE)
"This asana gives an excellent massage to the abdomen. In this pose the abdominal muscles are tensed and simultaneously the internal organs are compressed by the folded legs. This increases the circulation of the blood and stimulates the nerves which connect the organs to the brain or nerve complexes. As such it helps in no small way to relieve various types of abdominal ailments associated with malfunctioning of inefficient organs. This asana is particularly useful for removing constipation and flatulence. Food moves from the stomach through the intestines during digestion. The intestinal tract is divided into two sections, the small and the large intestines. Most of the digestive processes occur in the small intestine. After this the waste matter proceeds to the large intestine (colon). The large intestine is about five feet in length and rises upwards on the right side of the body (ascending colon), crosses horizontally in the region of the navel (transverse colon) and then goes downwards on the left side of the body (descending colon). It terminates in the anus. For this reason it is important that pawanmuktasana is first performed with the right leg bent so that waste matter is encouraged to pass in the proper direction and more easily to the anus for expulsion, from the ascending colon to the descending colon. If the left leg is bent first the massage and stimulation of the bowels will be in the opposite order to the movement of faeces and wind. This is an important aspect and needs to be done correctly to gain maximum benefits. This asana also tones up the back muscles and spinal nerves.",,SUPTA PAWANMUKTASANA (LEG LOCK POSE)
This is an especially good asana for those who have a particularly stiff back. It is a good preparation for bhujangasana which requires more flexibility of the back. Th e benefits are the same as for bhujangasana though on a lesser scale2 '.,,SPHINX ASANA
"If you suffer from any spinal or lung ailments we suggest you lie in makarasana for as long as possible; the longer the better. You can even read a book in this asana. This position encourages the spine to resume its normal shape and releases compression of the spinal nerves (sciatica). Th e chest is also expanded allowing an increased amount of air to enter the lungs, which is a great help in alleviating congestion and other ailments of the respiratory system.",,MAKARASANA (CROCODILE POSE)
"Stage 1 of nadi shodhana is an excellent preparatory technique for more advanced 86 forms of pranayama and an excellent prelude to meditational or relaxation techniques. It induces calmness of mind by regulating the flow of prana in the body. It helps to remove congestion or blockage of the nadis and thereby allows the free flow of prana. T h e whole body is nourished with an extra supply of oxygen and the carbon dioxide is more efficiently eliminated. This purifies the whole blood system and increases the overall health of the body, including its power to resist disease. Th e deep, slow breathing encourages the removal of stagnant air from the lungs.",,NASAGRA MUDRA (NOSE TIP POSITION)
"This technique gives the best possible wash to the digestive system from the stomach to the mouth. As such it helps remove all diseases of this region which are the result of a build-up of toxins or general impurities. It also helps to eradicate bad breath, the accumulation of phlegm in the throat and sore throats. Most of us at one time or another have had stomach problems. There are various causes - eating too much food, eating food that is too rich, bad or that is impure, as well as oversecretion of gastric juices, particularly acid, due to emotional upsets or sustained stress. Kunjal cannot change your food habits and certainly cannot remove mental and emotional tension. However, it can help to keep the stomach in good order by washing it clean of impurities. The salt water also reduces the secretion of acid from the glands in the stomach. These in general are rendered more efficient thus allowing better digestion of food. All these are important factors in preventing indigestion, obtaining the best possible assimilation of nutrients into the body as well as eliminating other digestive ailments.","Most people can do this practice. However, it should not be attempted by those suffering from hernia of the stomach or abdomen, high blood pressure and heart problems. Though kunjal kriya helps to remove excess acidity from the stomach, a factor very much associated with ulcers, we don't advise you to try to do this practice under these circumstances. It will probably do more harm than good",KUNJARA KRIYA
"This prevents burdening the intestines with undigestible food. However, it has another more obvious use. If we eat bad, rotten, rich or bulky food the stomach often causes us to vomit. It is a natural process of the body. However, this is the last resort of the body for it usually tries to digest the food that we have dumped in the stomach. This leads to a lot of heaviness, discomfort and it takes many hours for the digestive system to settle down. Th e easiest way to prevent this unnecessary disruption of intestines is to vomit as soon as possible. This sounds a little distasteful but it takes only a minute or so and it prevents much discomfort. T h e modern day remedy for indigestion or eating too much rich food is to swallow a tablet. Yet the natural and least harmful way is to vomit. We therefore recommend vyaghra kriya to those who want to bring their digestive system quickly back into shape again.",,VYAGHRA KRIYA
"This asana increases the flexibility of the back and massages the abdominal organs. It gives many other similar benefits. In particular it influences the kidneys and the adrenal glands. The kidneys purify our blood. During bhujangasana they are compressed thereby removing stagnant blood. On resumption of the starting position the kidneys are irrigated with a fresh supply of blood. A massage of these important organs is normally difficult for they are comparatively inaccessible. Bhujangasana overcomes this difficulty, improves the efficiency of the kidneys and thereby the health of the whole body. The adrenal glands, situated on top of the kidneys, also receive a good massage and so are encouraged to work more efficiently. These glands secrete various hormones which have vast repercussions on our mind and body. The secretion of adrenaline which affects our degree of tension 105 or relaxation is regulated. This helps give our mental and physical constitution more stability. Cortisone is another major hormone secreted by the adrenal glands. This has been found to be closely associated with the occurrence of rheumatism. Bhujangasana helps to maintain and encourage the correct secretion of this hormone and has been found very useful in alleviating rheumatism.","Those people who suffer from peptic ulcers, hernia, intestinal tuberculosis or hyperthyroidism should not do this asana. If you have any other complaint that you think may preclude practice of bhujangasana seek the guidance of a competent yoga teacher.",BHUJANGASANA (COBRA POSE)
"This asana gives similar benefits to bhujangasana and shashankasana1 . However, the other asanas give their benefits by maintaining the final pose; shashank bhujangasana acts mainly by alternately flexing the spine. It is particularly useful for toning the female reproductive organs. It is an excellent asana for post-pregnant women to strengthen and tighten the abdominal and pelvic region. It is especially useful for relieving menstrual disorders. It massages and tones the abdominal and pelvic organs and is found to be helpful in promoting good elimination. The entire back is loosened up, the nerves are stimulated and the back muscles are made pliable. It has been found to be useful in eliminating backache and neckache.",,SHASHANK BHUJANGASANA (STRIKING COBRA POSE)
"This asana helps to strengthen the spinal muscles and gives a good massage to the abdomen and pelvic organs. The benefits in this respect are similar to bhujangasana. Sarpasana has a particularly notable influence on the lungs. The two lungs are composed of millions of alveoli (air cells) which facilitate the exchange of oxygen for carbon dioxide. The oxygen is taken into the body and the carbon dioxide is removed from the body. If these tiny air cells remain active and the lungs elastic then the lungs retain their general health and efficiency. The natural way of maintaining a healthy pair of lungs is regular, deep respiration. This successively inflates and deflates the tiny alveoli and at the same time stretches the elastic tissue of the lungs.","Those people who suffer from stomach ulcers, high blood pressure, heart troubles or hernia should not do sarpasana. Seek expert guidance if you are unsure about whether you should or should not do this asana.",SARPASANA (SNAKE POSE)
"This asana twists the whole spine from top to bottom. As such it loosens up all the vertebrae, helps to relocate displaced vertebrae and tones all the nerves within and surrounding the spine. The massage of the abdomen applied by this asana helps to keep all the internal organs in good shape and it has been found to be useful for relieving backache, neckache, lumbago and mild forms of sciatica. It is also a useful preliminary asana to prepare the back for the more difficult spinal twist asanas.",,MERU VAKRASANA (SPINAL TWIST)
"T h e benefits are the same as we have already described for nadi shodhana stage 1 so we will not repeat them here1 . However, nadi shodhana stage 2 is much more powerful and effective in balancing the air flow through the two nostrils. For this reason it is particularly useful before relaxational and meditational techniques. It develops a state of harmony in the individual so that he is neither too lethargic nor too active, too dull or too excitable. Th e 
pranic currents or poles (sun and moon) are 
brought into balance with each other, thus 
increasing the health of the whole body-mind 
complex.",,Nadi Shodhana (Stage 2)
"The abdominal organs and stomach are alternately stretched and compressed. This imparts a healthy massage to the internal organs and ensures that they function correctly, or if they don't currently work efficiently, encourages them to do so. Many diseases of the digestive system can be prevented and removed by the regular practice of surya namaskara. Rapid elimination of 
waste materials from the body is essential. 
Often undigested waste products remain in 
the intestines and bowels due to constipation, 
which can result in various other disorders. 
Surya namaskara stimulates the peristalsis of 
the intestines helping to remove any tendency 
towards constipation. 
The kidneys are also important eliminative 
organs. They filter impurities from the blood 
and eliminate them from the body in the form 
of urine.","There are absolutely no sex or age limitations with regard to the practice of surya namaskara; both young and old, male and female can do it and gain its many benefits. However, ladies should not do it after their fourth month of pregnancy, but it can be continued after childbirth. Furthermore, ladies are advised not to do it during menstruation as a precautionary measure.",POSITION 1: PRANAMASANA (PRAYER POSE)
"The abdominal organs and stomach are alternately stretched and compressed. This imparts a healthy massage to the internal organs and ensures that they function correctly, or if they don't currently work efficiently, encourages them to do so. Many diseases of the digestive system can be prevented and removed by the regular practice of surya namaskara. Rapid elimination of 
waste materials from the body is essential. 
Often undigested waste products remain in 
the intestines and bowels due to constipation, 
which can result in various other disorders. 
Surya namaskara stimulates the peristalsis of 
the intestines helping to remove any tendency 
towards constipation. 
The kidneys are also important eliminative 
organs. They filter impurities from the blood 
and eliminate them from the body in the form 
of urine.","There are absolutely no sex or age limitations with regard to the practice of surya namaskara; both young and old, male and female can do it and gain its many benefits. However, ladies should not do it after their fourth month of pregnancy, but it can be continued after childbirth. Furthermore, ladies are advised not to do it during menstruation as a precautionary measure.",POSITION 2: HASTA UIT H AN ASANA (RAISED ARMS POSE)
"The abdominal organs and stomach are alternately stretched and compressed. This imparts a healthy massage to the internal organs and ensures that they function correctly, or if they don't currently work efficiently, encourages them to do so. Many diseases of the digestive system can be prevented and removed by the regular practice of surya namaskara. Rapid elimination of 
waste materials from the body is essential. 
Often undigested waste products remain in 
the intestines and bowels due to constipation, 
which can result in various other disorders. 
Surya namaskara stimulates the peristalsis of 
the intestines helping to remove any tendency 
towards constipation. 
The kidneys are also important eliminative 
organs. They filter impurities from the blood 
and eliminate them from the body in the form 
of urine.","There are absolutely no sex or age limitations with regard to the practice of surya namaskara; both young and old, male and female can do it and gain its many benefits. However, ladies should not do it after their fourth month of pregnancy, but it can be continued after childbirth. Furthermore, ladies are advised not to do it during menstruation as a precautionary measure.",POSITION 3: PADAHASTASANA (HAND TO FOOT POSE)
"The abdominal organs and stomach are alternately stretched and compressed. This imparts a healthy massage to the internal organs and ensures that they function correctly, or if they don't currently work efficiently, encourages them to do so. Many diseases of the digestive system can be prevented and removed by the regular practice of surya namaskara. Rapid elimination of 
waste materials from the body is essential. 
Often undigested waste products remain in 
the intestines and bowels due to constipation, 
which can result in various other disorders. 
Surya namaskara stimulates the peristalsis of 
the intestines helping to remove any tendency 
towards constipation. 
The kidneys are also important eliminative 
organs. They filter impurities from the blood 
and eliminate them from the body in the form 
of urine.","There are absolutely no sex or age limitations with regard to the practice of surya namaskara; both young and old, male and female can do it and gain its many benefits. However, ladies should not do it after their fourth month of pregnancy, but it can be continued after childbirth. Furthermore, ladies are advised not to do it during menstruation as a precautionary measure.",POSITION 4: ASHWA SANCHALANASANA (EQUESTRIAN POSE)
"The abdominal organs and stomach are alternately stretched and compressed. This imparts a healthy massage to the internal organs and ensures that they function correctly, or if they don't currently work efficiently, encourages them to do so. Many diseases of the digestive system can be prevented and removed by the regular practice of surya namaskara. Rapid elimination of 
waste materials from the body is essential. 
Often undigested waste products remain in 
the intestines and bowels due to constipation, 
which can result in various other disorders. 
Surya namaskara stimulates the peristalsis of 
the intestines helping to remove any tendency 
towards constipation. 
The kidneys are also important eliminative 
organs. They filter impurities from the blood 
and eliminate them from the body in the form 
of urine.","There are absolutely no sex or age limitations with regard to the practice of surya namaskara; both young and old, male and female can do it and gain its many benefits. However, ladies should not do it after their fourth month of pregnancy, but it can be continued after childbirth. Furthermore, ladies are advised not to do it during menstruation as a precautionary measure.",POSITION 5: PARVATASANA (MOUNTAIN POSE)
"The abdominal organs and stomach are alternately stretched and compressed. This imparts a healthy massage to the internal organs and ensures that they function correctly, or if they don't currently work efficiently, encourages them to do so. Many diseases of the digestive system can be prevented and removed by the regular practice of surya namaskara. Rapid elimination of 
waste materials from the body is essential. 
Often undigested waste products remain in 
the intestines and bowels due to constipation, 
which can result in various other disorders. 
Surya namaskara stimulates the peristalsis of 
the intestines helping to remove any tendency 
towards constipation. 
The kidneys are also important eliminative 
organs. They filter impurities from the blood 
and eliminate them from the body in the form 
of urine.","There are absolutely no sex or age limitations with regard to the practice of surya namaskara; both young and old, male and female can do it and gain its many benefits. However, ladies should not do it after their fourth month of pregnancy, but it can be continued after childbirth. Furthermore, ladies are advised not to do it during menstruation as a precautionary measure.",POSITION 6: ASHTANGA NAMASKARA (WORSHIP WITH EIGHT POINTS)
"The abdominal organs and stomach are alternately stretched and compressed. This imparts a healthy massage to the internal organs and ensures that they function correctly, or if they don't currently work efficiently, encourages them to do so. Many diseases of the digestive system can be prevented and removed by the regular practice of surya namaskara. Rapid elimination of 
waste materials from the body is essential. 
Often undigested waste products remain in 
the intestines and bowels due to constipation, 
which can result in various other disorders. 
Surya namaskara stimulates the peristalsis of 
the intestines helping to remove any tendency 
towards constipation. 
The kidneys are also important eliminative 
organs. They filter impurities from the blood 
and eliminate them from the body in the form 
of urine.","There are absolutely no sex or age limitations with regard to the practice of surya namaskara; both young and old, male and female can do it and gain its many benefits. However, ladies should not do it after their fourth month of pregnancy, but it can be continued after childbirth. Furthermore, ladies are advised not to do it during menstruation as a precautionary measure.",POSITION 7: BHUJANGASANA (COBRA POSE)
"The abdominal organs and stomach are alternately stretched and compressed. This imparts a healthy massage to the internal organs and ensures that they function correctly, or if they don't currently work efficiently, encourages them to do so. Many diseases of the digestive system can be prevented and removed by the regular practice of surya namaskara. Rapid elimination of 
waste materials from the body is essential. 
Often undigested waste products remain in 
the intestines and bowels due to constipation, 
which can result in various other disorders. 
Surya namaskara stimulates the peristalsis of 
the intestines helping to remove any tendency 
towards constipation. 
The kidneys are also important eliminative 
organs. They filter impurities from the blood 
and eliminate them from the body in the form 
of urine.","There are absolutely no sex or age limitations with regard to the practice of surya namaskara; both young and old, male and female can do it and gain its many benefits. However, ladies should not do it after their fourth month of pregnancy, but it can be continued after childbirth. Furthermore, ladies are advised not to do it during menstruation as a precautionary measure.",POSITION EIGHT: PARVATASANA (MOUNTAIN POSE)
"The abdominal organs and stomach are alternately stretched and compressed. This imparts a healthy massage to the internal organs and ensures that they function correctly, or if they don't currently work efficiently, encourages them to do so. Many diseases of the digestive system can be prevented and removed by the regular practice of surya namaskara. Rapid elimination of 
waste materials from the body is essential. 
Often undigested waste products remain in 
the intestines and bowels due to constipation, 
which can result in various other disorders. 
Surya namaskara stimulates the peristalsis of 
the intestines helping to remove any tendency 
towards constipation. 
The kidneys are also important eliminative 
organs. They filter impurities from the blood 
and eliminate them from the body in the form 
of urine.","There are absolutely no sex or age limitations with regard to the practice of surya namaskara; both young and old, male and female can do it and gain its many benefits. However, ladies should not do it after their fourth month of pregnancy, but it can be continued after childbirth. Furthermore, ladies are advised not to do it during menstruation as a precautionary measure.",POSITION 9: ASHWA SANCHALANASANA (EQUES TRIAN POSE)
"The abdominal organs and stomach are alternately stretched and compressed. This imparts a healthy massage to the internal organs and ensures that they function correctly, or if they don't currently work efficiently, encourages them to do so. Many diseases of the digestive system can be prevented and removed by the regular practice of surya namaskara. Rapid elimination of 
waste materials from the body is essential. 
Often undigested waste products remain in 
the intestines and bowels due to constipation, 
which can result in various other disorders. 
Surya namaskara stimulates the peristalsis of 
the intestines helping to remove any tendency 
towards constipation. 
The kidneys are also important eliminative 
organs. They filter impurities from the blood 
and eliminate them from the body in the form 
of urine.","There are absolutely no sex or age limitations with regard to the practice of surya namaskara; both young and old, male and female can do it and gain its many benefits. However, ladies should not do it after their fourth month of pregnancy, but it can be continued after childbirth. Furthermore, ladies are advised not to do it during menstruation as a precautionary measure.",POSITION 10: PADAHASTASANA (HAND TO FOOT POSE)
"The abdominal organs and stomach are alternately stretched and compressed. This imparts a healthy massage to the internal organs and ensures that they function correctly, or if they don't currently work efficiently, encourages them to do so. Many diseases of the digestive system can be prevented and removed by the regular practice of surya namaskara. Rapid elimination of 
waste materials from the body is essential. 
Often undigested waste products remain in 
the intestines and bowels due to constipation, 
which can result in various other disorders. 
Surya namaskara stimulates the peristalsis of 
the intestines helping to remove any tendency 
towards constipation. 
The kidneys are also important eliminative 
organs. They filter impurities from the blood 
and eliminate them from the body in the form 
of urine.","There are absolutely no sex or age limitations with regard to the practice of surya namaskara; both young and old, male and female can do it and gain its many benefits. However, ladies should not do it after their fourth month of pregnancy, but it can be continued after childbirth. Furthermore, ladies are advised not to do it during menstruation as a precautionary measure.",POSITION 11: HASTA UTTHANASANA (RAISED ARMS POSE)
"The abdominal organs and stomach are alternately stretched and compressed. This imparts a healthy massage to the internal organs and ensures that they function correctly, or if they don't currently work efficiently, encourages them to do so. Many diseases of the digestive system can be prevented and removed by the regular practice of surya namaskara. Rapid elimination of 
waste materials from the body is essential. 
Often undigested waste products remain in 
the intestines and bowels due to constipation, 
which can result in various other disorders. 
Surya namaskara stimulates the peristalsis of 
the intestines helping to remove any tendency 
towards constipation. 
The kidneys are also important eliminative 
organs. They filter impurities from the blood 
and eliminate them from the body in the form 
of urine.","There are absolutely no sex or age limitations with regard to the practice of surya namaskara; both young and old, male and female can do it and gain its many benefits. However, ladies should not do it after their fourth month of pregnancy, but it can be continued after childbirth. Furthermore, ladies are advised not to do it during menstruation as a precautionary measure.",POSITION 12: PRANAMASANA (PRAYER POSE)
"We have treated this practice in a rather lighthearted and superficial manner, because it is 144 very difficult to be serious and factual about such a maligned subject. However, we emphasize that we are serious when we say that this practice is beneficial. It increases the digestive power of the body by improving the chemical reactions taking place within the stomach. It removes impure and unwanted gases and helps to eliminate and prevent hyperacidity and especially heartburn. When one considers that a large number of ailments arise from digestive disorders, the necessity for a healthy digestive system becomes obvious. Vatsara dhauti is one method of attaining this end.",,VATSARA DHAUTI
"The primary purpose of pranayama is to induce mental tranquillity as a means to meditation. Nadi shodhana is no exception. First of all it progressively reduces the rate and increases tbe depth of respiration. Secondly, by balancing the flows through the two nostrils it helps to bring the pranic body into balance. Both of these aspects induce calmness of mind. The slower one breathes and the more one is aware of the process, the greater the degree of tranquillity attained. This is the reason why in nadi shodhana stage 2 we emphasize the importance of progressively slowing down the breathing rate.",,NADI SHODHANA- STAGE 2 (ADVANCED)
"It brings about relaxation of the mind and body, increases mental concentration and awareness and is a method of inducing states of meditation.",,Anuloma Viloma and Prana Shuddhi
"By totally absorbing the self in the work at hand we tend to reduce the power of the ego. This is the essence of karma yoga, and results in less emotional and mental upsets in life. It helps to make the mind more calm and peaceful under any circumstances and more receptive to the practices of yoga.",,Karma yoga
"Agnisar kriya massages all the abdominal organs, strengthens the muscles and stimulates the associated nerves, encouraging the best possible functionin g of these organs. It promotes the correct secretion of digestive juices and thereby allows optimum assimilation of nutrients from the food tha t we eat. Furthermore, it prevents and removes various digestive maladies such as constipation, indigestion, hyperacidity, hypoacidity, flatulence and sluggishness of the liver, etc. If a person has strong and efficient internal organs, he is far more able to avoid disease. Moreover, even if he mistreats his body the organs are easily able to cope with the situation and bring the body back into balance. Agnisar kriya strengthens the organs that lie in the lower part of the trunk. In this way it helps the individual to withstand the onslaught of disease a n d the genera l unhealthy conditions of everyday life. This is an important practice and we recommend everyone to try it on a regular basis.",,Agnisar Kriya Technique 1
"Agnisar kriya massages all the abdominal organs, strengthens the muscles and stimulates the associated nerves, encouraging the best possible functionin g of these organs. It promotes the correct secretion of digestive juices and thereby allows optimum assimilation of nutrients from the food tha t we eat. Furthermore, it prevents and removes various digestive maladies such as constipation, indigestion, hyperacidity, hypoacidity, flatulence and sluggishness of the liver, etc. If a person has strong and efficient internal organs, he is far more able to avoid disease. Moreover, even if he mistreats his body the organs are easily able to cope with the situation and bring the body back into balance. Agnisar kriya strengthens the organs that lie in the lower part of the trunk. In this way it helps the individual to withstand the onslaught of disease a n d the genera l unhealthy conditions of everyday life. This is an important practice and we recommend everyone to try it on a regular basis.",,Agnisar Kriya Technique 2
"Agnisar kriya massages all the abdominal organs, strengthens the muscles and stimulates the associated nerves, encouraging the best possible functionin g of these organs. It promotes the correct secretion of digestive juices and thereby allows optimum assimilation of nutrients from the food tha t we eat. Furthermore, it prevents and removes various digestive maladies such as constipation, indigestion, hyperacidity, hypoacidity, flatulence and sluggishness of the liver, etc. If a person has strong and efficient internal organs, he is far more able to avoid disease. Moreover, even if he mistreats his body the organs are easily able to cope with the situation and bring the body back into balance. Agnisar kriya strengthens the organs that lie in the lower part of the trunk. In this way it helps the individual to withstand the onslaught of disease a n d the genera l unhealthy conditions of everyday life. This is an important practice and we recommend everyone to try it on a regular basis.",,Agnisar Kriya Technique 3
"This asana applies a wonderful stretch to the whole chest and abdomen, at the same time imparting a thorough massage to the internal organs. As a result, it is useful for alleviating various abdominal ailments associated with the kidneys, pancreas, intestines, liver, etc. Shallow breathing is often caused by inflexibility of the ribcage. Ushtrasana expands the ribcage and the associated muscles are made more supple. As a result deeper breathing is facilitated. The spine is given a wonderful backward bend, loosening up the vertebrae and stimulating the spinal nerves. The shoulders are pulled backwards while the chest is pushed forwards, helping to correct rounded shoulders and a stooping back. The front of the neck is fully stretched, applying a good massage to the nerves and organs in this region. In particular, the all important thyroid gland is regulated. Those people who suffer from backache, neckache or general stiffness in the spine will gain relief through regular practice of this asana.",Persons with severe back ailments such as lumbago should not attempt this asana without expert guidance. Those who suffer from an enlarged thyroid should also take care.,USHTRASANA (CAMEL POSE)
"Utthanpadasana is an excellent asana for strengthening the abdominal muscles, massaging the internal organs, removing wind and eliminating constipation. In this respect .it is particularly powerful when supplemented by pawanmuktasana 1 . While utthanpadasana stretches the abdomen, pawanmuktasana compresses it. If you suffer from flatulence or constipation you should definitely practise these asanas one after the other. In this 166 context they can be practised at almost any time of the day (apart from after meals), but the best time is early in the morning before going to the toilet.",,UTTHANPADASANA (RAISED LEGS POSE
Prevents Strain on body parts during actual aasans,,GOOLF GHOORNAN (ANKLE CRANK)
Prevents Strain on body parts during actual aasans,,ARDHA TITALI ASANA (HALF BUTTERFLY)
Prevents Strain on body parts during actual aasans,,(HIP ROTATION)
Prevents Strain on body parts during actual aasans,,UTTHANASANA (SQUAT AND RISE POSE)
Prevents Strain on body parts during actual aasans,,KAWA CHALASANA (CROW WALKING)
Prevents Strain on body parts during actual aasans,,CHAKKI CHAIANASANA (CHURNING THE MILL)
Prevents Strain on body parts during actual aasans,,GATYATMAK MERU VAKRASANA (DYNAMIC SPINAL TWIST)
Prevents Strain on body parts during actual aasans,,GREEVA SANCHAIANA (NECK MOVEMENTS)
"The purpose of this practice is to make the practitioner aware of the three different types of respiration, and incorporate them into yogic breathing.",,ABDOMINAL BREATHING
"The purpose of this practice is to make the practitioner aware of the three different types of respiration, and incorporate them into yogic breathing.",,2. MIDDLE BREATHING
"The purpose of this practice is to make the practitioner aware of the three different types of respiration, and incorporate them into yogic breathing.",,3. UPPER BREATHING
"The purpose of this practice is to make the practitioner aware of the three different types of respiration, and incorporate them into yogic breathing.",,4. YOGIC BREATHING
"Utthanpadasana is an excellent asana for 
strengthening the abdominal muscles, massaging the internal organs, removing wind and 
eliminating constipation. In this respect .it is 
particularly powerful when supplemented by 
pawanmuktasana 1
. While utthanpadasana 
stretches the abdomen, pawanmuktasana 
compresses it. If you suffer from flatulence or 
constipation you should definitely practise 
these asanas one after the other. In this 
166 
context they can be practised at almost any 
time of the day (apart from after meals), but 
the best time is early in the morning before 
going to the toilet.",,"UTTHANPADASANA 
(RAISED LEGS POSE)"
"Vyaghrasana flexes and loosens the entire 
spine by bending it alternately in both directions - backwards and forwards. It thereby 
tones the associated spinal nerves. 
As we have already indicated, it also massages 
the lower organs of the body concerned with 
digestion, elimination and reproduction. It 
loosens up the legs and generally prepares 
the body for normal functioning, especially 
after sleep. 
Women who suffer from sexual ailments 
like leucorrhoea should do this asana on a 
regular basis. It is very helpful, especially when 
supplemented by other asanas, in rectifying 
this type of problem. Women who have just 
completed childbirth should also do this asana 
to bring about normality and firmness in the 
relevant areas. Sufferers of sciatica have 
obtained some relief from the asana, but one 
should be careful.",,VYAGHRASANA (TIGER POSE)
,,(FULL BUTTERFLY POSE)
,,"KASHTHA TAKSHANASANA 
(CHOPPING WOOD)"
,,"VAYU NISHKASANA 
(WIND RELEASING POSE)"
"Padmasana induces mental calmness, which is 
the essential prerequisite for pranayama and 
meditative practices. This tranquillity also helps 
to bring about physical health and mental 
equilibrium on a permanent basis. The steadiness of the body induces steadiness of the 
mind. The position and pressure of the feet 
against the thighs reduces the flow of blood to 
the legs. This blood supply is redirected 
towards the abdominal and pelvic organs, 
thereby toning up the organs, muscles and 
nerves in this region.",People suffering from sciatica or sacral infections should not attempt this asana.,PADMASANA (LOTUS POSE)
"Siddhasana gives essentially the same benefits 
as padmasana . It differs, however, from 
padmasana in that one of the heels applies 
pressure in the region of the perineum. This 
pressure is necessary in various yogic practices 
such as moola bandha and vajroli mudra. These 
are used a great deal in kriya yoga techniques 
together with siddhasana. This pressure is 
important, for it is concerned with awakening 
a psychic centre in this area called the mooladhara chakra. This will be discussed in the 
future
.","Siddhasana should not be practised by people 
with sciatica or sacral ailments.","SIDDHASANA 
(MALE ACCOMPLISHED POSE)"
"Siddha yoni asana is an excellent pose and the 
equal of padmasana. It is utilized with many 
other practices which aim at awakening mooladhara chakra. 
This asana is necessary for women because 
the position of the mooladhara chakra is 
slightly different to that of men. 
It has a direct influence on the nerve 
plexuses of the female reproductive system. It 
helps one to gain control over the neuropsychic 
impulses which are concerned with the mooladhara chakra and the associated physical 
sexual organs.",,"SIDDHA YONI ASANA 
(ACCOMPLISHED POSE FOR WOMEN)"
"Swastikasana looks very much like siddhasana 
and siddha yoni asana and gives basically the 
same benefits. However, it is not such a good 
asana because it does not press the area of the 
mooladhara chakra. As this is important, 
swastikasana is not generally used in kriya 
yoga. However, it is an excellent asana for 
general meditational practices and pranayama, 
and should be used by those people who 
cannot sit comfortably in the better but more 
difficult meditative asanas.",,SWASTIKASANA (AUSPICIOUS POSE)
"This is a comfortable sitting position for those 
people who cannot sit in the more difficult 
meditative asanas. Like all meditative asanas, 
it is conducive to physical an d menta l 
equilibrium.",,VEERASANA (HERO'S POSE)
"Shalabhasana stimulates the whole autonomic 
nervous system, particularly the parasympathetic outflow. Remember the parasympathetic 
system and the sympathetic system are 
opposing systems of the autonomic nervous 
system. They maintain equilibrium of the 
different organs of the body. In general, the 
sympathetic system directs the body energy 
externally. That is, the muscles are prepared 
for external activity, the heartbeat and respiration rate are increased, the digestive system 
functions at a lower level, eyesight and hearing 
improves - the emphasis is on extroversion. 
In particular, it prepares the body to face 
emergencies or danger. The parasympathetic 
system acts in reverse; it allows the internal 
organs to carry out their functions, reducing 
the energy that is directed for external actions. 
One becomes more introverted. 
It is essential that the autonomic nervous 
system is kept in efficient order. Shalabhasana 
does this by stretching the nerves and improving the blood circulation, allowing new 
oxygenated blood to circulate. The parasympathetic nerves are particularly prominent in the 
region of the neck and pelvis. Shalabhasana 
profoundly affects both of these areas simultaneously","This asana, compared to most other asanas, 
requires a greater degree of physical effort. 
As such, people who suffer from coronary 
thrombosis or high blood pressure must take 
care. They should preferably practise ardha 
shalabhasana as a substitute. Furthermore, if 
you suffer from hernia, peptic ulcer, intestinal 
tuberculosis and other similar ailments we 
advise you not to do this asana.",SHALABHASANA (LOCUST POSE)
,,"ARDHA SHALABHASANA 
(HALF LOCUST POSE)"
"This asana acts predominantly on the abdomen 
and the spine, by applying a powerful torsion 
to the trunk of the body. When the trunk is 
twisted the muscles and nerves of the back and 
spine are contracted on one side, while the 
muscles and nerves on the other side are 
simultaneously stretched. When the trunk is 
twisted in the opposite direction then the 
process is the same but reversed. Th e overall 
result is an excellent alternate compression 
and extension of these nerves and muscles 
bringing them into the best possible condition. 
As with many other asanas, sluggish and 
stagnant blood is squeezed out of the spinal 
regions and encouraged to recirculate to the 
heart and lungs for purification, which also 
contributes much to bringin g the spinal 
muscles and nerves into optimum health. 
This torsion of the spine is useful for 
reducing the tendency of adjoining vertebrae 
to fuse together, this being most prevalent 
with elderly people. 
Ardha matsyendrasana has been foun d 
beneficial in the treatmen t of backache, 
neckache and headache as well as general body 
stiffness. It helps to remove any tendency 
towards round shoulders and has been found 
useful by many people who have mild cases of 
sciatica and slipped disc. Remember also that 
the health of the body depends greatly on the 
condition of the spinal nerves, for these are 
the communication lines between the brain 
and body. 
T h e organs in the abdome n ar e also 
alternately compressed and stretched, the 
compression being partly applied by the 
pressure of the thigh against the abdomen. 
This gives the organ s a good massage , 
recirculates impure blood, and tones up the 
associated nerves. It has been found useful 
for helping to treat all manne r of ailments, 
including diabetes, indigestion, rheumatism 
and constipation. In the case of constipation, 
it is important that the body is first of all 
twisted to the right, because faecal matter 
travels up the ascending colon along the 
transverse colon, and then downwards in the 
descending colon before being expelled from 
the body. Therefor e an initial twist to the right 
followed by a left hand twist compresses the 
colon and activates the nerves associated with 
intestinal peristalsis in the same order as the 
progressive movement of faecal matter.","People who suffer from peptic ulcers, hernia 
or hyperthyroidism should not do ardha 
matsyendrasana unless under expert guidance. 
Women should not practise after two or three 
months of pregnancy. People who suffer from 
sciatica or slipped disc may gain much benefit 
from this asana (many people have already 
done so in our experience), but you should be 
careful, especially if your case is severe","ARDHA MATSYENDRASANA 
(HALF SPINAL TWIST)"
,,"BHOOCHARI MUDRA 
(NOTHINGNESS GAZING)"
"This asana develops a sense of balance. The 
whole body is stretched, which loosens up the 
entire spinal column from top to bottom. 
Furthermore, the abdominal organs and 
muscles are toned up.",,TADASANA (PALM TREE POSE)
,,"TIRYAKA TADASANA 
(SWAYING PALM TREE POSE)"
"This asana tones up the waist, back and hip 
joints. It is particularly useful for removing 
spinal stiffness. Though it is a simple asana, 
the mere relaxation and swinging movement 
of the uppe r part of the body induces a 
wonderful feeling of lightness. In fact, we feel 
this asana can be used to remove physical and 
mental tension when you have little time to 
spare. Also, if you have been sitting or standing 
in one position for a long period of time, you 
will more than likely feel very stiff. This is an 
excellent asana for quickly and effectively 
removing this stiffness.",,"KATI CHAKRASANA 
(WAIST ROTATING POSE)"
"For full details of the benefits obtainable from 
this asana refer to the description of bhujangasana","Those people who suffer from peptic or 
duodenal ulcers, or hernia, should not do this 
asana.","TIRYAKA B H UJ AN GAS AN A 
(TWISTING COBRA POSE)"
"Benefits 
This is a very useful asana for people with 
abdominal ailments, because it alternately 
compresses and stretches the digestive organs, 
nerves and muscles. 
If you suffer from constipation, we recommend that you practise this regularly, as it 
helps to encourage the normal functioning of 
the large intestine and the anal sphincter.",,"UDARAKARSHANASANA 
(ABDOMINAL STRETCH POSE)"
"This asana gives the same basic benefits as 
trikonasana, though it has a specific influence 
on the spinal nerves and muscles of the lower 
back. It is an excellent preparatory asana for 
the more difficult forward bending asanas, 
such as paschimottanasana 1
and janu sirshasana2
which require a reasonably high degree 
of flexibility in the region of the lower back",,DOLASANA (PENDULUM POSE)
"This asana gives a wonderful stretch to the 
chest, thereby loosening up the associated 
muscles and nerves. 
It also helps to tone up the nerves and 
muscles of the spine in the region of the neck, 
helping to increase the circulation in this area. 
It loosens up the shoulder joints and is a good 
asana for removing stiffness in the uppe r back 
and neck",,DWIKONASANA (DOUBLE ANGLE POSE)
"All the movements have a wonderful influence 
in the region of the waist. The entire nervous 
system is toned up, especially the spinal nerves. 
It loosens up the muscles and joints of the 
whole body; in fact, we can say it is a compound 
asana that systematically revitalizes the entire 
body",,TRIKONASANA (TRIANGLE POSE)
"The asana stretches and tones the spinal and 
hamstring muscles and the associated nerves. 
Because it improves the efficiency of the spinal 
nerves in particular, it has beneficial repercussions throughout the entire body. It loosens 
the hip joints. It helps to remove excess fat in 
the abdominal region. The asana tones all the 
abdominal organs, including the liver, pancreas, spleen, kidneys and adrenal glands. As 
such it helps to remove diabetes, flatulence, 
constipation, etc. It has been found useful for 
alleviating various types of sexual maladies, 
for the asana gives a direct massage of the 
pelvic region. 
This is an asana that is traditionally well 
known for its utility in harmonizing nervous 
and pranic energies within the body. As such it 
is very useful for helping to bring about states 
of meditation.","People who suffer from slipped disc or sciatica 
are advised not to practise paschimottanasana. 
Allow at least three hours to elapse after food 
before doing this asana.","PASCHIMOTTANASANA 
(BACK STRETCHING POSE)"
,,"PADA PRASAR PASCHIMOTTANASANA 
(LEGS SPREAD BACK STRETCH POSE)"
,,"GATYATMAK PASCHIMOTTANASANA 
(DYNAMIC BACK STRETCH POSE)"
"Yoga mudrasana may be a little difficult at 
first, but the benefits it will give are well worth 
the effort. It is particularly useful for massaging 
the abdominal organs and helping to remove 
various associated ailments from constipation 
to diabetes. The upturned heels apply good 
pressure, which is transmitted to the inner 
organs. Variation 3 is especially powerful for 
the massage is accentuated by means of the 
fists. 
The asana reduces the blood flow to the 
legs and diverts it to the abdominal and pelvic 
region, which further helps to improve the 
functioning of these organs and can help to 
alleviate various types of sexual disorders. 
During the practice, the individual vertebrae 
are separated from each other. This helps to 
release pressure on the spinal nerves as well as 
giving them a profound stretch and massage. 
These nerves connect the entire body to the 
brain and their improved health and functioning will have beneficial repercussions 
throughout the body. 
The legs are not stretched as with other 
forward bending asanas, yet the articulations 
of the joints are loosened. With regular practise 
these joints will become permanently loosened 
and one will be able to sit in padmasana for 
many hours. 
Yoga mudrasana, as we have pointed out 
already, is most useful for relaxing the whole 
mind and body. As such it is an excellent 
prelude to meditative practices, especially if 
there is no initial program of asanas. That is, 
there are times when there is no time or it is 
unsuitable to do a number of asanas before 
commencing meditative practices. Under these 
circumstances yoga mudrasana should be 
practised as a prelude","If you suffer from sciatica, high blood pressure, 
hernia or any other serious abdominal ailment, 
you should not attempt to do yoga mudrasana, 
unless you have sought expert advice.","YOGA MUDRASANA 
(PSYCHIC UNION POSE)"
"it produces a good chest expansion 
and thereby encourages chest development. 
The internal massage of the abdominal organs 
is particularly profound because of the position 
of the heels; this is notably enhanced if one 
breathes deeply in the final pose. Baddha 
padmasana is particularly useful for alleviating 
back and neck ache. It is excellent as a 
preliminary for meditative practices.",,"BADDHA PADMASANA 
(LOCKED LOTUS POSE)"
"Jalandhar a bandha influences the individual 
at all levels: physical, psychic and mental. It 
controls the flow of prana in the body. This 
induces mental relaxation and can help to 
induce meditation. Th e pressurization of the 
carotid sinuses also helps to bring mental 
balance by slowing down the heart. Furthermore, this encourages introversion - one tends 
to become oblivious to the outside world. Th e 
whole nervous system and brain become sedated. One tends to become more one-pointed. 
All this is a great help in meditational practices. 
Jalandhar a bandha allows one to hold the 
breath for longer periods of time. Normally 
decrease of oxygen and increase of carbon 
dioxide in the system lead to an increase of the 
heart rate and harder breathing to compensate. 
This is initiated through the carotid sinuses. 
T h e artificial pressure of these sinuses during 
jalandhar a bandha prevents this tendency. 
Therefore, one is able to hold the breath for 
much longer periods. This also helps to induce 
one-pointedness of mind for meditational 
practices.","People who suffer from high blood pressure 
or heart ailments should not do jalandhara 
bandha. Though it initially reduces blood 
pressure, the release of the bandha brings 
some fluttering of the heart","JALANDHARA BANDHA 
(THROAT LOCK)"
"Dhanurasana roughly duplicates the benefits 
of bhujangasana and shalabhasana. However, 
there are notable differences. In shalabhasana, 
the back muscles are tensed, while in dhanurasana they are passive. In bhujangasana, the 
back muscles should also be relaxed, but the 
main influence is on the small of the back in 
the region of the sacrum. In dhanurasana, the 
main influence is the intense intra-abdominal 
pressure. Each of these asanas has its place in 
an asana program. They complement each 
other. It is for this reason that they should be 
done one after the other. 
Dhanurasana is very useful for overcoming 
lethargy and sluggishness in mind and body. 
It has a direct effect on the solar plexus at the 
navel, which is a large sympathetic nervous 
centre so important for healthy functioning of 
the organs of the body. 
These nerves are brought into maximum 
efficiency, which in turn leads to improved 
functioning of the whole body, especially the 
digestive, eliminative and reproductive organs. 
It decongests the entire abdominal region 
and its organs. The liver, the multi-duty organ 
of digestion is massaged, which leads to an 
overall improved digestion. The pancreas is 
toned up so that it secretes the correct amount 
of glucagon and insulin at the right time. The 
entire alimentary canal is reconditioned, as 
well as accessory glands. Blood is encouraged 
to flush through the whole system and this 
acts as a cleaning process. The kidneys are 
rendered more efficient, which leads to better 
fluid balance within the body. It helps to 
alleviate constipation, dyspepsia, sluggishness 
of the liver, diabetes and excess fat","People who suffer from a weak heart, high 
blood pressure, hernia, peptic or duodenal 
ulcers, appendicitis, colitis and other abdominal ailments, should not do this asana.",DHANURASANA (BOW POSE)
"The direct influence on the thyroid gland 
helps to remove many diseases and generally 
maintain good health of the entire body. The 
ageing process is very much associated with 
the endocrinal system. One can help to 
maintain youthfulness and rejuvenate an 
ageing body by regular practice of sarvangasana. 
The thyroid gland controls the metabolism 
of the body. Therefore, by improving the 
efficiency of the thyroid gland through 
sarvangasana one can maintain the correct 
body weight. Of course, this assumes that one 
does not consume excessive amounts of food. 
Many peopl e are overweight because of 
hormonal imbalance, not specifically because 
of overeating. Sarvangasana helps to normalize the body weight by balancing the 
endocrinal system. 
The endocrinal system is in a continual state 
of fluctuation because of adaptation to both 
the inner and outer environment. If the endocrinal system is malfunctioning, then the body 
is unable to adjust to these continual changes 
and illness can result. Sarvangasana acts on 
the thyroid gland, the pituitary and the brain. 
All these are mutually interdependent organs. 
By simultaneously balancing them Sarvangasana helps to balance the entire endocrinal 
system as well as all the systems that are 
dependent on the hormonal system, such as 
the circulatory, respiratory, digestive and 
reproductive systems. The body is a total unit 
and though it is composed of different systems, 
they are all mutually dependent on eacb other. 
They do not act separately. They are only 
discussed as distinct systems in books for easy 
understanding. If one system is out of balance 
then the other systems will also become 
unbalanced. Sarvangasana integrates all the 
body systems, improving health and removing 
disease. 
Sarvangasana improves the blood supply to 
the brain","One should not practise sarvangasana under 
the following conditions: 
• If you feel physically tired. 
• During periods of illness and fever, such as 
during coughs and colds, influenza, etc. 
• Until at least three hours have elapsed after 
food. 
• During menstruation and advanced stages 
of pregnancy. 
Sarvangasana should be immediately terminated if you experience the following: 
• Excessive perspiration. 
• Dizziness. 
• Palpitations of the heart. 
• General discomfort.",Sarvangasana
"Halasana gives many of the same benefits as 
sarvangasana. However, the direct influence 
on the brain is much less, with more emphasis 
on the back, abdomen and pelvis. It combines 
the benefits of inverted asanas with forward 
bending asanas. Halasana is almost an upside 
down form of paschimottanasana, though 
there is a distinctive difference between the 
benefits that they give. Paschimottanasana acts 
mainly on the lower back and stretches the 
back; halasana, on the other hand, acts mainly 
on the upper back and neck region. These two 
asanas supplement each other. 
Halasana makes the entire spine supple, 
stretches the muscles, loosens the vertebrae 
and tones the nerves both inside and outside 
the spinal column. This leads to better efficiency of all the organs in the body. 
The thyroid and parathyroid glands are 
rendered mor e efficient. Th e abdominal 
muscles are strengthened. The abdominal 
organs are massaged. This helps to alleviate 
constipation, dyspepsia, diabetes and various 
other abdominal ailments. It generally decongests and revitalizes the liver, spleen, kidneys, 
pancreas, adrenal glands and so on. It helps to 
remove backache, neck ache and headache. 
Besides these physical benefits, halasana 
done with attention can induce states of 
pratyahara (sense withdrawal) as a preparation 
for meditational techniques",,HALASANA (PLOUGH POSE)
"Hanumanasana is the ultimate test of leg 
flexibility at the hips. Very few can do the final 
pose, but for those who can it has been found 
to be very beneficial in cases of sexual ailments 
and for preparing the organs of childbirth for 
trouble-free delivers'",,HANUMANASANA (HANUMAN'S POSE)
,,"POORNA MATSYENDRASANA 
(FULL SPINAL TVVIST POSE)"
"Dwi pada kandharasana is an advanced forward bending asana. It revitalizes the nerves 
of the whole body. It has a profound effect on 
all the abdominal organs, especially the kidneys, liver, spleen, intestines and pancreas. 
The pelvic organs are also massaged which 
brings about efficiency of the sexual and 
eliminative systems as well as removal of any 
associated ailments. The solar plexus and the 
adrenal glands are profoundly massaged; this 
helps to replace lethargy with abundant vitality. 
Dwi pada kandharasana brings many benefits to those who are able to do it.",,"DWI PADA KANDHARASANA 
(TWO-LEGGED SHOULDER POSE)"
,,"URDHVA PADMASANA 
(HEADSTAND LOTUS POSE)"
,,"NIRALAMBA SIRSHASANA 
(UNSUPPORTED HEADSTAND POSE)"
,,"SALAMBA SIRSHASANA 
(SUPPORTED HEADSTAND POSE)"
"These three asanas help to bring nervous 
equilibrium. They develop the sense of balance 
and develop coordination between different 
parts of the body. They all develop the power 
of mental concentration, which is needed to 
perform them.",,PADA ANGUSHTHASANA (TIPTOE POSE)
,,SANTOLANASANA (BALANCING POSE)
,,"EKA PADA PRANAMASANA 
(ONE-LEGGED PRAYER POSE)"
"Vatayanasana strengthens the leg muscles and 
improves the blood circulation. It tones up the 
sexual organs and generally stimulates the 
whole body.",,VATAYANASANA (FLYING HORSE POSE)
"Ardha baddha padmottanasana strengthens 
the leg muscles, improves blood circulation, 
stimulates the digestive processes and develops 
a good sense of balance.","This asana should not be done by people who 
suffer from: 
• slipped disc 
• sciatica 
• hernia 
• weak legs","ARDHA BADDHA PADMOTTANASANA 
(HALF LOTUS FORWARD BENDING POSE)"
"Eka pada sirasana compresses each side of the 
abdomen in turn. This gives the internal organs 
a thorough massage and is very useful for 
removing constipation and stimulating peristalsis. For fullest benefits you should raise the 
right leg first so that the massage is applied in 
the same order as the movement of faeces. 
Practice of this asana applies a powerful 
massage to the sexual organs, helping to 
improve their efficiency an d remov e 
malfunctions. 
When done regularly, eka pada sirasana has 
been found useful in improving the blood circulation in the legs and relieving varicose 
veins.",,"ERA PADA SIRASANA 
(ONE FOOT TO HEAD POSE)"
"This asana gives the general benefits of other 
forward bending asanas. It loosens up the 
vertebrae of the spine and tones the spinal 
nerves. It massages and improves the functional efficiency of the abdominal organs. It is 
specifically recommended for relieving constipation and backache, and for inducing mental 
relaxation","People who suffer from the following ailments 
should not attempt to do koormasana: 
• slipped disc 
• sciatica 
• hernia 
You must use your discretion; only practise 
the asana if you are certain that your spine is 
sufficiently flexible",KOORMASANA (TORTOISE POSE)
"Loosens up the legs, strengthens the arms 
and develops the sense of balance.",,KUKKUTASANA (COCKEREL POSE)
"If you can do this asana you will find it very 
useful in calming the mind and soothing away 
anger and tension. It develops the sense of 
balance",,"GARBHA PINDASANA 
(FOETUS IN THE WOMB POSE)"
"Develops sense of balance and helps to reduce 
nervous tension.",,"PADMA PARVATASANA 
(LOTUS MOUNTAIN POSE)"
"Strengthens the abdominal and arm muscles. 
It is an excellent preparatory practice for tadan 
kriya
.",,LOLASANA (SWINGING POSE)
"This asana further loosens up the legs, so that 
you will be able to sit in padmasana for longer 
periods of time. It helps to correct postural 
defects in the spine. With practice it can even 
be used as a relaxation asana.",,"GUPTA PADMASANA 
(HIDDEN LOTUS POSE)"
,,"TADAN KRIYA 
(BEATING THE KUNDALINI)"
,,"MANDUKI MUDRA 
(FROG ATTITUDE)"
"Baka dhyanasana develops the sense of balance 
and induces mental steadiness. It strengthens 
the arm muscles",,"BAKA DHYAN ASANA 
(PATIENT CRANE POSE)"
"This is an excellent asana for loosening up the 
leg joints and strengthening the arms. It also 
helps to remove back and neck ache. It has 
been found useful in treating hydrocele.",,"DHANURAKARSHANASANA 
(ARCHER'S POSE)"
"Gomukhasana is an excellent asana for inducing relaxation. If you feel tired, tense or 
worried then we strongly suggest that you 
practise gomukhasana for at least ten minutes. 
It helps to greatly ease away tension. For this 
reason, it has been found very useful for 
helping to relieve ailments such as diabetes, 
high blood pressure and sexual malfunctions. 
Gomukhasana directly helps to remove 
stiffness in the spine, neck and shoulders. It 
also develops the chest and improves 
breathing",,GOMUKHASANA (COW'S FACE POSE)
"It withdraws one's awareness from the outside 
world (pratyahara) so that all external sounds, 
feelings, smells, etc. are cut off. Simultaneously, 
it renders the mind free of thoughts. This 
leads to meditation and bliss.","People who suffer from high blood pressure, 
vertigo or brain haemorrhage should not do 
moorchha pranayama",Moorchha Pranayama
"They strengthen the whole spinal column and 
help to realign displaced vertebrae. They tone 
up the entire nervous system, including the 
sympathetic and parasympathetic. All the 
abdominal organs are squeezed and activated. 
Intestinal peristalsis is stimulated. They develop 
the sense of balance and mental concentration. 
The benefits of niralamba paschimottanasana are almost the same as for paschimottanasana1","These four asanas should not be practised by 
those people who suffer from: 
• high blood pressure 
• heart ailments 
• slipped disc 
• sciatica","NIRALAMBA PASCHIMOTTANASANA 
(UNSUPPORTED BACK 
STRETCHING POSE)"
"They strengthen the whole spinal column and 
help to realign displaced vertebrae. They tone 
up the entire nervous system, including the 
sympathetic and parasympathetic. All the 
abdominal organs are squeezed and activated. 
Intestinal peristalsis is stimulated. They develop 
the sense of balance and mental concentration. 
The benefits of niralamba paschimottanasana are almost the same as for paschimottanasana1","These four asanas should not be practised by 
those people who suffer from: 
• high blood pressure 
• heart ailments 
• slipped disc 
• sciatica","MERUDANDASANA 
(SPINAL COLUMN POSE)"
"They strengthen the whole spinal column and help to realign displaced vertebrae. They tone up the entire nervous system, including the sympathetic and parasympathetic. All the abdominal organs are squeezed and activated. Intestinal peristalsis is stimulated. They develop the sense of balance and mental concentration. The benefits of niralamba paschimottanasana are almost the same as for paschimottanasana1","These four asanas should not be practised by 
those people who suffer from: 
• high blood pressure 
• heart ailments 
• slipped disc 
• sciatica","MUKTA HASTA MERUDANDASANA 
(ROCKING HORSE POSE)"
"Regular practice improves control over the position which further improves patience along with coordination and ultimately calms the mind The prone position makes the body to rest up on the elbow, which lays pressure on the abdominal region his asana require great physical challenge which on holding for some good time enhances breathing","Swan pose lays pressure on the abdomen, so, the practitioners with pregnancy, menstruation, or even in the postnatal period practicing this asana might be unsafe. Therefore, one should avoid such a phase.
Patients with High blood pressure condition should refrain from doing Hamsasana, otherwise, the position could give rise to other Heart-related conditions.
Practitioners who have undergone abdominal, lower back, and waist surgery should avoid performing Hamsasana, as the prone position is supported over core muscles, so it’s not the right choice in the present condition.
Injury concerning the parts involved in Hamsasana like, wrist, palm, elbows, shoulder, feet are strictly not advisable to continue into the practice. This might worsen the previous condition if ignored",HAMSASANA (SWAN POSE)
"Mayurasana is a unique asana in that it 
vigorously stimulates the entire body processes. 
It stimulates the blood circulation and the 
process of metabolism. It thereby helps to 
purify the blood and in turn the whole body. If 
you have a bad complexion and boils then we 
suggest that you try mayurasana","Mayurasana should not be practised if you 
suffer from any of the following ailments: 
• high blood pressure 
• any heart ailments 
• hernia 
• peptic or duodenal ulcers 
Do not attempt to do mayurasana if you are 
even slightly ill or if you feel any physical 
weakness. Pregnant women are strictly advised 
not to practise mayurasana.",MAYURASANA (PEACOCK POSE)
"helping to improve 
digestion and eliminate ailments such as 
constipation. 
A widespread symptom of modern living is 
back, neck and headache. These are generally 
caused by chronic stress and worry, muscular 
tension, displacement of vertebrae and compression of associated nerves and most 
commonly by a bad sitting position for 
extended periods of time. Pada hastasana helps 
to eliminate these causes and prevents pain in 
the spine and head. It is a particularly useful 
asana to do during work when these aches and 
pains easily arise.","People who suffer from the following ailments 
should not do pada hastasana: 
• slipped disc 
• heart problems 
• high blood pressure 
• abdominal hernia 
• severe sciatica","PADA HASTASANA (HAND TO FOOT OR 
FORWARD BENDING POSE)"
"t improves balance and focus.
It is good for those with flat feet. This asana strengthens the ankles and toes.
It regulates the reproductive system","Half Lotus Tip Toe Pose should be avoided by people with knees and ankle injuries. It should be clearly avoided by people who have had recent surgeries in the feet, hips, knees or pelvis Students with trauma and anxiety or people with lack of body breath connections should avoid this pose. Balancing may be challenging for them in such scenarios. The fear of going off balance may damage their mental status, and in the process injure their joints, especially the tailbone, as it takes the body weight and pushes itself against the heels of the balancing foot",PADA ANGUSHTHASANA(Half Lotus Tip Toe)
"This firmly and deeply massages the internal 
organs. Chakrasana also massages the abdominal organs but by stretching the outer 
muscles: deep breathing in the final pose, 
accentuates this process. 
Chakrasana, unlike dhanurasana, is also an 
inverted asana. Therefore, a minute or so in 
the final pose will flush the brain with a freshly 
oxygenated supply of blood. This will help to 
improve the efficiency of the brain cells and in 
turn, the overall health of the entire body. 
Chakrasana gives an accentuated stretch to all 
the nerves of the back, including the sympathetic and parasympathetic nerves. Th e 
profound backward bend realigns any spinal 
discs and vertebra e that may be slightly 
displaced. This action is even greater than that 
given by dhanurasana","Chakrasana should not be practised by people 
who suffer from high blood pressure, heart 
problems, stomach ulcers, dilated eye pupils 
or hernia, or by anyone who has weak arms. 
Also, it should not be attempted by anyone 
who has recently undergone any abdominal 
operation or who has fractured any bones. 
Pregnant women should not do it",CHAKRASANA (WHEEL POSE)
"Bridge Pose improves posture and counteracts the effects of prolonged sitting and computer work. It may help relieve low back pain and can counteract slouching and kyphosis (abnormal curvature of the spine). The pose gently stretches your abdomen, chest, and the area around your shoulders while strengthening your back muscles, buttocks (glutes), thighs, and ankles","Do not try or avoid doing this pose if you are suffering from neck and back injuries.
At first be perfect in basic Asanas, once you perfect then try this Asana. If you are beginner than the master in basic Asanas after that try this Yoga Pose.
Do all the Asanas in under the supervision of yoga instructor",SETU ASANA(BRIDGE POSE)
"This asana is very powerful for awakening Sahasara chakra and therefore it is considered the greatest of all asanas.

Sirshasana increases the blood flow to the brain and pituitary gland, revitalizing the entire body and mind.

This asana reverses the effect of gravity on the spine.","Sirshasana should not be practiced by people with high blood pressure, heart disease, thrombosis, arteriosclerosis, chronic constipation, kidney problems, impure blood, severe near-sightedness, weak eye blood vessels, conjunctivitis, chronic glaucoma, inflammation of the ears or any form of blood haemorrhage in the hand; neither should it be practiced during pregnancy",SIRSHASANA
"Stretches your deep hip flexors and intercostals (muscles between the ribs)
· Relieves tension in your neck, throat, and shoulders
· Stretches and tones the front of your neck and your abdominals
· Stretches and stimulates the organs of your belly and throat
· Strengthens your upper back and the back of your neck
· Relieves stress and irritation
· Improves posture","People who suffer from peptic ulcers, hernia 
or any serious spinal ailment should not do 
matsyasana without expert guidance. Ladies 
in an advanced state of pregnancy should also 
not attempt to do this asana",MATSYASANA
"It calms the brain and eliminates mild depression;
It stretches the spine, liver, spleen, hamstrings, groins, and shoulders;
Stimulates the kidneys and liver;
Reduces pain in the waist and legs;
Helps to get rid of belly fat;
Improves digestion;
Relieves symptoms of menopause;
Effectively strengthens rib bones","If there is any kind of injury around the kneecap, shoulders, neck, back, hips and ribs, then the practice of this yoga pose should be avoided. Slip disc: Slipped disc of the back or the neck can bring additional or severe pain causing discomfort with the practice of Half Bound Lotus Forward Fold",ARDHA PADMA PASCHIMOTTANASANA
"It calms the brain and eliminates mild depression;
It stretches the spine, liver, spleen, hamstrings, groins, and shoulders;
Stimulates the kidneys and liver;
Reduces pain in the waist and legs;
Helps to get rid of belly fat;
Improves digestion;
Relieves symptoms of menopause;
Effectively strengthens rib bones","Avoid this pose if one is suffering from severe low back pain If the knees are injured, then the stretch one gets during the practice of Janu Sirsasana, behind the knee may aggravate the injured knee Not to be practiced by pregnant women as there is pressure at the lower abdomen with the forward bend",JANU SIRSHASANA
"This is a powerful yet simple method of 
revealing the mysteries of your inner being. 
Total absorption on the nada can lead to 
dhyana. One soars into the heights of the 
inner space. Any of the basic benefits that we 
have enumerated for other meditative practices 
can be obtained from nada yoga sadhana.","Generally the awareness should be fixed at 
the back of the head (bindu). However, if you 
hear a distinct sound in any other area, such as 
the right ear or the middle of the head, then 
this is acceptable. Those who are devotionally 
inclined can tiy to listen to the nada in the 
heart region",Nada Yoga
"The benefits are almost the same as for 
jalandhara bandha4
. The entire abdomen is 
squeezed like a sponge. This pushes out all the 
stagnant blood. All the inner organs are 
revitalized. It can help to alleviate or prevent a 
large number of abdominal ailments including 
indigestion, constipation, diabetes, colitis and 
so forth if they are not too serious and chronic The adrenal glands are regularized thereby 
giving energy to a lethargic person and 
relaxation to an anxious or overwrought 
person. The solar plexus is also normalized. 
This centre is sometimes called the abdominal 
brain and it is the centre of energy in the 
whole body. This centre directs the correct 
flow of energy to all the different organs","People who suffer from high blood pressure, 
heart problems, peptic or duodenal ulcers, 
colitis and other serious abdominal problems 
should not do this practice. Pregnant women 
should not do this practice, though they can 
perform it after childbirth to strengthen the 
abdominal muscles and reshape the abdominal 
area in general.",Uddiyana Bandha
"This asana helps to bring about mental and 
physical harmony for the reasons given in the 
introduction. It strengthens the muscles of 
the legs, tones the nerves and loosens the 
joints. It helps to alleviate sciatica and rheumatism in the legs and arms. It also helps to 
relieve hydrocele if it is done regularly and for 
a reasonable duration. It also develops poise 
and grace in the body.","Avoid getting into this pose if you have any knee, elbow, ankle and wrist injury. Not for women in later term pregnancy",GARUDASANA
"This asana is very useful for correcting spinal 
defects. If there is a displaced spinal disc then this asana will help to push the disc into proper 
alignment. It is also useful for removing 
backache and for eliminating round shoulders 
or any tendency to stoop. It tones the nerves 
of the entire back It applies a good massage to the abdominal 
organs and so improves digestion. It also 
applies a strong pressure in the region of the 
pelvis, especially if the legs are utilized to 
accentuate the flexion of the back in the final 
pose. This massages and tones the nerves, 
muscles and organs of the reproductive system. 
This applies mainly to women. It is an excellent 
asana for helping to alleviate sexual malfunctions and to prevent any tendency towards 
miscarriage in childbirth","Women in advanced stages of pregnancy 
should not practise kandharasana. However, 
after childbirth practise of this asana will help 
the abdomen resume its normal shape. 
People with peptic or duodenal ulcers or 
abdominal hernia should also not practise this 
asana.",KANDHARASANA
"• Boosts confidence and helps to reduce 
depression
• Helps in the treatment of cervical spondylosis
• Relieves arthritis of the shoulders, arms, wrists, 
and fingers
• Strengthens the knee joints and reduces 
sciatic pain
• Corrects flat feet","Do not practise this asana 
if you have angina, stressrelated headaches, a migraine, eye 
strain, insomnia, low blood pressure, 
osteoarthritis of the knees, leukorrhoea, 
or bulimia. If you have a slipped disc, keep 
your feet apart. If you have a displaced 
uterus, keep the tips of your big toes 
together and your heels apart",PASCHIMA BADDHA HASTASANA
"• Helps to treat depression and boosts 
self-confidence
• Tones and stimulates the abdomen, 
pelvis, torso, and back
• Relieves arthritis
• Reduces sciatic pain
• Strengthens the knee joints
• Stretches the hamstring muscles
• Corrects flat feet","Do not practise this 
asana if you have stress-related 
headaches, a migraine, eye strain, 
low blood pressure, osteoarthritis 
of the knees, bulimia, diarrhoea, 
insomnia, or leukorrhoea. If you have 
high blood pressure",TADASANA URDHVA HASTASANA
"Relieves stress-related appetite loss
• Helps in the treatment of acidity, ulcers, 
anorexia, bulimia, and alcoholism
• Tones the liver and kidneys
• Relieves lower backache","Do not practise this 
asana if you have an 
attack of diarrhoea, or if you 
are experiencing the 
symptoms of asthma 
or bronchitis","ADHOMUKHA 
PASCHIMOTTANASANA"
"• Regulates blood pressure
• Helps to treat cardiac disorders
• Helps to treat ear and eye ailments, stressrelated headaches, and migraine
• Relieves palpitations, breathlessness, asthma, 
bronchitis, and throat ailments
• Alleviates arthritis and cervical spondylosis
• Relieves indigestion, diarrhoea, and nausea
• Helps to treat kidney disorders
• Prevents varicose veins","Do not practise during 
menstruation, although at 
other times this asana 
alleviates menstrual disorders. 
Make sure that you rest your 
neck and shoulders firmly 
on the floor. If necessary, 
use just one bolster",VIPARITA KARANI
"Helps to prevent arterial blockages or cardiac 
arrest by resting the heart muscles and 
increasing blood circulation to the arteries
• Combats fluctuating blood pressure, 
hypertension, and depression by soothing 
the brain and expanding the chest
• Relieves eye or ear ailments, migraines, 
stress-related headaches, nervous exhaustion, 
and insomnia
• Improves digestion and strengthens the 
abdominal organs 
• Relieves backache, strengthens the spine, 
and relieves neck strain
• Helps to rest tired legs and prevent 
varicose veins","Make sure that your 
lower back touches the 
edge of the bench in the final 
pose. Your buttocks should not 
touch the edge of the bench, but 
should not be too far from it,",SETUBANDHA SARVANGASANA
"Regulates blood pressure
• Prevents hernia as the hips and groin 
become more supple 
• Relieves lower backache
• Relieves varicose veins and sciatica
• Reduces the pain caused by haemorrhoids
• Relieves indigestion and flatulence
• Tones the kidneys and improves poor 
bladder control
• Improves blood circulation in the ovarian 
region, and is particularly beneficial during 
puberty and menopause
• Alleviates menstrual pain and leukorrhoea
• Corrects a prolapsed uterus","If you feel any strain 
while getting into the pose, 
use two bolsters instead of 
one. If you feel strain in the 
region of the groin, place 
a folded towel or blanket 
on both blocks placed 
below the knees.",SUPTA BADDHAKONASANA
"• Helps recovery from a cardiac condition
• Removes stiffness in the lower back, and 
relieves backache, by helping to align the 
pelvic area
Prevents hernias 
Helps to treat osteoarthritis of the hip and 
the knees by stretching the hamstrings and 
calf muscles, and strengthening the knees
Strengthens the hip joint and tones the 
lower spine
Relieves sciatic pain
Helps to relieve menstrual discomfort 
such as cramps, heavy bleeding, or pain 
during menstruation","Do not practise this 
asana if you have asthma, 
bronchitis, migraine, stressrelated headaches, eye strain, 
or diarrhoea. If you have 
high blood pressure, place 
a folded blanket under 
your head and neck",SUPTA PADANGUSTHASANA
"Alleviates stiffness and pain in the 
lower back, neck, and shoulders
Reduces pain in the hip joints, calves, 
heels, and ankles
Makes the hamstrings supple
Helps to treat disorders of the kidneys, 
liver, spleen, and gall bladder Relieves indigestion and flatulence
Tones the muscles of the uterus","Do not practise this 
asana if you have a cardiac 
condition, a migraine, 
headaches, severe eye strain, 
a cold or chest congestion, 
diarrhoea, chronic fatigue 
syndrome, depression, 
and insomnia",BHARADVAJASANA
"Reduces depression
Relieves cervical spondylosis
Increases the flexibility of the upper 
body, arms, elbows, and wrists
Strengthens the knee joints
Reduces sciatic pain
Corrects flat feet","Do not practise this 
asana if you have stress-related 
headaches, a migraine, low blood 
pressure, insomnia, osteoarthritis of 
the knees, bulimia, diarrhoea, or 
leukorrhoea. If you have high blood 
pressure","TADASANA PASCHIMA 
NAMASKARASANA"
"Boosts confidence and helps to treat 
depression
Relieves arthritis Stretches the shoulders, arms, wrists, 
and fingers
Helps to treat spinal disorders
Tones and activates the torso, back, 
abdomen, and pelvis
Strengthens the knee joints
Reduces sciatic pain
Corrects flat feet","Do not practise this 
asana if you have a cardiac 
condition, stress-related 
headaches, a migraine, low blood 
pressure, insomnia, osteoarthritis of the 
knees, bulimia, diarrhoea, or leukorrhoea. 
If you have high blood pressure, do not 
hold the pose for more than 15 seconds. If 
you have had polio, are knock-kneed, or 
have a problem with your balance","TADASANA URDHVA 
BADDHANGULIYASANA"
"Reduces stress, anxiety, improves focus,strengthen back muscles ,improves body posture, neck pain","Students with arthritis in the knees, hips, and feet, especially senior citizens, should avoid sitting on the floor. Those with a slipped disc, spinal issues, weak digestion, minor backache, or knee pain can take support of the pillow but shouldn't stay for more than 5 mins in the pose.",Sukhanasana
"Helps in increasing concentration,reduce depression. coordinates nervous tension, helpful for pregnant women (contraindications applied),","1) If someone finds the workout not appropriate or enough to feel the need for Savasana, then the whole purpose of this yoga pose is defeated.
2) A very distracted mind is going to find it difficult to relax and by pushing the body, it will only backfire and cause more irritation and bring a headache.
3) If the body hurts too much, then taking the mind away from the body in order to relax is going to be challenging.
4) Someone with severe acidity may find lying on the back very uncomfortable as the food pipe may cause irritation.
",Shavasana
"Helps in reducing nervous tension, increases the flexibility of the lower body, the reproductive system is also stimulated,good for women with infertility issues, or menstrual related symptoms.","1) Those suffering from ulcers, severe artritis and low blod pressure should not do Naukasana.
2)Women should avoid this asana during pregnancy and during periods.",Naukasana
"relieves neck pain,Strengthens back muscles,Helpful is stimulating reproductive organs,Improve the function of the pancreas.","Do not practice this asana if
experiencing: cardiac problems,
lumbar disc problems, sciatica,
symptoms of whiplash, visceral
complications, hernias, colitis, ulcers,
menstruation, or during pregnancy.",Dhanurasana
"Opens and stretches the chest cavity 
• Stretches the anterior spinal ligaments and abdominal contents 
• Aligns upper body posture, especially rounded shoulders 
• Strengthens the upper body 
• Enhances breath capacity 
• Increases the flexibility of the entire spine","Do not practice this asana if experiencing: lumbar disc problems, sciatica, visceral or lung complications, high blood pressure, retinal disorders, or after 3 months of pregnancy",Bhujangasana
"stretches the spine and the muscles around it,
Practice of this pose tones the muscles of the back and thus brings stability to the spine,tones the internal organs like the digestive system, intestines, uterus and kidney","1) Those suffering from any injury of the hips, shoulders and neck should not do this asana.
2) Vakrasana should not be attempted by those who have undergone any recent surgery of the thorax, abdomen or the hips.",Vakrasana
• Stretches the hamstring and spinal muscles • Improves posture • Develops the muscles of the hip region • Massages and tones the abdominal contents • Improves blood flow to the brain • Enhances circulation • Improves body balance and strength,"Do not practice this asana if experiencing: high blood pressure, spinal complications, sciatica, heart disease, hip pathologies, abdominal hernias, or symptoms of whiplash,To be avoided when suffering from Carpal Tunnel Syndrome,Avoid if suffering from spondylitis. Pregnant women should avoid.",Bakasana
"Improves the function of the Thyroid, Parathyroid, Pituitary Glands, Endocrine Glands, Abdominal Organs including spleen, pancreas, liver and kidneys. The Reproductive organs are stimulated.
","Do not practice this asana if experiencing:
Those suffering from back problems or slipped disc,
Weak or injured cervical muscles,Weak legs, weak hamstring muscles or calf muscles,Pregnant women or women during their menstruation time should avoid Halasana, Those with enlarged thyroid, spleen and liver should avoid this yoga poses as a lot of pressure is put at the lower abdomen during this pose,Weak blood vessels in the eyes
Those with severe headaches such as migraines, High blood pressure, Sciatica problems should also avoid",Halasana
• Stretches the entire spine • Improves circulation of blood in the lower extremity • Massages abdominal organs • Stimulates the glandular systems,"Do not practice this asana if
experiencing: low back injuries, sciatica,
spinal pathologies, neck trauma,
symptoms of whiplash, spinal
osteoporosis, cardio vascular disease,
or in the advanced stages of pregnancy.",Sarvangasana
"1) Increases blood flow to the brain
releasing toxins
2) Reverses the effects of gravity on
the body
3) Revitalizes the visceral organs
4) Encourages deeper respiration
5) Relaxes the body and mind
","Do not practice this asana if
experiencing: high blood pressure,
heart disease, vascular disease,
retinal disorders, ear infections,
neck complications, headaches,
symptoms of whiplash, spinal
osteoporosis, menstruation, or
during pregnancy.
",Sirshasana
"1) Gomukhasana helps to make the back flexible.
2) It can remove stiff shoulders and backpain.
3 It helps in the treatment of sciatica.
4) It stimulates the kidneys and can help those suffering from diabetes.
5) It helps to develop the chest.
6) It helps in sexual ailments.","If you have the following conditions, refrain from doing Gomukhasana:
1)Shoulder injury
2) Severe pain in thighs, hip, knee, shoulder, hands and legs
3)Injury to muscle, ligaments and tendons of legs
4) Sprain the legs
5) Piles
6) Serious neck injury",Gomukhasana
"1) It gives a good stretch to the groins and the inside muscles of the legs.
2) It loosens up the lower back and hips. Those with stiff back can benefit by practicing this pose daily.
3) It can give relief to sciatica.
4) It strengthens the spine.
5) Upavistha Konasana stretches the hamstring muscles.
5) Core muscles in the lower abdomen are strengthened.","1) Do not do this pose if have any injury of the hips or the lower back.
2) If you have any groin or hamstring tear, avoid this pose.
3) Those with herniated disk should consult a doctor before attempting this pose.",Upavistha Konasana
"1) Utthan Pristhasana is a good hip opener.
2) It strengthens the thigh muscles of the front leg.
3)It stretches the groins and the hip flexors.
4) Opens the chest and neck.","Those suffering from hip, groin or knee injuries should avoid this pose. Also, those who had any recent surgery of the abdomen, thorax, hips or legs should not attempt this pose.",Utthan Pristhasana
"1)It improves digestion.
2)It stretches and tones the muscles of the abdomen.
3) It expands the chest and the rib cage resulting in full intake of oxygen. The lung capacity is fully utilised.","Do not practice this asana if
experiencing: complications in the
chest and shoulder region, middle ear
problems, or symptoms of whiplash.",Hasta Utthanasana
• Stretches the hamstrings • Increases the flexibility of the hip joints • Massages the abdominal contents • Elongates the spine from the sacrumto the base of the skull,"Do not practice this asana if experiencing lumbar pathologies,injury at the knees, hips, pelvis, shoulders, rib cage, spine, or who have undergone any recent hips or abdominal surgery should avoid this pose.Pregnant women should avoid this pose",Paschimottanasana
"Kapalbhati cleans the cranial sinuses and can relieve cerebral thrombosis.
It purifies the nerves and the pranic channels, removes excess of Kapha (one of the Doshas in Ayurveda) from the body, gives a clear mind and helps to control thoughts.
The word Kapala means skull and Bhati means to illumine. This practice adds luster to the face,removes all impurities of the body, oxygenate the blood, It helps to remove abdominal fat and is an excellent practice for obesity.","1) This practice of Kapalabhati pranayama should be avoided by anyone suffering from viral infections.
2) Not to be practiced by women who are either pregnant or are in their menstrual cycle.
3) Hypertension patients should practice Kapalabhati Pranayama with a yoga teacher’s guidance and care.
4) Not to be practiced by anyone suffering from injury of the neck, as there is pressure with the fast exhalation.",Kapalabhati pranayama
"• Stabilizes the pelvis and hips • Increases breath capacity • Elongates the spine from the sacrum to the base of the skull • Facilitates mental and physical balance,
This pose brings in fresh blood to the sacral nerves.
Lotus Pose (Padmasana) helps to clear up many physical, nervous and emotional problems.
Since the blood is made to circulate in the lumbar region and the abdomen, the spine and the abdominal organs are toned.",natvarasana,Padmasana
"Tadasana (Mountain Pose) strengthens the legs and the feet, tones the hips, glutes, and abdomen.
It aligns the body and improves balance.
• Develops strength in the
ankles and arches of the feet
• Opens up the hips
• Establishes balance and
coordination
• Improves posture","1) Tadasana (Mountain Pose) should not be done by people with knee and ankle injuries.
2) People who lack breath body connection can do this pose with the yoga teacher’s guidance. 
3) Students with weak knees and ankles should avoid directly getting into Tadasana (Mountain Pose).
4) People with vertigo, a migraine, low or high blood pressure also should avoid this pose.",Taadasana
"1) Ardha matsyendrasana is one of the best poses to improve the flexibility of the spine. It keeps your spine young.
2) It stretches the muscles along the spinal column and tones the spinal nerves. This can relieve some mild pains caused by stiff back.
3) It is good for mild cases of slipped disk.
4) This pose massages the organs in the abdominal region.
5) It improves digestion.
6) Ardha matysendrasana tones the kidneys and improves secretion of the adrenal glands.
7) It activates the pancreas and helps to manage diabetes.","1)Ardha Matsyendrasana should not be done if you have any rib injury.
2) Those who have any hip or knee injury should avoid this pose.
3) should not be done by pregnany women
4)avoided by Senior Citizens having weak joints",Ardha matsyendrasan
"1)Balasana stretches the shoulders and back and ankles subtly.
2)Flexibility of the lower limbs, ankles and feet are enhanced with the alignment.
3)In this pose, the chest is constricted, yet the heart is relaxed.
4)Awareness and Focus (Concentration)/Alignment and Posture.
5)Energizing, De-stressing, Relaxing
6)Therapeutic, Healing and Ailments","1)Students with any injury or a recent surgery done at the ankles, shoulder, knee joints or hip joints need to avoid this practice.
2)Students who lack the understanding of breath awareness need to avoid this pose as they may hold their breath in the forward fold which can prove to be dangerous.
3)Students with high blood pressure, a migraine or having epilepsy should be guided and the practice should be at shorter intervals.
4)Pregnant women and senior citizens with knee joint pains and heart ailments need to avoid this pose.",Balasana
"1)The most important advantages of this yoga pose is that it helps in remaining focused and improves concentration, without which this yoga pose is not possible.
2)The muscles around the shoulders, upper arms, forearms, and the wrists are toned and strengthened.
3)The muscles like the hamstrings, the quadriceps, calves too are put to work thus toning them and making them strong and flexible.
4)The core, abdominal muscles, are used to the maximum here and hence they get toned and give a great shape to the body.
5)As the abdominal muscles are used here the fat around the tummy is reduced giving more strength to the abdominal muscles.
6)Maintaining balance requires concentration that in turn improves memory.
7)The chest is expanded to the maximum giving a great support to the chest muscles and toning them thus improving respiratory system.
8)The hips gets toned and both the lower back and the hips become strong and flexible.
9)As the entire body is stretched it improves the spine and gives a great looking posture to the body.
10)It helps in improving the general stamina of the body and therefore relieves stress and physical pain in the body.
11)Therapeutically it heals ailments like insomnia, migraine, irritable symptoms due to menopause, osteoporosis, and general body weakness.","1)Plank Pose should not be practiced if one is suffering from injury in the arms or wrists.
2)Not to be practiced if suffering from injury in the legs, including the upper leg at the thighs.
3)Anyone suffering from low or high blood pressure should avoid this pose as a lot of pressure is felt at the chest while balancing in the pose.
4)Carpal Tunnel Syndrome patients should avoid Plank Pose completely as there is pressure on the elbows and the wrists.
5)Plank Pose should be avoided if one is suffering from anxiety related issues as the mind and the body needs a lot of focus and trying to focus with these issues will bring more stress to the mind and the body.",Phalakasana
"1)Trikonasana gives flexibility of the back and spine.
2)It stimulates the digestive fire and removes constipation.
3)It massages the muscles and nerves in the pelvic region, relieving stiffness and mild pains.
4)It tones all organs in the abdomen maintain the health of those organs.
5)Trikonasana is a good workout which can get the blocked energies moving and can relieve depression.","1)Injury: Students with an injury of the back like; slip disc or disc bulge should avoid the practice of Trikonasana (Triangle Pose). Those with issues related to the knee, hips, ankles, shoulders, neck, or the abdominal area should take proper guidance from a yoga teacher to avoid further complications.
2)Women: While women during their first trimester can practice this under the guidance of a yoga teacher, but during the second trimester and third trimester should use block for better support if very comfortable with breathing, and otherwise have no other health issues.
3)Blood Pressure and Heart: Breathing can get difficult while doing a lateral bend especially for those students suffering from blood pressure or having heart related issues. Hence best done in a modified way and then go slowly into the complete Triangle Pose. The option of this modification can be this at Utthita Trikonasana Block (Extended Triangle Pose Block), or Trikonasana Chair (Triangle Pose Chair).",Trikonasana
"1)Bridge Pose (Setubandha Sarvangasana) strengthens the quadriceps, hamstrings, glutes, and the pelvic muscles.
2)The diaphragm is elongated and the breath is steady. Staying a little longer in the Bridge Pose (Setubandha Sarvangasana) helps build required strength to follow Bridge Pose Variation Hands Support( Setubandha Sarvangasana Variation Hands Support) and Bridge Pose Variation Ankles ( Setubandha Sarvangasana Variation Ankles) to feel the chest more open.
3)Increases Awareness and Focus (Concentration)
4)The bridge created with the support of the shoulders and legs lifts the lower back and mid-back. The upper back supports this spinal movement. This fortifies the shoulders and corrects sagging shoulders.
5)In Bridge Pose, the chin nearly tucked to the neck stimulates the salivary glands, lymph nodes and thyroid glands. This helps in enhancing digestion, detoxifying the body and balancing the hormones in the body. 
6)This pose is very effective for Core strengthening and hence can be practised by athletes, runners, postnatal women and teens. In addition, this pose also helps reduce belly fat, hence toning the belly.","1) Since this pose requires lifting the hips and the back on a supported shoulder, students with neck and shoulder injuries and sprains need to completely avoid it. Also, the feet support the legs in this pose and hence students with an ankle injury or sprain need to avoid it.
2) This pose involves breath awareness. The lifting of the hips with inhalation and the slight tummy tuck creating a kumbhak in the breath needed a breath awareness. The spine alignment by raising vertebrae after vertebrae and then releasing also with the same gentleness needs body awareness.
3) Students with weak ankles, knees, shoulders and core strength need to avoid this pose. Weak core strength or a tight hip flexor usually makes the practitioner extend their lower back without consciousness and creates a good space for injuries. Though this pose is effective to treat lower back pain yoga teachers need to rule out acute cervical spondylitis or herniated disc issues in the students, due to the pressure on the spine and the neck in the backbend. Due to pressure in the carotid artery (a vital artery supplying oxygenated blood to the brain) people with high blood pressure need to avoid this pose.",Setu Bandha
"1) Camel Pose stretches the anterior body (the chest, abdomen, and quadriceps, and the psoas muscles). It tones the glutes and the hamstrings. In this pose, the abdomen and the core are stretched to their sustainable best, and hence it is a good counter pose to boat pose (navasana) where the core is activated with toning and strengthening.
2) Camel Pose improves spinal mobility because, in our daily activities, we never challenge the spine to a backbend. We are likely to be sitting or slouching and bending our spine forward. We flex it in the opposite direction by doing a backbend, and this toning enhances body posture.
3) The element of Camel Pose is the chest opening. It stretches the chest muscles, enhances blood circulation in the body, and fosters a healthy heart. The chest cavity is enhanced, and this results in cardiovascular fitness. The expansion of the diaphragm is beneficial for respiration. 
4) Camel Pose(Ustrasana) is effective in detoxifying the body. It enhances circulation to the digestive tract, thus improving digestion, appetite, and excretion of food. An effective digestive system energizes the body.
5) This yoga pose also stimulates the endocrine glands with abdominal stretching and alleviates diseases related to the ovaries, pineal glands, and testes. etc. The uterus is toned, and the urogenital system of the body is benefited.
6) Ustrasana works subtly but effectively to improve the digestive, respiratory, endocrine, lymphatic, skeletal, and circulatory systems. The chest opening enhances the respiratory system, and ailments related to it, like asthma and bronchitis, can be treated by this practice.","1) Practitioners with knee, neck, spine, ankle, wrist, and ankle injuries have to avoid this pose, as all the above-said joints are active in this pose. Also, people who have undergone knee, hip, and spinal surgeries need to avoid this pose to avoid strain and further damage.
2) Practitioners who lack body-breath connections should avoid this pose. The right alignment of the knees, feet, and then the breath awareness to take the backbend is very much needed. Without this coordination, they may jerk their lower back and knee joints. Similarly, even releasing the pose is gentle with body awareness. Yoga teachers need first to enlighten the students about this concept.
3) Students with high blood pressure, migraine, or nervous ailments like epilepsy need to avoid this pose. The neck stretch and the backbend gushes energies up to the brain, which is not advisable for such people. Practitioners with vertigo and balancing issues also need to avoid the pose because it may aggravate the dizziness.",Ustrasana
"1)The raising of the leg beyond the hip, stretches the hamstrings, calves and the quadricep muscles, thus making them more flexible and strong.
2)The hips are toned here with the backbend of the lower back and the thighs.
3)Beautiful asana to tone the arms and the shoulders removing the wrong posture of the shoulders and the extra fat at the upper arms .
4)The chest and the shoulders expand here, thus creating more space for the breath.
5)The entire spine is in action, thus toning the muscles around it including the neck and builds overall flexibility.
6)The most important benefit one gets from this pose is the balancing of the body, thus giving room for more focus towards mind and body. This further improves concentration and memory","1) This asana is considered to be an Advance Level Pose and certainly should not be practiced without proper step by step guidance.
2) This pose as such has very few contraindications, meaning, as it requires tremendous flexibility to take the thighs upwards bringing it parallel to the floor, it is generally only practiced if one has strong leg and strong lower back. So to be avoided by anyone having injury anywhere in the body.
3) Someone suffering from slip disc should avoid this completely. As a lot of pressure is felt at the lower back.
4) Someone with carpal tunnel syndrome should avoid this pose as the wrists are twisted to grab the toes to help bring the leg high.",Natrajasana
"1) Surya Namaskara comprehensively includes asana, pranayama, mantra and meditative awareness. Hence it is good to start the morning yoga practice with Surya Namaskara..
2)The sequence of asanas induces deep and rhythmic breathing.
3)It loosens up the joints in the body.
4)It tones the muscles and the internal organs.
5)Surya Namaskara activates the Pingala nadi or the Surya nadi which enhances the energy level in the body.
5)It removes lethargy and makes the mind alert.
6)It helps to strengthen the back muscles.
7)It balances the respiratory, circulatory, reproductive and the endocrine system.
Surya Namaskara, when done briskly, is good practice to burn extra fat in the body","1)Bodily Weakness: Since this is an involved yoga sequence, care should be taken if one has general body weakness or muscle and bone weakness.
2)Bad Back: In Sun Salutation (Surya Namaskar), the spine expands and contracts putting pressure on the lower back and hip. Hence someone with a very bad back or injured back should certainly avoid this even if one has practiced this for years. It is essential to take a yoga teacher's guidance or start slowly once the yoga practitioner has recovered from the back ailment or injury.
3)Pregnant Women: Not advisable to be done by pregnant women as this puts pressure on the back and the abdominal area.
4)High Blood Pressure: People suffering with high blood pressure should avoid this sequence. But with proper guidance from a yoga teacher and for someone not elderly can begin this yoga pose slowly and carefully.
5)Heart Problem: Someone with heart problem is advised to consult a physician before practicing Sun Salutation (Surya Namaskar). Remember that the age factor does play a big role for someone with heart conditions.
6)Arthritis: Knee strength plays an important role with the various postures in Surya Namaskar. So someone who has severe arthritis leading to knee stiffness, should take it slow or avoid this sequence.",Surya Namaskar
"1. Promotes spinal flexibility: Practicing Bhairavasana lengthens the spine which stretches the back muscles and makes them supple and flexible. The spine gets strong and prevents any chances of getting hurt or injured.
2. Strengthens the leg muscles: It involves flexing the knees, ankles, while activating the arches and toes. It stretches the leg muscles and supplies blood and nourishment to the cells. Thus, promotes legs strength and flexibility.
3. Stimulates hip-flexors: Since, bhairavasana is an intense hip opener, it stretches the hip-flexors, and the internal rotation of the hips while performing the pose focuses on hip flexors. It improves the hip mobility and relieves all the accumulated stress.
4. Improves digestion: The abdominals are also stretched and massaged holding this posture. It tones the abdominal organs that aids in healthy digestion. Thus, it tones the abdominal muscles and keeps digestive disorders at bay.
5. Stretches Oblique muscles: To get into this pose, the torso is bent sideways that brings a great stretch in oblique muscles. It increases the endurance of these muscles, keeps the body toned and in proper shape.","1) Anyone with injury in and around the spine, hips, knee, neck shoulders, or wrist must avoid it.
2) People suffering from a hernia must not try it out.
3) Do not practice this pose if you have sciatica pain.",Bhairavasana
"1) Stretches the leg muscles, strengthening and toning them. The lengthening of the leg muscles also helps to bring stability in the hips.
2) Better circulation of blood in the hip girdle and the legs. There is fresh flow of blood towards the legs right after being released from the posture, and this helps in rejuvenating the muscles, tissues, ligaments and tendons.
3) In most seated poses the weight of the body is on the hips and the sit bones, but in Hanumanasana (Splits Pose) it is on the pelvic girdle, engaging the pelvic floor muscles. Thus, it works on strengthening these muscles, improving blood supply, the coccygeal region (tailbone) is stretched which helps since it connects to perineum and the spine.
4) With the stretch in the groin area, groin muscles, psoas muscles, and abdominal muscles are strengthened helping in keeping the hips stable.
With the practice of Splits Pose, there is scope for bringing balance and stability to the hips and pelvic girdle. With the opposite movement of the hip flexors and the legs, students can learn to neutralize the rotation of the hips. With better hip stability, mastering advance poses that require deeper hip opening can be achieved.
5)Awareness and Alignment plays an important role with the practice of Hanumanasana (Splits Pose). With the awareness, students should work on the alignment of the body to ensure achieving the best from the practice as well as avoid injury. Hence, for perfect alignment, using blocks where needed, should be encouraged.","1) Students of course recovering from an injury of the joints of the coccygeal (tailbone), hips, pelvis, knees, ankles, should avoid this practice.
2) Pregnant women should avoid this practice, since it puts pressure to the groin, pelvis, and abdomen. It can also lead to varicose vein in the groin, and legs.",Hanumanasana
"1) Heals Body: The end of the spinal column (meru danda) is so beautifully placed on the heels giving the body a great looking posture and helps in transporting the prana smoothly to the entire body. This flow of prana is the first stage to heal the body from within.
2) Increases Flexibility in Ankles: The ankles are bent so well giving room for greater flexibility right up to the tips of the toes.
3) Improves Blood Circulation: The folding of the knees and the thighs stretches these muscles and improves blood circulation and improves flexibility.
4) Strengthens Pelvic Muscles: In this pose as the spine is elevated and away from the floor, the flow of blood is altered along with the nervous impulses in the pelvic region and pelvic muscles are strengthened.
5) Improves Digestion: As this is one of the few yoga poses which can be practiced even after a meal, it is considered as a good way to help in digestion and increases the efficiency of the digestive system.
6) Stabilizes Mind and Body: In this pose it is said that the mind and the body become stabilized, hence is recommended for pranayama and meditation which later improves concentration and memory.
7) Increases Blood Circulation in Abdomen: It increases the blood circulation in the abdominal area, with the special fold of the legs creating a bandha. This bandha controls the blood circulation from the waist downwards.","1) Injured Ankles or Knees Ligaments: This pose can be hard on the knees and the ankles if one is not flexible with these muscles and joints. This pose should not be practiced if one is suffering from injured ligaments at the ankles or at the knees.
2) Hernia or Ulcers: Those suffering from hernia or intestinal ulcers should take medical advice and guidance before practicing this and should perform this pose with a trained yoga teacher. The pressure on the anus in this pose may bring unwanted pressure to the intestine.
3) Runners with Hamstring or Calf Injury: Runners should avoid this if they have injury in their hamstrings or the calves.
4) Arthritis in Knees: Not to be practiced by people who have severe arthritis of the knees.",Vajrasana
"1) Soothing and Calm: When the spine is straight and follows the neutral shape, the energy flow from the base of the spine to the crown of the head moves encouraging the nervous system to be relaxed. A calm nervous system helps calm the mind, building better focus and awareness.
2) Concentration and Memory: The benefits of pranayama and meditation is enhanced when done in the right seated posture. Seated in Swastikasana the level of concentration increases as the energy flow is smooth through the unblocked channels. This brings an increased level of focus, concentration, and memory.
3) Chakra activation: When the flow of prana is smooth and easy through unblocked channels, the Muladhara (Root) Chakra along with Ajna (Third Eye) Chakra is activated. This benefit though is derived when the practice is done for a longer duration.","1) Injury: The crossing of the legs and the internal rotation of the hips play a crucial role when seated in Swastikasana. Hence, students injured at the hips, knees, and ankles should avoid the same. For comfort though, and as an alternative, the legs can be extended out when seated on a yoga mat rolled.
2) Arthritis: For those with arthritis of the knees, hips, and feet should avoid sitting on the floor. Compressing these joints may cause swelling and pain for those with arthritis.
3) Sciatica: The sciatic nerve gets compressed when seated in Swastikasana reducing blood supply to the nerve. This can become painful and unsafe for those suffering from sciatica, hence best to avoid.
4) Pregnant women: For those pregnant women who practice prenatal yoga, should avoid this posture if they have swollen legs (water retention). Stopping the flow of blood in the hips and the pelvis is not advisable during the last stages of pregnancy. In such cases, seated on a cushion with the legs extend for pranayama or meditation is encouraged.",Siddhasana
"Regular practice of the Warrior Pose I increases flexibility in the hips and strengthens and tones the legs, ankles, and feet.
the deep stretch to the lower body, like the gluteus maximus, the quadriceps, the hamstrings, and the adductors of the inner thighs, helps to maintain a great looking toned muscle. The stretch at the upper body keeps the muscles around the entire spine and the obliques (side abdominal muscles) also in good shape.","1. Students should avoid this pose in case of balance difficulties or an injury to the hip, knees, back, or shoulders.
2.One mistake is curving your lower back. Avoid making a “C” shape with your torso. Instead, scoop your tailbone forward and draw your ribs in.
3.If there are any injuries or existing weaknesses in the neck, the students can be advised to keep the chin tucked in and neck in line with the spine as shown here.",Virabhadrasana
"1) Parvatasana strengthens the muscles of the arms and legs.
2) It tones the spinal nerves and sends good flow of blood to the spinal region.
3) It increases blood flow to the brain and gives mild benefits similar to inverted asanas.","Parvatasana should not be done if you have any wrist, hip or ankle injury.",Parvatasana
"1.he twisting and backbend action in this pose helps to improve the flexibility of the hips, arms, shoulders and the core muscles. The balancing action puts weight on the muscles of the arms and shoulders making it a great practice for well-toned shoulders. This further helps in better range of motion of the spine while in a twist, preparing the upper body for other challenging poses of the same kind.
2.The active use of the chest, rib cage, shoulders, and upper abdomen together help to ensure deeper breathing. The balancing action requires the efficient use of the intercostal muscles (breathing muscles) to keep the body stable and relaxed while in a twist. With practice, the improved breathing will help in the efficient use of the diaphragm
3.The practice of Wild Thing Pose with its backbend puts pressure on the abdominal area. This pressure (with the stretching of the muscles) helps improve digestion, reduces anxiety and improves the immune system. The pelvic opening stimulates the reproductive organs, bringing balance in the hormones with better functioning of the glands.","1.Injury: Stay away from the practice of Camatkarasana (Wild Thing Pose) if one is suffering from injury of the wrist, shoulder, neck, elbows and back. Even if the injury is completely healed, make sure guidance from a yoga teacher is taken for the practice of this pose.

Migraine: Avoid the practice of Camatkarasana (Wild Thing Pose) if suffering from migraine as the fall of the head and the neck may create more pressure towards the brain with the sudden gushing of the flow of blood.

Heart related problems: Not only those who have had surgery related to the heart should avoid this practice, but those who have had problems related to the heart should completely avoid Camatkarasana (Wild Thing Pose).

Carpal Tunnel Syndrome: The pressure that the elbow takes along with the wrists may worsen the nerves that are related to the median nerve, compressing it. Hence best to avoid the practice.
Blood Pressure: Avoid the practice of this yoga pose if one is suffering from blood pressure,",Camatkarasana
"1) Stretches, Strengthens, lengthens: Vrikshasana stretches and strengthens the muscles of the legs, hips, back, core, arms, and shoulders. At the beginner level this hip opener helps to bring stability in the pelvic girdle, while preparing the body for poses like Half Lotus Tree Pose (Ardha Padma Vrksasana), Half Chair Pose (Ardha Utkatasana), and the likes.
2) Flexibility and Range of Motion: This balancing pose which involves the joints of the hips, knee, ankles and shoulders are all engaged together helping in keeping the body stable. 
3) Chest, Diaphragm and Breath: During the practice of Tree Pose, when the arms are stretched upwards, there is the active use of the chest, rib cage, diaphragm, intercostal muscles (breathing muscles). The active use of these helps in taking in more air into the lungs, thus also ensuring the efficient use of the lungs.
4) Awareness and Focus (Concentration): According to yoga guru B.K.S. Iyengar, paying attention to your breath helps merge body and mind and create a state of physiologic equilibrium. Students maintain a straight look during the pose. This aids in mindfulness. 
5) Alignment and Posture: Balancing in this pose without disturbing the prana flow requires having a clear understanding on the alignment aspects. The placing of the foot in the groin, the outward movement of the hips and knees, the grounding action of the five toes with all of them pointed in front, the placing of the hips and pelvis, the alignment of the shoulders with the hips and foot, and the raised hands with the shoulders and hips, together help in completing the pose to gain the maximum benefit. When all of these come together, the posture looks good and balancing becomes easier.","1) Injury and Surgery: Being a hip opener, that also puts pressure on the knees, ankle and shoulders, students with any kind of injury related to these joints should completely avoid this practice. Moreover, if students are recovering from a recent surgery related to any part of the joints mentioned above, or even related to a surgery to any internal organ, then they should refrain from the practice of this pose. 
2) Ailment and Physical Strength: Since this pose demands some basic strength in the muscles of the legs, hips, and back, students with issues related to the physical body should take it slow or even avoid this practice. A few conditions like vertigo, a migraine, arthritis in the hips or knees, history of a hip replacement, or any other condition that is contraindicated, should be considered during the practice of Tree Pose.
3) Lack of Body-Breath Connections: Vrikshasana demands awareness and focus. Without proper knowledge of body-breath connection, the practice may bring disturbance in the energy levels and defeat the purpose of the practice, completely. Hence, unless the students are completely ready, they should not be introduced to this practice.",Vrikshasana
"1. Three Legged Downward Facing Dog Pose is a deep hip opener, and with the raising of one leg it puts pressure on the extended hip as well as the balancing leg muscles. The muscles of the standing leg are stretched like the hamstrings, calves, hip flexors, gluteus, along with the active involvement of the joints of the hips, knees, and ankles.
2.The repeated practice of this action helps improve the range of motion of the hip flexors and psoas muscles thereby helping the hips to open up more than their range. The lengthening of the spine in a forward bend helps the hips to move forward creating more space for the lower back to open up. And this action helps to extend the leg higher from the lower back right up to the ankles.
3.One of the key elements in Tri Pada Adho Mukha Svanasana is balance and stability while the palms are grounded pushing the torso down and extending one leg. This effort requires the awareness of body-breath ensuring they are in sync to go deeper into the posture. This kind of awareness helps in two ways, one, it avoids injury, two, it prepares the body for more challenging poses like One Handed Three Legged Downward Facing Dog Pose, or Standing Split Pose. 
4.The practice of this inversion pose helps increase blood flow to the heart with the extending of the leg. The reverse flow of blood and lymphatic fluid is forced back to the heart when the leg is extended. It is said that the functioning of the soleus muscles are considered to be the second heart of the human body, pumping venous blood back into the heart.","1.Lack of Body-Breath Connections: Students should have awareness and knowledge of breath coordination while going into and coming out of the pose. The student should enter the pose on an exhale, stay in the pose with deep breaths, and release on an exhale. Students who don’t understand this may injure their shoulders or hips.
2.Seniors and Pregnant women in third trimester should avoid this pose. Downward Facing Dog Pose Variation Chair (Adho Mukha Svanasana Variation Chair) is a good variation for them. Good arms strength coupled with ankle and knee strength is needed for this pose",Tri Pada Adho Mukha Svanasana
"1) Dandasana is a starting pose for most of the other sitting postures. For example, if you want to perform Paschimottanasana or the forward bend pose, you have to start with this asana.
2)It helps to strengthen the muscles of the back and corrects minor postural defects.
3) Perfecting this asana gives you the strength and steadiness to do more advanced yogic poses.
4) The muscles of the chest and abdomen is stretched and strengthened.
5) Maintaining the pose for longer durations can remove stiffness of the lower back muscles.
6) It can improve digestion.
7) It can remove fatigue in the leg muscles.
8) It increases the flexibility of the lower back and hips.",Those who suffer from weak back should try to do this with the support of the wall.Use a blanket under the legs if your hamstrings are too tight.,Dandasana
"1.Improves the functioning of the thyroid gland: The thyroid gland at the neck, with the secretion of thyroid hormone, helps in metabolic rate of the body and also helps in the development of the human body.
2.Improves the functioning of the adrenal gland: The adrenal gland which lie above the kidneys helps in the supply of blood and secretes a number of different hormones which are essential for a proper balance within the body.
3.Improves the functioning of the thymus:The thymus located in front of the heart, helps in maintaining the immune system. It helps the body fight foreign invaders.
3.Purvottanasana improves the strength at the wrists going upwards to the entire arm including the shoulders. The weight of the body if balanced well on the shoulders and the wrists will not only make the pose easy but will improve the muscle strength around the shoulders without causing injury.
Reduces cramps at the calf, hamstrings and quadriceps: Repeated practice of this pose will open the muscles at the quadriceps, hamstrings and calves thus reducing the cramps.
4.Great pose for athletes: For most sports the arms and the legs are to be worked at, and Upward Plank Pose gives both the benefit of improving the arm strength and the leg strength.
5.Improves the alignment of the shoulders: If practiced well can help in reducing rounded shoulders and thus improving the alignment.
Core strength is improved: With the practice of Purvottanasana, pulling in the tummy consciously will improve the core strength.
6.Works well in improving the balance: This pose is a great and easy way to learn to improve the balance of the body keeping in mind the alignment of the arms and the feet.
7 Great pose to practice by women during menstruation: Purvottanasana, can be performed to ease heaviness around the lower abdomen during menstruation.
Tones the entire body: This pose works on the entire body, right from the toes to the neck, giving room for a well toned body with the burning of fat around the thighs, hips, chest and abdomen.","Certain things to keep in mind while practicing Upward Plank Pose.

High Blood Pressure: This pose needs to be practiced with guidance when suffering from high blood pressure, as the head and neck fall back loose bringing in sudden flow of blood to the head.

To be avoided if suffering from severe migraine: A proper guidance is needed if one is suffering from severe migraine, as the head falls back loose during the practice of this pose.
Any kind of injury at the wrists, neck and back: Keep in mind that any injury caused will hinder the practice of this pose, hence one needs to be cautious.

General weak body: It is important to work on the basic strength of the body before the practice of this pose, as the elbow joints, the wrist joints are not used to taking the weight of the body, while the arms are placed behind you.",Purvottanasana
"1.This pose stretches the arms, shoulders, elbows, wrists, chest, back (upper, middle, and lower), hips, quadriceps, hamstrings, knees, and neck. While these stretches are subtle and not intense, they help strengthen the areas of the body, as mentioned above. Along with these stretches, the spine muscles are toned.

2.Though there is no chest opening in this pose. Due to the stability and balance in the pose, it helps increase the breath capacity. The core is effectively pulled up to maintain the balance, the breath becomes deeper, and the student starts chest and not abdominal breathing. Such deep and calm inhale and exhales effectively affect the respiratory system by expanding the thoracic cavity space.

3.In this pose, the student creates awareness of stabilizing and aligning the body. This action stabilizes the mind too. The gaze is on the palms, and this calm, restorative pose is a pose of self-awareness. It’s a passive core strengthening pose.","1.Injury and Surgery: Any injury to the knees, wrists, shoulders, elbows, hips, and spine is a contraindication as the pressure in these areas will aggregate the pain and the swelling. Hence, yoga teachers should take care while introducing this simple pose to students with such injuries. Similarly, people who have undergone recent surgery on the knees, hips, ankles, shoulders, or spine should avoid this pose to avoid post-surgery complications and injuries.

2.Physical Strength and Weak Body: Students with weak ankles, knees, wrist joints, and shoulders should avoid this pose to avoid dislocation of the joints. Yoga teachers need to strengthen their joints with joint freeing exercises. Students with carpal syndrome should avoid this pose because of the pressure on the wrists. Students who are new to yoga and are suffering from arthritis of the shoulders, hips, and knees should avoid the practice of Table Top Pose. Since these joints bear the body's weight in this pose, students should be cautious when putting pressure on them.",bharmanasana
"1) It strengthens the muscles of the hands and legs.
2) It strengthens the chest.","1) Injury and Surgery: A lot of strain is felt in the joints and muscles of the entire body with the practice of Ashtanga Namaskar, hence if students with an injury to any part of the body, or are recovering from a surgery should avoid the practice of this pose.
2) Injury of the shoulders, elbows, wrists, neck, hips, knees, lower back, ankles, toes, pelvis, etc., should keep the yoga teacher informed to avoid further damage to the injury.
3) Slip Disc and Spondylolisthesis: Students irrespective of age who are recovering from a herniated disc or spondylolisthesis, should avoid the practice of Eight Limbed Pose.
4) Lower Back Pain and Arthritis: Students dealing with back pain issues, or are diagnosed with arthritis should completely avoid the practice of Eight Limbed Pose.",Ashtanga Namaskara
"1. It stabilizes the hips. By pressing the thighs onto the abdomen, the pressure falls on the lower back thus strengthening the lower back. As one needs to pull up the knees towards the chest and balance the body, the strength of the arms and shoulders are essential, hence this works to tone the arms and shoulders. This strengthens the cervical spine too. 
2.he toning of the lower body and the strengthening of the lower back combined with hip stability enhances the body posture. The pushing of the knees towards the chest is an action which moderately opens the hip joints and simultaneously tones the glutes. This primarily enhances lower body flexibility.
3.he toning of the lower body and the strengthening of the lower back combined with hip stability enhances the body posture. The pushing of the knees towards the chest is an action which moderately opens the hip joints and simultaneously tones the glutes. This primarily enhances lower body flexibility.
4.Pawanmuktasana (Wind Release Pose) is therapeutic and can be used by yoga teachers to treat menstrual disorders, flatulence, constipation, infertility and impotence or diabetes. Flatulence is a buildup of gas in the digestive system that can lead to abdominal discomfort. Excessive flatulence can cause discomfort and distress. Many times, headaches and migraines are caused due to Vata dosha (gaseous formation in the body which is not passed out). This pose is good to treat such physical conditions.","1.Pawanmuktasana (Wind Release Pose) should be avoided by people who have shoulder, ankle or knee injuries. Also, people who have undergone hip, shoulder, spine or knee surgeries should avoid this. Post natal women who have undergone Cesarean birth surgery should avoid this. Any kind of abdominal surgeries if done ,such patients should avoid this, because its tremendous pressure on a tender abdomen.
2.People with weak ankles, knees, and wrists should avoid this pose. There is an effort by the practitioner to pull the leg towards the chest with the palms. 
3. Senior citizens and Pregnant women should avoid this pose, as abdominal pressure is not advisable for them. Post Natal Women who have undergone cesarean section also should avoid this too.

",Pawanmuktasana
"1.With the deep stretch of the arms above your head in this pose, helps the shoulders and the neck get their equal share of stretch thus reducing any stiffness.
2.With the muscles being activated, including the abdominal muscles, the digestive system and the reproductive system improve in their functions, thus reducing indigestion and problems related to the reproductive system.
3. The flexing of the knees, ankles, hips, shoulders, elbow, entire spine and neck helps to keep them strong while the muscles around these joints become strong with contraction while in Ashta Chandrasana.
4.The expansion of the diaphragm that improves the respiratory system helps with asthma patients. The flexing of the hips and the entire leg works from the base of the spine, creating better movement of the nerve including the sciatic nerve. The building of stamina and stability with awareness of the body, brings in fresh energy within the body to help reduce symptoms related to insomnia.","1) Injury to the knees or the hips can make this pose difficult: While this pose surely improves the strength and flexibility of the hips and the knees, the pressure around this place during the practice of this pose may make the tissues around the hips and the knees tear if one is injured and hence best to avoid this pose.
2) If one is suffering from Low or High Blood Pressure: Understanding the body with the practice of Ashta Chandrasana is as essential as gaining flexibility. While the arms are stretched above your head and the gaze is upwards, there is a tendency to tighten the breathing if one is not aware of the body. This tightening of breath or the holding of breath may be against blood pressure patients and hence best to take guidance or avoid the practice of this pose.
3) Balance plays a great role: In Crescent High Lunge pose if one is looking up while still being aware of the body with feet apart requires practice and hence for someone who has issues related to headaches or balance of the body, should take it slow. One could also practice this with support first or start with looking forward and not upwards, while still understanding the body balance. Using the wall could also be a good option here.",Ashta Chandrasana
"1) Locust Pose stretches and strengthens the back and core muscles, improving your spinal mobility.
2)Many everyday activities (such as sitting) flex the spine while locust pose extends it. 
3) It opens the chest, which can be helpful in improving your posture and counteract slouching.","1) Injury and Surgery: Students with injuries at the ankles, knees, hips, pelvis, rib cage, or shoulders must be discouraged from the practice of this pose. 
2) Students who have undergone recent surgery or have had surgery years back related to any part of the body, like ankles, knees, hips, shoulders, spine or related to any abdominal organs or the heart, then they should take extra precautions or just avoid the practice, as the case may be.
3) Lack of Body-Breath Connections: Students should have awareness and knowledge of breath coordination while going into and coming out of the pose. Mention the reasons why this is essential (one is to avoid injury or strain).
4) Pregnant women should avoid it.",Salabhasana
"1.The position of the hips in this pose, take the weight of the upper body and with practice, the muscles around the hips, gain strength giving it a strong look. The entire upper body, shoulders, chest, spine, neck, middle and upper back get stretched in this pose, while the lower body gets strong. 

2.The lengthening of the spine coupled with the strengthening of the knee and ankle joints supported with a stable hip enhances overall flexibility and improves agility. Chair Pose (Utkatasana) is a challenging and dynamic pose as it provides momentum to transit to many other poses involving squatting and twisting.

3. Utkatasana tones the core muscles by tightening the abdominal muscles while holding the pose. Creating a tummy tuck while bringing the navel close to the spine tightens the abdominal muscles bringing strength and stimulating the digestive system.

4. The abdominal toning acts as a great massage to the digestive organs, and it is adequate to treat constipation, Ibd (Irritable bowel disorder), lack of appetite, and acidity. The neck stretch stimulates the thyroid glands, which balances the thyroxin levels (Hormone responsible for metabolism and health of the bones and joints).","Students with shoulder, ankle, and hip injuries should avoid this pose because all these joints are active in this pose.

Students with high blood pressure, vertigo, or migraine ailments need to avoid this pose. Dizziness and imbalance can happen because of the neck bend with arms raised.

This pose should be avoided by pregnant women in the third trimester as it’s strenuous on the hips and the legs to carry the weight of the womb. Similarly senior citizens lack core and knee strength and this pose is not advisable for them. postnatal women still regaining strength in their hips and pelvic joints need to avoid this pose.

",utkatasana
"1. Crescent Low Lunge Pose (Anjaneyasana) stretches both the anterior and posterior parts of the body from the toes to the fingertips. This asymmetrical balancing pose stretches the arms, armpits, shoulders, neck, intercostal muscles, abdomen, psoas muscles, quadriceps, shin muscles, and pelvic muscles. It lengthens the spine by stretching it in a beautiful crescent shape.
2.Crescent Low Lunge Pose (Anjaneyasana) is a back bending chest opener pose. The moon-shaped backbend opens the frontal chest and enhances blood circulation to the heart and lungs. 
3.In this pose, the practitioner has to focus on the alignment of the legs and the hips. The lower body supports the upper backbend, hence a wrong lower body alignment can cause stress to the knees and hips. The folded leg should be aligned in such a way that the knees and ankles are in one straight line and perpendicular to the thigh. 
4.Crescent Low Lunge Pose (Anjaneyasana) stimulates the digestive and reproductive systems. The deep abdominal stretch happening with the backbend stimulates the digestive system and helps in treating ailments like constipation, IBS (Irregular Bowel Syndrome), lack of appetite, and acidity. The pelvic stretch and the groin stretch enhance blood circulation in the groin area and benefits the urogenital system. Reproductive ailments in men like erectile dysfunction and infertility can be cured and it benefits prostate health too.
","Students with weak knees, ankles, shoulders, and hip joints need to avoid this pose. The knees take more direct pressure in this pose and the alignment passively opens the hip joints and students may hurt themselves. Also, students with a weak body frame have a vulnerable core and less stamina. So this pose can be avoided as it requires stamina and endurance to stay in balance. Practitioners having vertigo, high blood pressure and balancing issues need to avoid this pose to prevent any injuries which may be caused due to imbalance and dizziness",anjenayasana
"1) Stretches your back, hips, and hamstrings
2) Stimulates your heart and abdominal organs
3) Therapeutic for flat feet and persistent gas (flatulence)","1) Menstruation
2) If you have any serious knee or ankle problems, avoid the Ardha Virasana (Half Hero Pose) leg position in this pose unless you have the assistance of an experienced instructor. Instead sit with the legs positioned in Janu Sirsasana (Head-to-Knee Forward Bend)",Kraunchasana
"1) Soothing and Calm: When the spine is straight and follows the neutral shape, the energy flow from the base of the spine to the crown of the head moves encouraging the nervous system to be relaxed. A calm nervous system helps calm the mind, building better focus and awareness.
2) Concentration and Memory: The benefits of pranayama and meditation is enhanced when done in the right seated posture. Seated in Swastikasana the level of concentration increases as the energy flow is smooth through the unblocked channels. This brings an increased level of focus, concentration, and memory.
3) hakra activation: When the flow of prana is smooth and easy through unblocked channels, the Muladhara (Root) Chakra along with Ajna (Third Eye) Chakra is activated. This benefit though is derived when the practice is done for a longer duration.","1) Injury: The crossing of the legs and the internal rotation of the hips play a crucial role when seated in Swastikasana. Hence, students injured at the hips, knees, and ankles should avoid the same. For comfort though, and as an alternative, the legs can be extended out when seated on a yoga mat rolled.
2) Arthritis: For those with arthritis of the knees, hips, and feet should avoid sitting on the floor. Compressing these joints may cause swelling and pain for those with arthritis.
3) Sciatica: The sciatic nerve gets compressed when seated in Swastikasana reducing blood supply to the nerve. This can become painful and unsafe for those suffering from sciatica, hence best to avoid.",Svastikasana
"1.Reverse Pigeon Pose helps to reduce stiffness in the outer hip by effectively stretching the gluteus Maximus and hamstring muscles. Hence, for beginners who have tightness in their Hip region, this pose can be a great hip opener as it stretches hamstrings and quadriceps at the same time. Since the lower back is grounded, it supports the gentle stretch to the muscles around the lower back.
2. With the intense stretch in the hips, gluteus, hamstrings, and pelvic floor muscles, Eye Of The Needle Pose should be practiced by women. Menstrual symptoms which can range from slight discomfort to debilitating experiences depending on the individual will benefit from this supine stretch pose
3. Students who are regular in sports and running or are athletes should include the practice of the Eye Of The Needle Pose as part of their cooling down workout.
4.","1.t is best to avoid this pose, If there is any recent injury or if students are recovering from surgery in the knees and hips. As this is an external hip-opener pose and can put a lot of pressure on the hips and the knee also undergoes a rotation, it can be harmful to the knee joints. Special care should be taken with students who are regular and active athletes.
2.this pose must be avoided by Pregnant Students in their 2nd and 3rd trimesters. Moreover, senior citizens having delicate joints and muscles should also avoid putting too much pressure on their joints and muscles. Practicing this pose without proper guidance can lead to injuries.
",Sucirandhrasana
"Stretches and Strengthens: At an advanced level, the hamstrings, pelvic floor muscles, gluteus maximus, and groin muscles are stretched. These when stretched help to strengthen the hips, the pelvis, and the hip girdle. Deeper stretch of the abdominal muscles along with the core muscles, helps to strengthen the internal organs, while stimulating them.
Flexibility and Sthiram: While the practice of Supine Splits Pose (Supine Tirvikramasana) helps to build flexible hips, knees, and shoulders, it also helps students to achieve sthiram while in the pose. The practice of advanced level poses are mainly done to achieve this stability and calmness.
Awareness and Balance: The awareness of the stretched muscles, the emotions, the discomfort, the breath, and the body as a whole should be a guide to achieve the full posture in Supine Splits Pose. When this awareness is know and practiced, then, there are changes in the body and mind, leading to an overall balance.","1) Injury and Surgery: Of course students injured or having an injury in any part of the body should avoid this pose, even if experienced with this posture. Recovering from any surgery to any part of the body or organ, is again a contraindication, and should be avoided.
2) Blood Pressure and Heart Ailments: The practice of Supine Trivikramasana (Supine Splits Pose) is not for those with blood pressure or those who have any heart related ailments or issues.
3) Post delivery: Women post their delivery for up to 6 months should avoid the practice of this pose, since the muscles of the pelvis would be tender and a pull of these muscles at this stage will bring in more issues related to the uterus. Hence, best to stay away from the practice of Supine Splits Pose.",Supta Trivikramasana
"1) Stretches and Strengthens: Raising one leg with the support of the hand in Ananthasana (Side Reclining Leg Lift Pose), stretches the hips, hamstrings, pelvic floor muscles, groin muscles, gluteus maximus, psoas, biceps and triceps, and core muscles. The stretching of these muscles, when done with awareness, helps to support the hips and shoulders to remain in balance while lying on the sides of the body, thereby strengthening them as they are engaged.
2)Lower Back and Sciatica: The extended leg increases in hip mobility with the stretch felt more from the base of the spine, the sacrum. This stretch helps to keep the sciatic nerve active thereby maintaining symptoms related to sciatica in control. The stretching of the hamstrings and the groin muscles supports the hips to keep them flexible and strong. With strong hips, the issues related to the lower back (sacrum) or the middle back (lumbar) leading to aches, pain, and stiffness are kept in control.
3) Focus and Concentration: Balancing the body while lying down on the sides in Side Reclining Leg Lift Pose (Ananthasana) requires awareness. With the leg extended upwards the body becomes heavy, and students can lose balance. But, with focus and concentration at the core muscles while learning to engage them (pulling the navel in towards the spine), the balance can be maintained. Hence, a great pose to teach the students to remain focused with awareness to help improve concentration while enjoying the posture.
4) Balance and coordination
5) The stretching and opening of the hips along with the pelvic floor muscles in Ananthasana (Side Reclining Leg Lift Pose) helps women students who can fight symptoms related to menstruation or menopause.","1) Do not do this asana is you are suffering from any injury or severe pain in Knee, neck, or shoulders.
2) If you are having any Spine issues or Spondylitis, you should also not perform this asana.",Anantasna
"1) Stretches and Strengthens: The various muscles of the body stretch with this supine Belly Twist Pose Pose like, the shoulders and arms, hamstrings, gluteus maximus (buttocks), calves, chest, abdomen, and lower back muscles. Along with this stretch these muscles are also strengthened, building strong and flexible shoulders, hips, knees, ankles, and neck. The muscles of the spine are strengthened improving in flexibility, and range of motion.
2) Awareness and Focus: All along the twist in Jathara Parivartanasana, the awareness is at the center, near the navel. The deep twist happens right at the navel, and with focus and awareness the students can take the stretch and twist deeper, getting the best from the posture. Breathing slow and deep helps to keep the balance and alignment of the body, which again can only be achieved with awareness.
Manipura Chakra and Internal Organs: Since with the awareness at the navel which is the fire element, and relates to digestion, the Manipura
3) Chakra is stimulated. The stretch on one side of the abdomen along with the contracting on the opposite side, helps to stimulate the other internal organs like liver, kidney, pancreas, stomach, etc. Hence a great supine pose to stimulate the internal organs.
Hips, Shoulders and Flexibility: The practice of Belly Twist Pose when done after intense standing hip opening sequences brings stability to the hips. The twisting action of the hips towards one side with the support of the back, and the twisting action of the shoulders can help with also reducing the stiffness and tensions accumulated. The flexibility of the muscles of the spine, shoulders, and hips are also improved, reducing the stiffness of these muscles.
4) Toning, Lengthening and Posture: With the twist contracting and stretching the muscles of the back, shoulders, and hips, helps to tone and shape the muscles. The toning also happens with the internal organs with the stretching of the deeper tissues and ligaments protecting the organs. The lengthening of the spine, legs, arms and neck are encouraged giving a good posture to the entire body.
5) Energy and Endurance: Twists are a great way for releasing the tensions accumulated at the psoas muscles, the neck and shoulders. When releasing these tensions, the body feels energized. Though through endurance this can be done to hold the posture longer. This helps to keep the body stimulated, purifying it with releasing of toxins from the body.","1) Students with an injury of the hips, spine, shoulders, neck, knees, ankles, or rib cage should avoid the practice of this supine twist.
2) Students recovering from an abdominal surgery, hip replacement surgery, suffering from a herniated disc, etc., should take care and avoid this practice.
3) Women who are pregnant, or those post pregnancy should take in slow and practice under guidance, or avoid the same to stay away from complications.
4) Students with arthritis of the hips or back, should practice the same with support and under the guidance of a yoga teacher. Students with fibromyalgia or any bone related issues should avoid this practice completely.",Jathara Parivartanasana
"1) Stretches, Strengthens, Lengthens: In Bananasana, the complete side muscles of the body are stretched. Along with this stretch, the muscles at the shoulders, arms, hamstrings, gluteus, calves, chest, core (abdomen), and lower back are strengthened. A mild pressure is also on the knees, at the abdomen with the expansion of the oblique muscles, the chest and rib cage, and the IT band (the side thigh going down to the knee).
2) Flexibility and Range of Motion: Banana Pose imposes a slight pressure on the knees, which not only strengthen them, also make them flexible. By stretching the entire body, it makes it flexible to perform the daily chores. The pose gives a range of motion to the runners, and sportsmen by this supine side stretch when practiced on both sides.
3) Chest, Diaphragm and Breath: Banana Pose opens the heart with arms stretching over head, and the active and efficient use of the intercostal muscles (breathing muscles). Expansion of the diaphragm permits sufficient air to reach to the lungs improving breathing.
4) Awareness and Focus (Concentration): As you come into the Banana Pose, the awareness is at the side muscles of the back, chest, abdomen, and hips. With the bending of the body in one direction the students can take the stretch and twist deeper, getting the best from the posture. Breathing slow and deep helps to keep the balance and alignment of the body, which again can only be achieved with awareness.
5) Alignment and Posture: Side bends (which is the lateral spine movement) create a deep stretch to the muscles of the back, hips, chest, and abdomen. This stretching action is a great way for releasing the tensions accumulated at the neck and shoulders. Though it is a wonderfully revitalizing pose, the alignment of the posture is critical. As the student stretches towards one side, the hips should move together along with the feet, shoulders, arms, and head.","1) Injury and Surgery: Students with lower back issues or with neck pain or neck injuries should be careful not to stretch the muscles too far. In this posture, avoid rolling your hips and your hips should be parallel to the ground while doing this side stretch.
2) Ailment and Physical Strength: Students with lower back issues should practice the pose cautiously and avoid going too deeply. One may choose to place a bolster underneath the knees. Students suffering from severe sciatica should be restrained from the pose as the body may experience pain while performing the pose.
3) Therapy and Restorative: When this pose is included in either therapy or restorative yoga, and if students find any discomfort at the shoulder or a tingling sensation in arms while extending them overhead, one can choose to adjust the arms at the comfort level or may place a folded blanket, or a bolster under the arms.",Bananasana
"1) It builds deeper awareness of the body encouraging more stability and calmness.
2) It strengthens the forearms, chest, and core muscles.
3) The spine is parallel to the floor while the body is raised off the floor, keeping it supple. Unlike most advanced yoga poses, in Mayurasana the spine is less active.
4) With awareness the communication to the brain is improved, thereby encouraging better functioning of the nervous system with the spine being supple and soft. Helps to improve eye sight and better concentration.
5) The pressing of the belly and abdominal muscles against the elbows gives a gentle massage to the internal organs, while also improving the functioning of the internal organs including the stomach for better digestion.
6) Better and improved circulation of blood when you release from the pose, while also stimulating the internal organs and eliminating the toxins.
7) Increases the metabolism in the body, and helps to keep stress and depression away.","1) Students suffering with an injury of the wrists, elbows, shoulders, hips, lower back, neck, or rib cage, should avoid the practice of Mayurasana (Peacock Pose).
2) Back pain, surgery anywhere, senior citizens with arthritis, blood pressure, heart related issues, pregnant women, menstruating women, issues related to the abdominal organs, etc., should keep away from the practice of Mayurasana (Peacock Pose).
2) Students with weak bones or body structure, those with a weak digestive system, students who still are not aware of their body and breath, or those suffering from carpal tunnel syndrome should avoid the practice of this pose. Any attempt with Peacock Pose should be done under such circumstances under the guidance of a yoga teacher.",Mayurasna
"Physical (Anatomical) Benefits
Muscles: The toning of the muscles at various levels of the body happens during this pose. The Lower back, hip, thighs, psoas, abdomen, chest, shoulders, neck, hamstring, pelvic, and calves. The toning of these muscles adds to the overall toning of the entire outer body.

Health Benefits
1) Organs: As the abdominal muscles and psoas muscles are put to work, the internal abdominal organs are hence stimulated. The digestive juices are secreted well giving room for good digestion, the pancreas, the liver and kidney are all massaged well thus improving the functioning of these organs. The pelvic muscles are stretched and toned giving room for improved reproductive system. The chest muscles due to the expansion gives room for good functioning of the lungs and proper functioning of the heart. The neck stretch giving room for balancing the thyroid glands. The overall toning of the internal organs takes place as the muscles are put to expand at this pose.
2) Symptoms: Reduces any form of lower back irritation, leg cramps thus taking care of the sciatic nerve, the neck stiffness is reduced, can heal migraines as the improving of the digestion happens with deeper practice of this pose.The sagging shoulders can be corrected and thus make it look strong and firm. The cramps from menstrual cycle for women is cured. Improves any nervous imbalance as the entire spine is stretched.
3) Therapeutic Applications: The back pain is cured, they functioning of the uterus, immune system, imbalance in hormones thus regularising the thyroid .Any asthma related problems. Urninary disorders are treated. Removes stress, fatigue and anxiety.","1) Injury: Any kind of injury at the shoulders, hips, knees, ankle etc. Inflammation at the back, neck and shoulders too should be avoided. Dislocation of the shoulders.
2) Organs: A weak internal organ causing weak digestion may not help doing this asana without working on other more simpler asanas for improving the digestive system. Women who are pregnant should avoid this advance pose. Someone with a weak heart and suffering from acute asthma.
3) Others: Someone suffering from deep depression and anxiety should avoid this pose.With less flexibility this pose can cause discomfort and hence work on the flexibility with the simpler variations of Kapotasana before getting into this deeper pose. Someone with severe Osteoporosis shoould avoid this as a lot of stress happens at the hip, knee and foot.",rajakapotasana
"1) Human Anatomy
Boosts the Parasympathetic Nervous System: In Bharadvajasana, while the spine gets a gentle twist from the base, the sacrum, the flow of prana along the spine reduces the stress. This , boosting the parasympathetic nervous system, which is responsible for ‘rest-and-digest’, activities that occur when the body is at rest, especially after eating etc.
2) Strengthens the oblique muscles: While in the twist, the oblique muscles which are part of the abdomen wall need to be flexible to turn and twist the torso in Bharadvajasana. Thus the strength and the flexibility of these muscles improve with repeated practice of Seated Spinal Twist Pose. The functions of these muscles play an important role as they assist in rotating the trunk, making the rib cage flexible, supporting the abdominal wall and helping in flexing the torso.
General Benefits
3) Deep stretch to the spine with the gentle twist: In Bharadvajasana, the entire spine at various parts get a stretch with the twist. At the lumbar region, the thoracic region and the cervical region. Hence while practicing this pose, one needs to connect to these stretches to improve the flow of prana.
4) Stretches the shoulders and the hips: Along with the spine, the shoulders get a deep stretch. The hips too get a gentle stretch with flexing the lower back. The muscles around the hips and the shoulders stretch to improve the flexibility too.
5)Therapeutic for cervical pain: In the Seated Spinal Twist Pose, while the shoulders take a deep stretch towards one side, the neck muscles at the upper part of the spine get a gentle massage with the stretch, thus helping in reducing any pain related to cervicalgia. Remember to go slow with the twist and stay longer for better results.
6)Therapeutic for carpal tunnel syndrome: With the pressure at the wrists while placing them on the floor and while taking the other wrists from behind, the tissue that are connected between the forearm to the hand get expanded and contracted, thus creating the right energy and with this flexing, pain related to carpal tunnel can be reduced, if not cured.","1) Avoid when there is injury at the hips: Play safe and take precautions when practicing this pose with a hip injury, as pressure towards one side of the hip while twisting is more. Injury at the hips will aggravate the pain and give discomfort.
2) Alignment of the spine is very important and hence not to be done without guidance: Here in Seated Spinal Twist Pose, mostly one tends to balance the body on only one hip while taking the twist. This results in misalignment of the spine. For better results, best to take advice from an expert while going into this pose, to get better guidance while at the pose in order to gain maximum benefit.
3) Support the hips with blankets if not flexible at the hips: The idea of this pose is just not the twist, it is the twist with the proper alignment of the spine and the shoulders. Hence if the hips are raised from the floor while taking the torso twist, best is to support the buttocks with proper blankets.
4) Any kind of injury to the neck or with severe cervical pain: Though this pose is essentially good for cervical pain, yet it is best not done if one is under severe pain. It is also best to take guidance from an expert for the same. Any kind of injury to the neck and shoulders too should be avoided.
5) Anyone suffering from Cardiac condition: In the pose the Anahata Chakra is said to be activated with the gentle twist, and hence anyone who is just recovering from a cardiac condition, should go slow or take support from an expert, as the breathing plays a great role with the twist.
High blood pressure or low blood pressure: As breathing plays an important role with the twist, any holding of the breath while twisting will cause discomfort and hence anyone suffering from blood pressure should go slow or better still take help from an expert during practice.",Bharadvajasana
"1) Chest, Diaphragm and Breath: Stiffness in the intercostal muscles can lead to one taking shorter and smaller breaths, as the lungs aren’t able to expand fully. As the intercostal muscles of the extended side are stretched, it helps the lungs expand to their full capacity when breathing. This allows one to draw in deeper breaths, even when not performing the asana.
2) Alignment and Posture: To get the best form Gate Pose, alignment plays an important role. Students should be told to avoid the hips from going into a flexion which will take the pelvis behind, putting more pressure to the lower back. To avoid this engage the pelvis and keep it square (push them forward). To first understand this alignment, students can be introduced to this pose with the support of the wall, by resting the balls of the foot on the wall. This helps engage the deeper muscles of the pelvis (and strengthen the glutes). This small adjustment in alignment allows the hips to open even further, and hence can be included in classes for people who spend a lot of time sitting (in office, or when travelling), and even for students in teen yoga
3) Stimulations and Organs: The lateral bend helps stimulate the internal organs with the stretching and contracting of the deeper muscles. On the left side reside the stomach, small intestine and pancreas, and on the right reside gallbladder, liver and large intestine. As one goes into the lateral stretch, one side of the abdomen is compressed, which reduces the blood circulation in the area. This creates a ‘Squeeze and Release’ motion on the organs, which increases their efficiency once the blood circulation resumes. The organs on the extended side receive a stretch, which helps stimulate the stagnancy in organs.
4)herapy and Healing: Parighasana helps increase the immunity of the body in various ways. Firstly, as the chest is able to expand more than before, it helps increase the functioning of the respiratory system. This helps reduce the frequency and intensity of allergies, over a period of time. Secondly, it stimulates the lymphatic system as one moves the arm overhead, as the armpit houses lymph nodes, which play an integral part in the body's immunity. 
5) Chakra and Balancing: A wonderful practice which is a gentle heart opener, thus stimulating the Anahata Chakra (Heart Chakra), while ensuring balance in the first two chakras (Root and Sacral). The side bend helps to increase the prana moving from the heart towards the Third Eye Chakra, energizing the body. And at the time of releasing from the pose, there is downward flow of energy - apana vayu (removing the excess out) thus ensuring a balance in the energy - and ultimately balance in the first four chakras.","1) Injury: The following are the precautions to be taken during various injuries:
Knee Injury: In case of mild knee injuries (or rehab), one can use blanket or a rolled up mat underneath the knees. In case of serious knee injuries, this pose can be practiced with the chair, like done in Gate Pose on Chair
2) Ankle/Rib Cage Injury: In such cases, one must avoid doing the pose until the injury has healed fully.t this is because Gate Pose inherently forces the rib cage to open, which might worsen the symptoms or pain. For students with ankle injury, it is best to avoid this pose since it requires the ankle of the extended leg to bear weight, and balance. This might put undue pressure on the injured joint.
3) Shoulder Injury: For students suffering from injury in the shoulder joint, or the arms, this pose can be practiced by placing the hand on the hip (instead of taking the arm overhead).
4) Wear and Tear: Students recovering from any kind of wear and tear in the deeper tissues, like at the calves, hamstrings, gluteus, rotator cuff tear,etc., are all contraindications and the practice of Gate Pose should be avoided.
5) Heart Issues/Surgeries: Gate Pose helps stretch the diaphragm and heart muscles as well, hence people who have recently undergone heart surgeries, or been fitted with a pacemaker may find this uncomfortable. In such cases, this pose should be strictly avoided.
6) Hernia: People who are suffering or recovering from hernia issues and/or surgeries should not practice this pose as it will stretch the walls and muscles of the abdominal area. This could prove to be detrimental to recovery.",Parighasana
"1) Improves the functioning of the Adrenal Glands: In Bhekasana or Frog Pose, the deep stretch and pressure at the upper abdomen, while balancing in the pose activates the adrenal glands, located above the kidney. These glands help govern sudden bursts of energy and heat, like the fight or flight response.
2) Improves the functioning of the Pancreas: The pancreas are just below the stomach and helps in the secretion of digestive enzymes into the small intestine. This secretes the hormone insulin, and the pressure and stretch at the lower abdomen in Bhekasana (Frog Pose), helps in the proper secretion of this hormone.
3) Proper functioning of the Reproductive System: The deep stretch at the lower abdomen encourages the internal organs to function well and the reproductive organs too get activated, balancing the level of hormones within the human body.
4) Tightens the Quadriceps: The deep stretch at the Quadriceps, the upper thighs, during the practice of Frog Pose (Bhekasana), helps to not only open these muscles, but also helps to strengthen them and make them tight. These muscles play a great role for stronger looking legs which are beneficial for athletes.","1) Suffering from any health conditions related to the stomach: Best to avoid this pose if one is suffering with any conditions or issues related to the stomach or the intestine, as there will be pressure at this area while practicing Bhekasana II (Frog Pose II).
2) Not to be done when pregnant: Pressure at the abdomen during this posture may bring harm to the fetus, with less flow of oxygen and hence best to avoid this pose when pregnant.
3) If there is injury at the knee and the lower back: The knees are bent backwards in Bhekasana (Frog Pose), and there would be pressure at the lower back while balancing the body in this pose, so best to consult an expert when practicing this pose.
4) Watch the pressure at the ankle: While practicing Bhekasana or Frog Pose II, watch the ankles and don’t push them hard towards the floor, as that could injure the tissues around the ankles.
5) Go slow with the pressure at the hips and the shoulders: As this is an advance level pose, take it easy when it comes to the pressure at the hips and the shoulders, as flexing them plays a great role in balancing the body in this pose.",Bhekasana
"1) Blood circulation improves with the elongated spine: In Kurmasana, while the body goes in a forward fold taking the chest, abdomen and the pelvis towards the floor, the spine is elongated in this posture improving the circulation of blood flow. The flow of prana through the spine to other parts of the body becomes smooth opening the blocks.
2) Activates the abdominal organs improving digestion: With the massage around the entire abdominal area with the forward fold in Kurmasana, the internal organs too get activated, thus improving digestion, reducing problems related to kidney, and any problems related to liver.
3) Improves the flexibility of the spine: With the deep stretch and extension of the spine, the muscles around the upper back, the lower back, the neck and the head, contract, slowly improving the flexibility of the spine. With the elongation of the spine and the flow of prana in a smooth way, flexibility of the entire spine improves giving room for challenging poses.
4) Reduces the stiffness around the lower back relieving back aches: In Kurmasana, the flexibility of the back is very essential keeping in mind the flow of smooth breathing. With the muscles around the lower back activated, and when done carefully, the nerves related to the back aches get their share of massage and prana, thus reducing the pain related to lower back.
5) Reduces symptoms related to sciatic nerve: While the lower back in Tortoise Pose, extends, the largest nerve the sciatic nerve, which begins at the lower back and runs all through the buttocks and down the lower limbs gets a gentle massage. This massage, gives a comfort to the nerve and helps to reduce pain related to sciatica.
6) Cures Insomnia: Though Kurmasana requires a lot of flexibility as this pose is considered difficult, yet if done with support and with guidance, it acts as a great way to relax the entire nerves and calms the mind inducing sleep. Hence can be used therapeutically to heal insomnia.
","1) Not to overstrain the weak and very rigid muscles: Understanding the body and its limitations, becomes essential here with this deep stretch of the hamstrings and the spine. If the muscles around the lower back, the hips, the neck and the hamstrings are too tight and stiff, it is best to not overstrain them while trying to achieve the final pose of Kurmasana. Begin slow with awareness of the movement of the body.
2) Avoid when suffering from severe sciatica: No attempt should be made if one is suffering from sciatica where the symptoms are very severe, which makes if difficult to sit down. The pressure at the hip joints and the extension of the lumbar region will put more pressure to this nerve causing more harm to the entire leg. 3) Hence best to take guidance from an expert for the same.
Avoid if pregnant: While this pose brings fresh blood to the reproductive organs, yet there is pressure while going down in a forward fold from the hips, and hence to be avoided by pregnant women. The pressure at the lower abdomen may cause uneasiness causing breathing to be hard and fast.",Kurmasana
"1) The fundamental reason to practice this variation using a yoga strap helps beginners, who are new to yoga or those who have tight hips and hamstrings, or who may otherwise find it difficult to follow the base pose, Supta Padangusthasana. This facilitates the deeper opening of the legs muscles and makes the upper body; the shoulder blades, back, and head, remain firm and grounded.
2) Use of a yoga strap helps to improve alignment and posture to get an incredible stretch. This way the stretching becomes more effective and enjoyable.
3) At the intermediate level, the use of a yoga strap helps practitioners to deepen the practice and to hold the pose for a longer duration with ease. When practitioners are comfortable holding a pose with ease, their awareness automatically turns to the breath and the body parts involved; the core, pelvis, and abdominal muscles support the leg and the lower back to stay steady, and thus they learn to focus and connect with their breaths.
4) Once the body-breath connection is established, this practice at the advanced level encourages sthiram and sukham, which means the posture which is firm and pleasant. Also, when one releases the posture, one feels rested.
5) Included in restorative yoga sequence, in the practice of Reclined Big Toe Pose Straps, the hips, knees, ankles, and shoulders joints result in the extension and relaxation of the various muscles, tendons, and ligaments at these joints. The deeper the stretch, the better the stability of the joints and this becomes easier with the help of a yoga strap. Although, care should be taken while trying this pose for the first time, to avoid overstretching.
6) Included in the therapeutic yoga sequence, students who have injured knee, hamstrings, or calves, lower back pain, and need for the healing process, can consider Reclined Big Toe Pose Straps. The careful stretching of the leg with the support of a yoga strap can be of great help with the healing process of the injured muscles. This pose relieves one from sciatica and lumbago pain; gives a great relief to the pelvic region by aerating the area.
7)The practice of Reclined Big Toe Pose Straps is useful for women who have experienced symptoms during menstruation. The gentle massage of the reproductive organs while the muscles are in stretch helps ease the symptoms of menstruation.","1) 1Injury and Surgery: This pose should not be done by people with hamstring injuries, lower back injuries, or injury in the knee - a tear of the ligament, worn down joints. By taking the stretch deep when the lower back is hurting, one should avoid it or do it by bending the knees. Any unwanted pull of the lower back while in the pose may only damage the hip joints or the lower back muscles.
2) Physical Strength and Weak Body: Students with weak ankles and wrists need to avoid this pose. Also, students with weak musculoskeletal frames need to avoid this pose to avoid dislocation of joints. Students with herniated discs, diarrhea, or acute headache should avoid this pose. Students with spinal ailments like scoliosis, kyphosis, or severe back pain need to avoid this supine position, if their conditions are severe. Students with high blood pressure must raise their head and neck on a folded blanket or yoga mat.
3) Others: Senior citizens, pregnant women, or students from prolonged illness should take it slow and else better to practice Reclined Big Toe Straps One Leg Bent.",Supta Padangusthasana A Straps
"1.Internal organs have better toning improving their functions: The stretch at the entire abdominal muscles encourages a proper functioning of the internal organs, thus improving digestion too.
2.Improves the flexibility of the spine: In this Simple Pigeon Pose, the gentle stretch of the back taking the spine in a backbend, improves the flexibility slowly but surely. This pose acts as a preparatory pose to the complete Kapotasana, which is an advance level pose.
3.Reproductive Systems improves with improved blood circulation: With the improved flow of prana through the spine with the deep stretch in this Simple Pigeon Pose, it gives room for better blood flow and energy stimulating and improving the functioning of the reproductive organs
4. Activates the entire Endocrine System: The endocrine system which includes the pineal gland, pituitary gland, thyroid gland, adrenal gland and pancreas, gets stimulated with the deep stretch at the head, neck, chest and abdomen. The deep stretch of the muscles around these glands stimulates the entire endocrine system.","1.Go very slow if injured at the knee or hips: Taking guidance of an expert during the practice of Kapotasana which is the simple version here too is essential when suffering from injury at the knee or hips.
2.Taking support of cushion for a tight thigh is important: When placing the thigh in front of you in this pose, over pushing the thigh towards the floor can be harmful, hence it is always to go slow and take support for the thigh with cushions or blankets.
3.Go gentle if the hips are not ready yet: Pushing the hips towards the floor can do more harm when trying to learn this pose. The muscles around the hips, mainly the piriformis muscles located below the buttocks, are very delicate and are more than often not so flexible. Hence take guidance while doing so with the practice of this pose. Over stretching of these muscles could lead to sciatic nerve problems.",Ardha Kapotasana
"1.It builds strength and stability within the lower body and a strong base for the hips and spine.
2.Goddess Pose (Utkata Konasana) stimulates the pelvis, encouraging flow of prana for better functioning of the reproductive organs. Thus, this pose helps women in improving fertility and is also beneficial to those during childbirth.
3.With the practice of Goddess Pose, using the upper body efficiently will help in the maximum use of the diaphragm muscles. Breathing is more pronounced with the shoulders and arms opened up.
4.tudents can learn to focus on the body and the breathing process, thus building awareness.","1.Students recovering from shoulders, rib cage, hips, pelvis, knees, ankles and toes injuries should avoid the practice of Goddess Pose. Injury related to the muscles like hamstrings, quadriceps, calves, gluteus, pelvic floor, biceps and triceps, chest, groin, etc., are contraindications, and this practice should be done either with care or completely avoided assessing the injury.
2.Since the practice of Goddess Pose (Utkata Konasana) builds heat in the body, students with the history of blood pressure should avoid this practice, or better yet hold it against the wall and for a short duration.
3.Students having issues with the shoulders and hips, can practice the same with the support of the wall, or can choose to have a different hand position.
While this pose is good for pregnant women, care should be taken during the practice to not over exerting the pelvic area, especially during the last trimester.",Utkata Konasana
"1.Easy Boat Pose increases the spine-flexibility while reclining back by holding the position for longer duration as the space between the vertebrae relaxes. To raise the legs up in the air, like in Navasana, it needs not only stability but also flexibility that is gained during the practice of this pose.
2.he Easy Boat Pose helps to stimulate the internal organs like the stomach, Pancreas, kidneys, gallbladder, intestine, spleen, liver, and reproductive organs. This boat pose keeps the core healthy and a healthy spine. As a balance yoga pose, Easy Boat Pose teaches to balance the trunk while diving deep into a meditative state. This pose activates the manipura chakra and balances the practitioner’s emotions. It also enhances creativity.
","1.Injury and Surgery: Even though the Easy Boat Pose is a simple pose, it needs strength of the hips, core, spine, and shoulders. Therefore, in case of any recent injury or surgery at these areas, the pose should not be performed.
2.Physical Strength and Weak Body/ Lack of Body-Breath Connections: Students with weak shoulders, knee-joints structure, balancing or vertigo issues can avoid the pose. With severe back pain, the pose can be avoided. Without body-breath awareness yoga teachers should not introduce the pose to students as they may find instability in doing it.
3.Others: Pregnant women should avoid doing Easy Boat pose during pregnancy and during the first two days of the menstrual cycle as the abdominal pressure can be extremely high. Also, this pose can be a bit strenuous on the knees hence senior citizens can further modify the pose by placing a blanket under their hips.",Sahaja Navasana
"1.The flexing of the toes and the ankles in Skandasana (Half Squat Pose) helps to open and stretch these joints. The flexing helps to increase the flow of blood keeping the lower limbs strong.
2.When done in a flow like this variation Sahaja Ardha Malasana (Spontaneous Flowing Half Squat), builds on the core muscles. It helps use the abdominal muscles engaging them to help move the body in a flow from one side to another.
3.it helps to open the lower back stretching the gluteus maximus (buttocks) and the sacrum (lower spine). Stretching the base of the spine while engaging the core (pulling the belly in) acts as a great support for the entire spine keeping the lower back away from aches and pains.","The practice of Skandasana (Wide Legged Squat Over One Leg Pose) though and easy and comfortable pose that does not involve the upper body and focuses more at the ankles, hips and knees, yet while teaching the same, yoga teachers should keep the precautions in mind. These are explained below:

Some of the contraindications would be similar to Malasana (Garland Pose).
Injury of the knee, ankle, or hip joint is a precaution and the practice should be avoided. Injury to the ligaments or tissues of the knees, ankles, or any part of the lower body is again a contraindication and should be completely avoided. The reason, the weight of the body on the balancing ankles, the deep stretch of the extended leg, the pressure of the knee while extended as well as taking the weight of the body, will only create more tensions to the ligaments and tissues.",Skandasana
"1.Parighasana helps increase the immunity of the body in various ways. Firstly, as the chest is able to expand more than before, it helps increase the functioning of the respiratory system. This helps reduce the frequency and intensity of allergies, over a period of time.
2.it stimulates the lymphatic system as one moves the arm overhead, as the armpit houses lymph nodes, which play an integral part in the body's immunity. This helps promote lymphatic flow in the body, which contains antibodies.
3.A wonderful practice which is a gentle heart opener, thus stimulating the Anahata Chakra (Heart Chakra), while ensuring balance in the first two chakras (Root and Sacral). The side bend helps to increase the prana moving from the heart towards the Third Eye Chakra, energizing the body. And at the time of releasing from the pose, there is downward flow of energy - apana vayu (removing the excess out) thus ensuring a balance in the energy - and ultimately balance in the first four chakras.","1.People who are suffering or recovering from hernia issues and/or surgeries should not practice this pose as it will stretch the walls and muscles of the abdominal area. This could prove to be detrimental to recovery.
2.Women in the third trimester of their pregnancy must refrain from practicing this pose as it may put pressure on their uterus, ribs and lower back.
3.or students suffering from injury in the shoulder joint, or the arms, this pose can be practiced by placing the hand on the hip (instead of taking the arm overhead).
4.In such cases, one must avoid doing the pose until the injury has healed fully.t this is because Gate Pose inherently forces the rib cage to open, which might worsen the symptoms or pain. For students with ankle injury, it is best to avoid this pose since it requires the ankle of the extended leg to bear weight, and balance. This might put undue pressure on the injured joint.",Parighasana
"1.The contraction of the muscles around the hips and the lower back, while in the backbend helps with both the toning and flexibility of these muscles. Muscles that stretch and contract improve its range of motion over time. Hence you can say, Ardha Chakrasana improves the flexibility of the hips and lower back (spine).
2.This simple standing backbend can be a great practice to open the heart, and hence sometimes is used for the better functioning of the heart. The practice also regulates the blood pressure.
3.Lungs and Respiratory: The stretching of the muscles around the chest and the diaphragm, breathing to the maximum with the lungs is encouraged. This stretching improves the functioning of the lungs reducing any respiratory disorders.
4.Balance and awareness: The backbend in Ardha Chakrasana (Half Wheel Pose), requires one to be aware of the body, the breath, and the balance. Hence improves balance with both the body and the mind. It creates awareness which is essential for balance.","You should avoid this pose (or reach out to an experienced teacher), if you have any of the following:
Neck injury
Heart issues such as high blood pressure
Vertigo",Anuvittasana
"1.Core muscles are stretched and strengthened with the practice of Rocking and Rolling yoga pose. Yoga Sequence for Core
2.Sleep is encouraged with the practice of Rocking and Rolling, and hence when done just before going to bed, it is said to relax the nervous system encouraging good sleep. Nighttime Yoga Sequence
3.Releasing of unwanted gas at the various joints are taken care making sure the body feels light and fresh.
4.Reduces the extra fat all around the hips and the tummy with the practice of Rocking and Rolling yoga pose, thus toning the body.
5.Warms up the body, and hence should be done as part of the warm up series of yoga poses. The warming up of the muscles before entering into the practice of major yoga poses keeps the muscles and tendons safe and away from injury.","As the Rocking and Rolling yoga pose puts pressure of the entire back, certain precautions are to be kept in mind with this practice. Some of these are mentioned below:

1. Injury of the back, hip and the neck.
2. Pregnant Women.
3. Surgery of any internal organs.
4. Slip Disc.
5. Spondylitis.
6. If severe pain is felt while doing the Rocking and Rolling yoga pose, at the base of the spine or at the hips, then one should refrain and relax completely.
Blood Pressure patients should avoid this practice of Rocking and Rolling. Guidance on the same should be taken from a yoga teacher.",Jhulana Lurhakanasana
"1.mproves the flexibility of the spine
2. Improves the prana in the body while flexing the spine
3. Relieves tensions around the lower back, middle back, neck and shoulders
4. Engages the core muscles to the maximum, making it strong
5. Strengthens the arms, shoulders and the wrists
6. Strengthens the hip joints, the knee joints and the shoulder joints
7. Gently massages the abdominal muscles, thereby improving digestion
8. Great pose to reduce stress, insomnia and encourages good sleep
9. Improves the body posture
10. A great pose to reduce symptoms related to PMS
A good pose to practice for Prenatal and Postnatal
11. Considered a great foundation pose for most advance backbend poses
12. ike most poses, the Cow Pose brings awareness of the body and the breath
Anyone suffering from Fibromyalgia can practice this pose in a restorative way","A few things to keep in mind while practicing Bitilasana or Cow Pose, to avoid further injury to the body are given below.

1. Injury of the shoulders, wrists, neck, hip, knee and the back
2. Blood Pressure
3. Migraine
4. Spondylitis
5. Arthritis of the knee and wrists",Bitilasana
"1. Ear Pressure Pose like in Halasana and Sarvangasana have the entire back stretched and lengthened, however, the muscles that are active in Ear Pressure Pose are the pelvis (they are in contraction), the core (the squeezing action helps to keep the hips stable), neck muscles as they in addition to stretching the back neck and contracting the front neck, they take the weight of the body along with the shoulders. Thus, with the above mentioned body parts, the joints like the hips, shoulders, and spine are equally active to support the entire body.
2. he extra weight around the hips and thighs can be slowly shredded with regular practice. It is one of the most powerful poses for regulating the function of the thyroid gland because of an intense throat lock and also treating ear problems.
3. Additionally, the long hold impacts the shape of the spine, hips, and shoulers, further improving the posture, impacting the breath-body-mind relationships.","1. students with any kind of injury in knees, back, hips, or shoulders, most importantly, or otherwise related to any other part of the body, including muscles and tissues should completely be stopped from practicing the pose. In addition, any old or recent surgery to any part of the body is also contraindicated, and the practice should be discouraged.
2. Other physiological conditions related to the blood vessels, eyes, migraine, high blood pressure, weak digestion or respiration system, are also contraindicated. Hence, best to refrain the students from this practice.
3. Women during their menstruation, pregnancy should avoid this practice irrespective of how physically active they are. The energy flow (prana flow) should not be disturbed during such mentioned conditions.",Karnapidasana
"1. he deeper tissues, tendons, and ligaments at the wrists, abdominal area, spine, and the knees are stretched and stimulated. Building strength with these tissues supports the large muscles, thereby keeping the strength of the arms, shoulders, spine, abdominal muscles, and core muscles.
2. Students who are bodybuilders, weight lifters, tennis players, or those who require the use of elbows, wrists, and arms in their game, or otherwise as part of their profession can benefit from the practice of this pose acting both as a warm-up, as well as a recovery.
3. With the practice of Lolasana (Pendant Pose), the arms, abdomen, gluteus, chest, and thighs get toned since they tighten to hold the body in balance.","1. Students suffering from blood pressure, a migraine, heart related ailments, or any ailment related to the internal organs.
2. Arm balance like Lolasana (Pendant Pose) challenges the core muscles, the shoulders, hips, wrists, pelvic muscles, and the entire back, hence any injury to any part of the body (muscles and joints) is a contraindication. Students who are recovering from a surgery should avoid this practice.
3. Women who are pregnant, or who are in their postnatal stage, should avoid this practice as Lolasana (Pendant Pose) puts too much pressure in the pelvis.",Lolasana
"1. Antioxidants are thrown out efficiently.
2. Helps to reduce stress and anxiety.
3. Room for fresh supply of air as the body expels out everything.
4. Keeps the diaphragm active.
5. Increases immunity.
6. The entire body comes to a state of silence, as there is no prana that is moving.
7. This silence calms the body and the mind physiologically and psychologically.
8. Prana moves from the base of the spine upwards, and when there is no inhalation or exhalation - the root of the spine also gets to be calm. This helps with meditation.
9. Helps to control the state of mind, and this is important for the practice of Meditation.","1. Pregnant Women: Holding of breath should be avoided by women who are pregnant.
2. Blood Pressure: Those suffering from blood pressure should refrain from practicing the retention of breath.
3. Bahya Kumbhaka: The retention of breath after exhalation should not be attempted unless one has control over the other steps (inhale-retain-exhale).
4. Trauma Sensitive: The lungs and the diaphragm feel tight when practicing Bahya Kumbhaka. Therefore it is best to avoid the practice of Sama Vritti (Square Breathing) completely by those suffering from trauma as they will feel uneasy.",Sama Vritti
"1) Stretches, Strengthens, Lengthens: The intense stretch of the legs with the feet wide apart opens the hamstrings and quadriceps, thus increasing muscle strength and elasticity. Prasarita Padottanasana helps keep the feet firm and grounded on the floor using the calf muscles and the flexing of the ankles. There is a close relationship between calf muscles and foot strength. The toning of the calf muscles gives better support for the feet, and the firm placing of the foot helps stretch the calf muscles while increasing flexibility after that.
2) Flexibility and Range of Motion: All the muscles of the body- the shoulders, chest, abdomen, hips, back, and legs stretch in this pose, thereby increasing the range of motion for better flexibility. The primary stretch is at the legs, but the secondary stretch happens at the spine. Deep stretches of the inner tissues of the legs occur. The elongated spine creates sustainable space between the vertebrae. Due to this, the body flexibility is improved.
3) Chest, Diaphragm, and Breath: This pose is an inverted yoga pose as the head comes below the heart. Going against gravity helps the deoxygenated blood go through your veins back to the heart. It reduces the effort by the venous system to pump blood back to the heart. This pose relaxes the heart by increasing the efficiency of the Arterio-Venous Arcade in the body. The breath is rhythmic and at its natural pace. The heart is relaxed with the increased venous capacity, and the back of the lungs expands due to the upper body stretch.
4) Awareness and Focus (Concentration): In this forward bend with compressing of the abdomen and the chest, breathing can be a challenge if there is no awareness. Hence, being aware of one’s breath with the stretching makes the practice more accessible. The alignment of the hips, foot and distance between the feet in the pose is a calculated move. The student must spread the leg according to their height. Such an alignment needs focus and body awareness. The practitioner has to figure out the tightness of their body, their body height, and then flow into the pose. Any kind of jerk is injurious. So the conscious knowledge of the body capacity with alignment increases concentration and awareness.","1) Injury and Surgery: Students with injuries at the ankles, wrists, knees, and any sprain at the neck and shoulders need to avoid this pose. Students with any recent surgeries of the knees, hips, ankles and wrists should avoid this pose.
2) Lack of Body-Breath Connections: The student needs to understand their hamstring flexibility, distance, and breath awareness before attempting the pose. The student needs to exhale and take the forward stretch from the hips. If students lack this coordination, they can damage their knees and hips. It can tear the hamstring muscle.
3) Physical Strength and Weak Body: People with tight Hamstrings, weak ankles, and knees need to avoid this pose. Since there is a blood rush to the brain, Anybody having high blood pressure, vertigo, and migraine should avoid this pose. People with spinal disorders like herniated disks, advanced cervical-spondylosis and lumbar spondylitis, scoliosis, and kyphosis need to avoid this pose as there is a deep lengthening of the spine. Heart patients, Who have undergone heart surgeries need to avoid this kind of intense inversions.",Prasarita Padottanasana
"1) People who are physically and mentally exhausted (Army men, Wounded Soldiers, etc.)
2) People who are emotionally depleted (Addicts, Chronically Stressed & Insomniacs, Health Care Workers)
3) People who are tired of a passive lifestyle (Traumatic disorders, Psychological baggage, Students in high stress studies)
4)People who are battling depression & anxiety (Depression, Anxiety, Marriage & Relationship issues)
5)People dealing with health issues & pain management (Cancer patients, Auto immune diseases)","Yoganidrasana is contraindicated for those suffering or diagnosed with severe depression, severe trauma and severe mental health conditions. Those diagnosed with above issues could practice yoga nidra only after due consultation with their doctors as the practice can sometimes worsen the condition as very deep emotions can surface out during the practice and the teacher may not be able to handle such students. Hence it is good to always check with the students if they have any underlying mental health issues so that the teacher can then make an informed decision.",Yoganidrasana
"1) A great benefit for athletes with the deep stretch at the leg muscles: In this Simple Pigeon Pose with one leg stretched behind, the muscles open up at the legs giving athletes a great advantage in improving and strengthening the legs.
2) Improves blood circulation: The flow of prana becomes easy in this pose, with the opening at the base of the spine. This stretch with proper breathing, not only improves the flow of prana, but ensure a good flow of blood along with oxygen within the entire body.
3) A great hip opener: Most of us struggle with the non flexibility of our hips and all the muscles around it, but with the practice of this Simple Pigeon Pose, it can be a great start with the opening of the hip, ensuring the alignment of the hips while practicing this pose is accurate.
4) A great pose for toning the hips and sides of the back: A repeated practice of this pose, tones the hips and the sides of the back, removing the excess fat with the gentle stretch of the abdomen and the lower back.
5) Improves the flexibility of the spine: In this Simple Pigeon Pose, the gentle stretch of the back taking the spine in a backbend, improves the flexibility slowly but surely. This pose acts as a preparatory pose to the complete Kapotasana, which is an advance level pose.","1) Go very slow if injured at the knee or hips: Taking guidance of an expert during the practice of Kapotasana which is the simple version here too is essential when suffering from injury at the knee or hips.
2) Taking support of cushion for a tight thigh is important: When placing the thigh in front of you in this pose, over pushing the thigh towards the floor can be harmful, hence it is always to go slow and take support for the thigh with cushions or blankets.
3) Go gentle if the hips are not ready yet: Pushing the hips towards the floor can do more harm when trying to learn this pose. The muscles around the hips, mainly the piriformis muscles located below the buttocks, are very delicate and are more than often not so flexible. Hence take guidance while doing so with the practice of this pose. Over stretching of these muscles could lead to sciatic nerve problems.",Ardha Kapotasana
"1) Strengthens the entire body with the use of the muscles like; biceps and triceps, core muscles, gluteus, and pelvic floor muscles.
2) Improves digestion and tones the abdominal muscles supporting the internal organs.
3) Improves the core strength with proper practice of bandhas, mainly Uddhiyana Bandha, but done at an advanced level.
4) Builds awareness of the body and breath, especially the central nervous system, which is essential to keep the body in good health.
5) Encourages better stability, balance, concentration, and self-confidence.
6) Helps in regulating and stimulating the adrenal gland, which is essential to keep the body healthy, happy, and also helps fight stress in the most natural way. And when stress is in control, both the body and mind remain calm and free.","1) Injury to the hips, knees, wrists, shoulders, and back is a contraindication, hence best to avoid the practice of Kukkutasana (Cock Pose).
2) Students with issues like Carpal Tunnel Syndrome, arthritis, blood pressure, spondylitis, etc., should avoid this practice.
3) Pregnant women should avoid this, and even those who are in menstruation.
4) Any student who is suffering from a migraine, or has issues related to the heart should avoid the practice of Kukkutasana (Cock Pose).",Kukkutasana
"1) Activation of the Adrenal Glands and Pancreas: The deep forward bend and clasping of hands gripping the thighs from behind, puts pressure on the lower abdomen while going forward with the torso. This pressure at the lower abdominal muscles helps the internal organs at the lower abdomen to function better. It helps especially with the secretion of various hormones by the activation of adrenal glands and the pancreas.
2) Better Functioning of the Reproductive System: The pressure in Marichyasana or the Sage Twist Pose at the lower abdomen also involves the activation of the reproductive organs due to the pressure at the pelvic floor muscles. This activation further improves the blood circulation at the reproductive organs. This is important for women who want to strengthen the pelvic floor muscles for easy conception and delivery.
3) Activation of the Thyroid Glands: In Marichyasana, the placing of the chin on the knee, and the slight bend at the neck upwards, creates room for the extension of the neck and activates the thyroid gland to some extent. This gland controls the hormone levels within the body and creates a good balance for better living.
4) Stronger base of the Spine and Sacrum: The grip of the thigh with interlocked wrists puts pressure at the hip in this pose. This pressure at the hip creates a sense of deep balance and ensures that the alignment of the hips and the base of the spine are perfect. This further strengthens the base of the spine and sacrum, and gives great support to the entire spine.
5) Calms the Nervous System & Improves Focus: All forward bends, including Marichyasana, helps to rejuvenate the body while calming the mind. The practice of Marichyasana, though it requires some flexibility at the lower back to go forward completely, brings the entire body and mind to rest, and calms the entire nervous system.","1) High Blood Pressure: The forward bend requires the right kind of breathing - slow and deep - and for someone suffering from high blood pressure, the breathing may go out of control, and cause more pressure to the heart with the compression in this pose. Hence people with high blood pressure should avoid the practice of this pose, unless it is done under the guidance of an expert.
2) Menstrual Cycle: Though this pose massages the lower abdomen, and improves the functioning of the reproductive system, it is best avoided during menstruation. This is because a lot of pressure will be felt at the pelvic area, and cause irritation and heavy bleeding.
3) Breathing problems/any other kind of allergy: The forward fold may make breathing difficult, if one has not understood the need of smooth breathing. This could make it uneasy for anyone suffering from asthma or any other kind of breathing problem. Hence, learning to breathe the right way becomes essential to enjoy the benefits of this pose even when having asthma.",Marichyasana
"1) Aids in Digestion: This pose helps to relieve symptoms of gas and aids in digestion.
2) Spine gets its maximum stretch: This pose improves the posture of the spine which works as an advantage for long hours of meditation or pranayama.
3) Mental focus: As this pose improves the posture of the spine keeping the body upright and strong it helps in improving mental focus during pranayama and meditation.
4) Cures rheumatic pains in the knees: This pose with the flexing of the knees and the hips help in therapeutically curing rheumatic pains in the knees.
5) Curing flat feet: With the stretching of the ankles and the foot, proper arches will be formed thus curing flat feet.
6) Flexibility of the ankles: Here as the ankles gets its maximum stretch the flexibility of the foot around the ankles improves and any pain at the heels with long hours of standing brings great relaxation to the feet.
7) The circulation of blood improves for the entire leg","Hero Pose or Virasana is a comfortable seated pose for meditation or pranayama, but there is immense stretch at the knees and the ankles while seated, hence can be a big risk if one is very stiff at the knees and the ankles or is down with an injury at the knees or ankles. A proper guidance from an experienced teacher is always helpful in such situations.",Virasana
"1) Builds muscles strength at the arms, shoulders, chest, abdomen, core, hips, spine and hamstrings
2) Works well in activating the internal organs while strengthening the abdominal muscles.
3) As this pose is dedicated to Sage Koundinya, the practitioner builds self confidence on his own body and mind.
4) Brings awareness and connection to the body as the focus is more towards balance.
5) A great hip opener at an advance level.
6) A great pose to master for to help with meditation, as meditation requires focus and stability.
7) While working on the core muscles, this pose helps to keep a strong and flexible back.
8) Works on the overall strength of the body, thus encouraging good blood flow while also activating the various systems and functions of the body.","1) As the weight of the body falls on the wrists and the shoulders, this pose - Twisted One Legged Arm Balance pose, is to be avoided completely when there is injury.
2) Not good when suffering at the initial stages of Carpel Tunnel Syndrome, as it would get worse.
3) Any injury to the hips, lower back again is to be avoided.
4) Arthritis of the wrists, arms or shoulders, should be avoided.
5) Arm balance requires understanding of the movement of the body and its limitations, and hence this pose should not be done, when the body is not ready.",Koundinyasana
"1) Awareness and Focus: As Virabhadrasana I is compared to a warrior, the practice of this pose, if done with perfect awareness, helps in building stability and stamina, and also helps to gain self-confidence.
2) Alignment and Posture: Warrior Pose I is an excellent pose to learn about the body in terms of knee and ankle alignment. How one keeps the back foot impacts the stability and ability of the pelvis to turn forward. The breath-led spine and arms lengthening upward movement are important for feeling stable in the posture. The knee and ankle joint can be protected by checking if the knee is pointing in the same direction as the second and third toes.
3) Energizing, De-stressing, Relaxing: With the deep stretch of the arms above your head in Virabhadrasana I or Warrior Pose I, the shoulders and the neck get their equal share of stretch, reducing the stiffness. This reduction of stiffness also improves the energy levels of the body, thus making the body feel completely light.
4) Stimulation and Organs: With the muscles being activated, including the abdominal muscles, the digestive system and the reproductive system improve in their functions, thus reducing indigestion and problems related to the reproductive system.
5) Therapeutic, Healing and Ailments: The expansion of the diaphragm improving the respiratory system helps with asthma patients. The flexing of the hips and the entire leg work from the base of the spine, creating a better movement of the nerve, including the sciatic nerve. The building of stamina and stability with awareness of the body brings in fresh energy to help reduce symptoms related to insomina.","1) Students should avoid this pose in case of balance difficulties or an injury to the hip, knees, back, or shoulders. Someone with recent surgery in these areas should also avoid doing this posture until they get clearance from their physicians.
2) If there are any injuries or existing weaknesses in the neck, the students can be advised to keep the chin tucked in and neck in line with the spine as shown here.
3) At complete beginners level, students can be advised to practice the Warrior I Pose with hands either at the waist as illustrated in Warrior I Hands On Hips Heels On Floor or positioned at heart instead of raising arms for stability.
4) Lack of Body-Breath Connections: In this posture, multiple body movements are at play. It is nearly impossible to hold the posture if there is lack of awareness of the body and breath. For example, too much pushing of the back foot into the mat can disturb the balance and too much lowering of hips can cause strain on the knees and hyper aching of the lower back can strain the spine. These alignments can only be examined and corrected if there is an understanding of how breath impacts the body.",Virabhadrasana
"1) Tones the Abdominal muscles: The pressing of the tummy towards the thighs and the pressure of the fist placed deep into the tummy area, creates the expansion and contraction of the muscles with breathing, thus working on also toning them.
2) Tones the shoulder muscles: The expansion of the chest and the contraction of the abdominal muscles plays a great role in toning of the shoulders.
3) Cures Diabetes: The pressure on the abdominal muscles activates the pancreas, thus increasing the quantity of insulin production. And this can help in reducing or maintaining the sugar levels in the body.
4) Tones the belly, thighs and hips: This pose, Mandukasana III helps in toning the extra belly fat along with the fat around the thighs and hips.
5) Blood Circulations improves around the heart and the chest: The expansion and contraction of the muscles around the chest with deep breathing while it is compressed towards the thighs, creates the flow of fresh blood thus improving in the circulation too.","1) Women who are pregnant should completely avoid this pose, due to pressure at the lower abdomen.
2) Any kind of ulcer in the body more so with peptic ulcers, one should avoid this pose. Practicing this pose will create more indigestion and pain in the upper abdomen.
3) Any kind of surgery undertaken around the abdomen, will make this pose uncomfortable and hence should be taken precautions while practicing this pose even if it has been years since the surgery.
4) Anyone who is weak at the knees and finds it difficult to put pressure on the knees would have to avoid this pose.
5) Not to be practiced when in full stomach, a good 4 hours of gap between the meals and the practice of this pose should be given. For better results one should practice this pose early morning hours in empty stomach.",Mandukasana
"1. Exercises Facial Muscles: The roaring of the Lion pose (Simhasana) provides a good exercise to the facial muscles. It therefore maintains the firmness and luster of the facial skin.
2. Soothes Eyes: It is said that the practice of this posture brings smoothing effect to the eyes and helps in reducing eye strain.
3. Stronger Voice: This yoga pose helps in voice-related difficulties, throat related problems, and is good for singers.
4. Rejuvenates Face: This pose improves circulation of blood to the face.
5. Improves Digestion: As the abdomen is pulled in, it aids in good digestion.
6. Improves Carotid Sinus Nerves Functioning: This posture with the mouth wide open, aids in better functioning of the carotid sinus nerve.
7. Improves Thyroid and Parathyroid Glands: This pose also aids in the functioning of the thyroid and parathyroid glands.
8. Calms Mind: This pose brings calmness to the mind by removing the stress through the roaring sound of the lion.","Recent or chronic injury to the knees, face, neck or tongue.","Simhasana
"
"1. Sitali Pranayama cools the body and is best done after the practice of daily yoga poses, bringing balance in the temperature of the body. Daily Yoga
Sitali Pranayama helps to reduce the blood pressure in the body when done with guidance from a yoga teacher. Yoga for High Blood Pressure
2. As this breathing cools the body temperature, it controls the parasympathetic and somatic nervous system and hence beneficial for those suffering from anxiety related issues, including trauma. Trauma Sensitive Yoga
3. Helps in heart related diseases and can be practiced along with heart opening series of yoga poses for better results. Heart Opening Sequence
4. As it plays a great role in the endocrine system, it keeps the internal organs like stomach, liver, spleen etc, clean from toxins.","With the practice of Sitali Pranayama, certain precautions are to be kept in mind for safety. They are mentioned in brief below.


1. Best to avoid if suffering from blood pressure.
2. Not to be done if suffering from migraine.
3. Best not to hold the breath within if having problems related to the heart.",Sitali
"1. Swooning Pranayama when done without too much emphasis on holding the internal breath longer for those who are new to this practice, can still gain from it. The conscious use of the intercostal muscles, chest, and rib cage encourages the lungs to work efficiently .
2.the body switches from a ‘reaction’ to a logical and rational ‘response’ in times of emotional stress, it helps one deal with negative emotions such as tension, anger in response to the mental pressure. For this reason, the Swooning Breath can be used in Therapy yoga, for people suffering from anger management issues, and/or depression.
3.",No contraindications,Murcha Pranayama
"1. In Hamsasana the muscles of the arms, legs, hips, abdomen, and shoulders are engaged, especially the gluteus maximus and the biceps triceps. With repeated practice of engaging these various muscles, the flexibility is improved thereby also strengthening them. The wrists, forearms, shoulders, abdominal muscles, and core muscles are gain better strength and stability, preparing for challenging poses.
2. The pressure against the abdominal wall from the elbows along with the weight of the body, puts pressure in this cavity. This causes one to contract the abdominal muscles and strengthen them, stimulating the organs, especially the stomach.","1. students with any kind of injury to any muscles, ligaments, joints, or otherwise should refrain from this practice. It is mandatory to do warm-up practices for the wrists, shoulders, and abdomen before attempting Swan Pose if certain joints are weak and prone to injury. 
2. he alignment of Hamsasana requires the elbows to be placed right above the abdomen - putting a certain amount of pressure on the uterus as well. This can be extremely unsafe during pregnancy, postnatal, or menstruation, hence must be strictly avoided.
3. Students suffering from high blood pressure, hernia, IBD (Inflammatory Bowel Disease), IBS (Irritable Bowel Syndrome), heart conditions, problems with kidney or liver, suffering from a migraine, or anything that causes discomfort with the breathing should refrain from Hamsasana (Swan Pose).",Hamsasana
"Katichakrasana is good for relieving constipation as this yoga strengthens and improves the flexibility of the spine and waist. Good for arm and leg muscles and also opens up the neck, shoulders thereby strengthens the abdominal muscles.

","1. This practice should not be done when there is any injury, pain, swelling to any part of the spine and any muscles, ligaments, or tissues related to the injury. This practice should be completely avoided.
2. While this practice is extremely good for the abdomen even during third trimester, yet students who have an history of miscarriage, or are requested by their docs to take it easy, should avoid this practice.
3. Surgery to any internal organ is a contraindication, and should be avoided. Even during the healing period, it is always safe to avoid this practice, as one may not be sure of the internal healing of the stiches related to the surgery.
4. Breathing is very important especially in a twist, and if students are still having trouble in breathing smooth, then, avoid holding this posture and practice this Ardha Kati Chakrasana in a dynamic way.
5. If students have severe issues with acidity, then, the instructions would be; breath deep, lift the spine, and then twist, exhale. Then, breath deep, lift the spine and chest, twist back, and exhale. Since with acidity, the tendency to get cramps during the twist at the rib cage or the abdomen is possible. To avoid this, it is best to go slow with the twist, if wanting to practice this pose.",Katichakrasana
"Provides a positive effect on the nerves and muscles of the thighs, knees, shoulders, arms and neck.
The pelvic organs and muscles are massaged.
Provides equal stretch to the whole spine and bot the arm and leg muscles.
All the vertebrae and joints are pulled away from each other so that the pressure between them is balanced.
All the spinal nerves are stretched and toned.
Useful for relieving flatulence.","People with knee problems or sciatica should practice with care.
People with very high blood pressure arteriosclerosis should practice under guidance.",Vayu Nishkasana
"1. In Gorakshasana, as the body is entirely balanced on the knees, the posture is all about maintaining the integrity of the body. Keeping the spine and thighs straight with the folded feet this asana provides a sense of balance.
2. Goraksasana provides flexibility to leg muscles by stretching them intensely. It also improves the elasticity and strength of the leg joints. It provides toned and stronger legs.
3. This asana tones the reproductive organs and improves their functioning. This activates the sexual organs and maintains sexual health.
3. Gorakshasana exercises the abdominal organs by improving the blood flow to the lower abdomen. This benefits the digestive organs. It has therapeutic action against Irritable Bowel Syndrome (IBS), and gastritis.","1. Do not hunchback while holding the pose.
2. While going into the pose and holding cowherd pose, the shoulders should be relaxed.
3. Avoid practicing gorakshasana if there is an issue with feet and leg joints.
4. If you are suffering from knee pain, then do not practice this asana.
5. People with sciatica and other lower spinal pain should not practice gorakshasana",Gorakshasana
"1. The dynamic range of movements of the involved joints and muscles in the Noose Pose are gradually improved with repeated practice and when the pose is held longer. 
","Students who cannot balance their weight while in Pasasana should practice other yoga balance poses like toe balance yoga poses in seated position in order to gain confidence. The reason, since Noose Pose is hard on the body (joints and muscles) students with issues related to spondylitis (pressure in the muscles of the spine, including neck), IBD (Inflammatory Bowel Disease) , arthritis (related to the hips, knees, ankles or shoulders), diastasis recti (not safe because of the squeezing action), blood pressure (as the twisting action puts pressure to the heart and lungs, along with the calf muscles that are contracted - stopping the flow of blood back to the heart), or weak immune system, are all contraindicated.",Pasasana
"1) In Kaki mudra, the lips are pursed to resemble the beak of a crow. The inhaled air stimulates the wall of the mouth and pharynx. This activates the digestive secretions.
2) Kaki Mudra cools the body.
3) This mudra gives the benefits of Nasikagra Dhristi as well because the attention is held on the tip of the nose.
4) It eliminates many illnesses and keeps the body healthy.
5) This mudra is good for the skin and reduces wrinkles on the face.
6) The ancient yogis created this mudra after observing the crows. The crow lives for long number of years with good health. This mudra enhances health as well as longevity.","1) Unlike sitali pranayama, only lips are pursed in kaki mudra, the tongue should be relaxed inside the mouth.
2) Do not practice it in case of depression or low blood pressure.
3) Do not try this mudra if you are suffering from chronic constipation.",kakimudra
"1) Kumbhakasana strengthens the shoulders and arms.
2) It strengthens the muscles along the spine.
3) It tightens the abdominal muscles.
4) It helps to build stamina and endurance",Those suffering from wrist or shoulder injury should not perform Kumbhakasana or the Plank pose. Also those having carpal tunnel syndrome should avoid this asana. Such practitioners can do a variation of plank pose where the weight of the body is supported by the entire forearms rather than the palms,kumbhakasana
This asana can be done as a relaxation pose between other asanas or it can be relaxation method when you are tired. You can be in this asana for a prolonged period of time if you are tired after a workout. It gives deep relaxation to the shoulders and the spine.,"1) Pregnant women should avoid this pose: The pressure at the abdomen may not be safe and hence women who are deep into their pregnancy should avoid this pose.
2) Someone suffering from problems related to stomach: Stomach disorders which are severe can bring more discomfort with the practice of Makarasan as the abdomen gets pushed towards the floor while breathing, leading to over contraction of the muscles.
3) Avoid if blood pressure is too high: For someone who is new to yoga practice and is suffering from high blood pressure, may find it difficult to follow the instructions related to Makarasana or Crocodile Pose, as the breathing plays an important role. If the breathing is not smooth, pressure builds up causing more pressure with the arteries.",makarasan
"1) Malasana helps to open up the hips joint and groin muscles.
2) It mildly stretches the lower hamstring muscles around the ankles.
3) Malasana stretches the muscles of the back and neck.
4) It tones the organs in the abdomen thereby improving digestion and metabolism.
5) Malasana can be practiced by women during their initial and middle stages of pregnancy. It opens up the pelvis and aids healthy natural child birth. But, avoid doing it during the late stages of pregnancy as it may trigger labor pain.","1) Injury and Surgery: Students recovering from shoulders, wrists, elbows, rib cage, lower back, hips, or pelvis injuries, or who have undergone any abdominal surgery should avoid this pose. This pose brings a tremendous amount of pressure on knees and ankles, hence students with an injury at the knee or ankle should also avoid this pose.
2) Physical Strength and Weak Body: Students with recent or chronic lower back or knee pain, ligament tear at the knee or ankle, knee-arthritis, a weak bone density, severe sciatica, hip replacement surgery, or any other condition that can bring discomfort or pain should avoid this pose. For students who are on their toes and unable to lower their heels due to lack of flexibility or otherwise, a block under the hips or a folded blanket under the heels should always be welcomed. 3) Students experiencing dizziness, vertigo, or nausea should refrain from this pose. Students with tight hips or groins can practice hip opening practices like Happy Baby Pose (Ananda Balsana), Extended Child Pose (Prasarita Balasana), or Frog Pose Variation.",malasana
"1) Marjariasana loosens up the spine and make it flexible. It gets rid of stiffness in the back muscles.
2) It is good for those suffering from Spondylitis and slipped disk.
Marjariasana also has an indirect effect on the organs of the lower abdomen, including the digestive system, intestines and the reproductive organs. It gives a good massage and stretch to these organs.","1) Injury of the shoulders, wrists, neck, hip, knee and the back
2) Blood Pressure
3) Migraine
4) Spondylitis
5)Arthritis of the knee and wrists",marjariasan
"1) This is an excellent relaxation pose. It can be used for sleeping as well.
2) It stretches the abdominal region and relieves constipation.
3) Matsya kridasana gives a gentle pull at the waist and helps to reduce waistline fat.
4) It relaxes the lower back and helps in relieving sciatic pain.","1) Abnormal Blood Pressure: Individuals suffering from high or low blood pressure should avoid this posture.
2) Neck Injury: Neck injuries or any part of the lower back or middle back can make it difficult to practice this Fish Pose and hence should be avoided.
3) Migraine: Migraine patients may find this pose challenging but, if practiced, should be done slowly with the guidance of a yoga teacher.
4) Spondylitis: Care should be taken if practiced by someone who is suffering from spondylitis. Preferably should be avoided if it is severe. But if spondylitis is in initial stages then with proper guidance of a yoga teacher Fish Pose (Matsyasana) can be practiced.",matsya Kridasana
"1) Padahastasana makes the body very flexible. It stretches the back and leg muscles.
2) It helps to eliminate excess belly fat.
3) It improves digestion and reduces constipation. It eliminates many stomach ailments.
4) It makes the spine flexible and tones the nerves.","1) Avoid this pose if suffer from any hip injury.
2) Those with Vertigo should be cautious whule performing this asana.",padahastasana
"1) Padangusthasana gives a good stretch to the hamstring muscles.
2) It stretches the back muscles, the calf and the leg muscles.
3) It tones the organs in the abdomen and improves digestion.
4) It relaxes the body and mind.
5) The stretch is good for the organs like liver and kidneys.","1) This pose should be avoided by those who have any injury of the knees, hips, shoulders or back muscles.
2) Those who had any recent surgery of neck, shoulders, abdomen or legs should avoid this asana.",padangusthasana
"1) It gives a good stretch to the torso, neck, shoulders and hips.
2) It strengthens the muscles of the hips, legs, arms, shoulders and chest.
3) It gives a good twist for the spine and helps to make it flexible over a period of time.
4) It tones the organs in the abdomen
5) It improves digestion and relieves constipation.
6) It is an excellent pose for improving stability and balance.","1) Avoid parivrtta parsvakonasana if you have high or low blood pressure. ...
2) Do not practice the asana if you are a patient of migraines.
3) Never perform this pose with an injury into the hip or neck region.",parivritta parsvakonasana
"1) Pincha Mayurasana strengthens the arms and shoulders.
2) It creates a good sense of balance.
3) It stretches the muscles of the back, shoulders and abdomen.
4) Pincha Mayurasana can calm down the mind and release stress.
4) It gives all the benefits of inverted asanas.","1) Those with any injury to arms, shoulders and hips should not do this pose.
2) If you had any recent surgery of arms, shoulders, chest, abdomen or legs, then avoid this asana.
3) Pregnant women should avoid this asana.
4) Women should not do this during menstruation.",pincha mayurasana
"1) Pranamasana is used as the most common form of greeting in India and many eastern countries.
2) It forms the first and last asana of the Surya Namaskara series of poses.
3) It creates a sense of relaxation and concentration for beginning the Surya Namaskara poses.","1) Neck, shoulder, arms, back injury.
2) Spondylitis and Vertigo.
Hypertension.
Pregnancy.
Depression.",pranamasana
"1) This asana relaxes the mind and relieves depression.
2) It tones the pelvic muscles and relieves sciatic pain.
3) It can help in sexual disorders.
4) It gives a good relaxing stretch to the upper body.","1) Neck, shoulder, arms, back injury
2) Spondylitis and Vertigo
3) Hypertension
4) Pregnancy
5) Depression",shasankasana
"1) Supta Udarakarshanasana gives a good twist to the spine and is a good exercise for flexibility of the spine.
2) It tones the organs in the abdomen and improves the functioning of all abdominal organs.
3) It improves digestion.
4) Supta Udarakarshanasana can relieve constipation.
It is good for releasing mental and physical stress.","Supta Udarakarshanasana should be avoided by those who have any kind of injury to hip, knees and spine",supta udarakarshanasan
"1) Swatikasana is a good meditation pose for those who find it difficult to sit in more classical poses like Padmasana and Siddhasana.
2) Even those suffering from varicose veins and aching leg muscles can sit in Swastikasana.",Swastikasana should not be done by hose suffering from sciatica and sacral infections.,swastikasana
"1) Tolangulasana can remove obesity and hence a good asana for weight loss.
2) It tones the organs in the abdomen including liver.
3) It broadens the chest and strengthens the arms, shoulders and neck muscles.
4) olangulasana gives a sense of relaxation.","1) Spinal disorders.
2) Knee ailments.
3) Serious back injuries.
4) Shoulder pain.
Recent stomach surgery.
5) Colitis.
6) Neck pain.",tolungulasana
"1) Utkata Konasana strengthens the hips, the lower back and the thigh muscles
2) It widens the uterus before pregnancy and helps during pregnancy.
3) Utkata Konasana helps to broaden the chest and correct postural defects.
4) This asana massages the organs in the abdomen, particularly the kidneys, the ovaries, urinary system and the prostate gland.
5) Utkata Konasana enhances the functioning of organs in the thorax and improves respiration.
6) It energizes the body, relieves stress and gives a general sense of well-being.
7) It can relieve menstrual pain and cramps.","Utkata Konasana should be avoided by those suffering from hip, ankle and knee injuries. You should not have any shoulder problems either. When widening your legs do not go beyond your limit.",utkata konasana
"1) Utthan Pristhasana is a good hip opener.
2) It strengthens the thigh muscles of the front leg.
3) It stretches the groins and the hip flexors.
4) Opens the chest and neck.","Those suffering from hip, groin or knee injuries should avoid this pose. Also, those who had any recent surgery of the abdomen, thorax, hips or legs should not attempt this pose.",utthan prishthasana
"1. he practice of Vasisthasana (Side Plank Pose) is mainly done to improve the strength of the arms and shoulders, while also teaching the students to engage the scapula (shoulder blades) since this is essential for all arm balance yoga poses. While strengthening the arms, they also get toned.
2. Every arm balance pose requires greater understanding of using the abdominal muscles by engaging the entire core muscles. Thus, with this practice of side arm balance, students will improve in their core strength while learning to focus on using the abdominal area effici","1.Avoid this pose in case of any injury in the arms, legs, neck, and back.
2. Skip this practice if you are recovering from a recent surgery.
3. People with any issue in the chest, ribcage, or shoulders must refrain from this pose.
4. If you have a herniated disc or rheumatoid arthritis, do not try the side plank pose.
5. It is not a suitable pose with issues like carpal tunnel syndrome, tendinitis, bursitis, etc.
6. Pregnant women should only perform it with the help of props and with proper caution.",vasisthasana
"1. Viparita Karani increases the blood flow to the brain so effective in the treatment of cerebral insufficiency and senile dementia.
2. Cures hemorrhoids, varicose veins, and a certain type of hernia.
3. In Hatha Yoga Pradipika (3.82), it’s said; “After six months of practice, grey hairs and wrinkles become inconspicuous. One who practices Viparita Karani for three hours conquers death.”
4. However, modern teachers also suggest Viparita Karani can be practiced to overcome premenstrual syndrome, menopause, menstrual cramps [efn_note] A Single Case Study on Menstrual Disorder and with Yoga Therapy
5. the pressure exerted around throat muscles in this mudra stimulates the thyroid gland. It rebalances the functions of hypoactive thyroid.","1. Before performing Viparita Karani, make sure your bowels are empty. Especially when you have constipation, do laghoo shankha prakshalana before it.
2. This inversion posture should be avoided when having high blood pressure, heart disease problems, and thyroid disorders.
3. If you do Viparita Karani for an extended period, maintain a gap of 6 hours between the practice and your meal.
4. Come out of the pose slowly if you feel the heavy head.",vipareet karni asana
"1. it is a an inverted pose. Here the head is located below the heart which increases the blood flow to the brain.
2. Its practice is beneficial in the problem related to the neck, by practicing Vrischikasana, the risk of spondylitis can be reduced.
3. The chest is also extended while fully holding the pose. It helps in expansion of the lungs and improves the efficiency of oxygen intake.
4. Scorpion Pose stretches and tones the abdominal muscles. It strengthens core muscles and promotes stamina.
5. Regular practice of Vrischikasana helps in activating and balancing the Crown (Sahasrara) Chakra, Third Eye (Ajna) Chakra, Throat (Vishuddha) Chakra and Heart (Anahata) Chakra.
","Beginners should not practice this asana.
The best decision is to resort to a wall when practicing it for the first time.
This asana can give difficulty to those people who are suffering from fat or obesity. To be proficient in this, the spine must be flexible and strong.
To avoid injury while practicing, you can place a soft blanket under you.
Before starting the practice of Vrischikasana, one should master the Sirsasana.",vrishchikasana
"1. Stimulates and Energizes: The forward bend in a bound is said to stimulate the internal organs especially the stomach and intestine. It also energises the body with the deep stretch of the muscles around the spine and the chest. Hence this practice is good for improving digestion and to boost energy in the body.
2. Grounding and Calmness: Though the practice of this pose is challenging, yet when done with practice helps to keep the body and mind grounded that further help in keeping mind calm.
3. Manipura Chakra and Balance: Done the right way the practice of Psychic Union Pose activates and stimulates the manipura chakra that governs the pranic energy in the body. When this energy is used efficiently there is said to be balance in the body keeping one healthy.
4. Anxiety and Depression: Since the practice of Yoga Mudrasana (Psychic Union Pose) calm the body with the deep breathing and deep stretch of the back muscles and chest, it is also said to help in keeping the anxiety levels down and controlling the symptoms of depression.","1. Students with injury of the neck, shoulders, hips, knee, pelvic girdle, and ankles should avoid the practice of this pose.
2. Students with back issues related to injury, surgery, or pain should avoid the practice of Psychic Union Pose completely.
3. Surgery of internal organs including the time of recovery is a contraindication, hence best to avoid.
4. Not for women during their menstrual time, pregnancy or even post delivery.
Students suffering from blood pressure or heart related ailments should avoid this practice.",mudrasana
"1. Overall flexibility of the body improves: With the deep stretch of the entire body there is a progress towards a flexible body which in turn helps in practicing of various other advance level poses.
2. Reduces the stiffness around the shoulders and neck: With the deep stretch of the arms above your head in this pose, helps the shoulders and the neck get their equal share of stretch thus reducing any stiffness. This reduction of stiffness also improves the energy levels of the body, thus making the body feel completely light and making them strong for the practice of next level poses.
3. Improves the joints while flexing them: The flexing of the knees, ankles, hips, shoulders, elbow, entire spine and neck helps to keep them strong while the muscles around these joints become strong with contraction while in Ashta Chandrasana.
4. Tones the entire body with the deep stretch: The expansion and extension of the thighs, hips, shoulders, arms and neck in this pose, works on burning the excess fat and keeps these muscles toned while adding a great toned look to the body.","1. Injury to the knees or the hips can make this pose difficult: While this pose surely improves the strength and flexibility of the hips and the knees, the pressure around this place during the practice of this pose may make the tissues around the hips and the knees tear if one is injured and hence best to avoid this pose.
2. If one is suffering from Low or High Blood Pressure",ashta chandrasana
"1. It helps to improve the overall sense of balance for the individual.
2. It helps to strengthen the arms, upper body, shoulders and the wrists.
3. It helps to tone the abdomen and make it strong and healthy.
4. This pose also helps to nourish the thyroid gland that performs the function of controlling the heart rate, balancing the nervous system and the digestive system and it also helps to regulate the metabolism of the body.
5. It is also very beneficial in increasing the circulation to the abdomen and the legs and also helps in massaging the abdominal organs besides relieving stress.
6. It helps one to relieve the mental and emotional stress and also headaches by improving the blood flow in the body.
7. This is a great stress buster and relaxing like any other yoga poses.","1. Those who are suffering from lower back, elbow, wrist and shoulder injuries should avoid it as it may make the injury worse. It should also be avoided by those who have high blood pressure as it causes the blood pressure to rise. 
2. It is also not a very good pose for those who are suffering from cervical spondylitis and this pose puts pressure on shoulder and causes the neck to take the weight of the body. It should also be avoided by those who are suffering from detached retina or glaucoma as it causes the worsening of the situation.",bhujapidasana
"1. The hamstring muscles, the quadriceps, calves and the shoulders are stretched. This stretch brings flexibility and strengthens the calves and the ankles.
2. Balance : This pose improves the balance of the body and enhances concentration. It works from the core and hence the core strength is kept in mind here.
3. Stretches : This yoga pose stretches the hips, thighs, shoulders and the upper back.
4. Joints : This pose opens all the joints in the body; the shoulders, the elbows, the wrists, the hips, the knees, and the ankles.
5. Toxins : Since this asana is a twist, the pose detoxifies your body. It flushes out your kidneys, circulates blood to your reproductive system.
6. Runners : This yoga pose is considered wonderful and useful for runners. The joints filled with fresh blood acts like a great support for running and the 
7. stretching of the legs brings more strength and stamina in the legs.","Avoid getting into this pose if you have any knee, elbow, ankle and wrist injury. Not for women in later term pregnancy.",garudasana
"1. Sleeping Swan Pose massages the abdominal organs, the digestive tract, and improves the blood and the pranic flow to the spine and to the reproductive system. Similarly, the pressure received at the abdominal area, and the gropin area stimulates the spleen and stomach, kidneys and bladder respectively. Hence, promotes good digestion and enhances the function of the reproductive organs.
2. Sleeping Swan Pose is a great restorative practice for pregnant women to relieve the tired and tight hips and lower back.
3. Sleeping Swan Pose stretches and lengthens the muscles surrounding the hips, legs, neck, back, knees, ankle joint, opens arms and shoulders. This hip opening pose with a forward bend engages the hip flexors, glutes, pelvic floor muscles, psoas muscles, lower back, quadriceps, and hamstrings, making it an overall practice to strengthen the mentioned areas, thus, giving a deep opening to the entire lower body, especially the hips and groin.","1. Injury and Surgery: Students with hip or knee injuries or broken arms should avoid the pose.
2. Physical Strength and Weak Body: Students with hip or knee pain, acute back pain, heart problems, hip tightness, high blood pressure, should practice the pose under the guidance of a competent teacher.
3. Others: Pregnant women in their second trimester or third trimester can follow the Chair Pigeon Pose Variation Forward Bend Foot Bolster or on the mat without going down in forward bend. Otherwise, Sleeping Swan Pose is an easy pose, but senior citizens or students with knee or hip issues should take it slow and can follow by taking care of consciously aligning the body.",kapotasan
"1. his easy leads you to attain salvation. Doing this in the right heart and right way, it leads you to attain supernatural abilities.
2. This asana is the best posture for meditation and also plays a big role in concentrating your mind.
3. Liberation pose is a very good posture for beginners as it is very easy to do asanas and can be done easily, it does not require much care to do it. Liberation pose is a very good posture to meditate on.
With regular practice of this asana, Kumbhak starts easily.
4. This pose stimulates the first chakra, the Muladhara. Muladhara stimulates sexual energy as well as the reproductive organs.
5. Eliminates sexual diseases and semen is protects.
6. By doing Muktasana, thoughts become pure and the mind concentrates. The practice of Muktasana purifies all the nerves of the body, consequently, it becomes easier to concentrate the mind.
7. It speeds up your gastrointestinal tract, aids in regulating digestion.","1. To do this asana, keep the ankles of your feet in the correct place.
2. If there is a pain in the knee, avoid doing this asana for some time.
3. Even those who have complained of back pain should not do this asana.",muktasana
"1. Parsvakonasana benefits, to treat stomach-related problems like constipation. 

2. Its benefits you back and help to treat back pain problem. 

3. Parsvakonasana benefits to strengthen your ankles, legs and knees. 

4. Parsvakonasana benefits your hamstring muscles by giving a good stretch. 

5. Parsvakonasana benefits your abdominal muscles and helps to tone those muscles","1. If you are suffering from high blood pressure problem or low blood pressure problem, it is better to always consult your doctor and yoga instructor first and only then practise Parsvakonasana steps.
2. If you are suffering from severe spondylosis, then you should avoid practising Parsvakonasana steps. 
3. If you are suffering from headache problem then, avoid practising Parsvakonasana steps. 
4. It is better to practise yoga in the early morning because Parsvakonasana (extended side angle pose) and other yoga asanas energize your body, and this could a problem if you are suffering from insomnia and practising yoga asanas in the evening time.",parshvakonasana
"1. Firstly, this inverted yoga posture will reduce depression and boost your confidence level.
2. Secondly, the nervous system is rejuvenated by this posture and the heart and lungs are electrified. People suffering from blood pressure problems will find this yoga exercise very beneficial as it will effectively reduce the blood sugar levels.
3. The Prasarita Padottanasana also harmonizes the abdominal muscles and also relieves headaches caused due to excessive stress.
4. Since there is a lot stretching associated with this yoga exercise, the wide-legged forward bend yoga posture will successfully reduce lower back pain.","1. Students with injuries at the ankles, wrists, knees, and any sprain at the neck and shoulders need to avoid this pose. Students with any recent surgeries of the knees, hips, ankles and wrists should avoid this pose.
2. Due to the intense spinal stretch and balancing involved, seniors and pregnant women need to avoid this pose. Students with tight hamstrings and beginners can practise Intense Leg Stretch Pose Variation Blocks (Prasarita Padottanasana Variation Blocks)
3. The student needs to understand their hamstring flexibility, distance, and breath awareness before attempting the pose. The student needs to exhale and take the forward stretch from the hips. If students lack this coordination, they can damage their knees and hips. It can tear the hamstring muscle",prasarita padottasana
"1. Practicing challenging hip opening sequence like Samakonasana (Center Splits Pose), helps to release tensions accumulated at the hips and psoas muscles. Reducing and releasing these tensions makes for a stronger body that encourages self confidence and teaches self control. When the body along with the breathing process supports students in Samakonasana practice, it gives a sense of joy. 
2. Strong and flexible muscles of the lower body benefits by giving support to the spine and upper body. With an overall flexible body, challenging yoga poses can be mastered with ease. The stretching of the hips while opening them is the most challenging part of a yoga practice and working on the same helps to establish a balanced body.","1. Students recovering from a surgery to any internal organs, hips, knee, spine, etc., should let the yoga teacher know in order to avoid this practice. Students having or even recovering from an injury of the hips, knees, spine, or wear and tear of the muscles at the abdomen, hamstrings, quadriceps, psoas, or gluteus maximus should be contrained 
2. The practice of Samakonasana should not be part of yoga sequence for women if these students are either pregnant or having their menses. But, the same can be done before the time of menstruation to help fight symptoms related to PMS.",samakonasana
"1. Tittibhasana (Firefly Pose) Makes your wrist stronger along with improves the strength of the arms.
2. It tightens and tones the area of the belly.
3. Stretches your back torso, inner groins, and hamstrings.
4. The Yoga pose also helps in bringing an overall sense of balance and improves core strength.
5. Firefly Pose gives the back torso and inner groins a good stretch.
6. Tittibhasana Good for your mind.
7. Improves digestion.","Avoid this pose in case of Lower back injuries, wrist injury, and shoulder injury also.",tittibhasana
"1. Supine Splits Pose is believed to activate the Svadisthana (sacral) chakras. Svadisthana is associates with creativity, sexuality, joy, and pleasure also.
2. This asana also stimulated the Muladhara (root) chakras. Muladhara offers a sense of security and safety.
3. Due to stretch in all the parts of the body, there is never an accident in the body and the body remains flexible.
4. By doing this asana, all the muscles of your legs become very strong.
5. The lower abdominal muscles and inner thigh muscles are stronger and improve digestion.
6. Doing it reduces all menopausal and menstrual disorders.","1. This asana should be practiced in the morning. But if you are doing this asana in the evening, then it is important that you have eaten food at least 4 to 6 hours before.
2. It is also important to make sure that you have defecated before doing the posture and the stomach is completely empty.
3. If you have pain in your feet and knees, do not do this asana.
4. If you suffer from any type of back or spinal problem, do not do this asana.
5. It has many physical and mental benefits but it cannot be used in place of any medicine etc.",supta trivikramasana
"1. Tulasana strengthens your arms, wrists and upper body region.
2. Makes your shoulders strong.
3. It relaxes the muscles and calms the mind.
4. Increases the sense of balance.
5. Includes tightening of the abs and subsequently, brings about a rigid stomach.
6. The muscles of your midriff (abdomen) are pulled up tight and thus, your lungs show signs of improvement supply of oxygen as you inhale profoundly.
7. While fortifying your abs, it likewise gives an interior incitement to the internal organs.
8. In totality, Tolasana enhances the feeling of equalization of your body and has a quieting impact on your entire personality and framework.
9. In Tolasana, you have to utilize your eyes for centered consideration. This evacuates basic imperfections of your eyes.","Avoid this Asana, in shoulder, wrist, Ankle and knee injuries. If you have tight hips and thighs, then avoid this. First, make your hips and thighs flexible by doing other asana for flexibility. If you feel any difficulty then use a block under your both hands for increasing the length of your arms, it helps to lift your legs. Always perform Yog Asana and Pranayama in a right way, if you really want to get the benefits of specific asana or Pranayama.",tulasana
"1. Titli Asana is the Best exercise for relaxing and stretching the aching thighs.
2. Butterfly Pose helps to open up the hips and thighs and improves flexibility.
3. Titli Asana is a nice stretch for relieving stress and tiredness.
4. It stimulates the reproductive and digestive organs.
5. Helpful for girls throughout menstruation because it helps to alleviate a number of the discomfort and pain related to menstruating.
6. Very useful for girls after menopause.
7. Butterfly Pose is Good for pregnant ladies.
8. Useful to the kidneys, bladder, endocrine gland, and ovaries.
9. Regular practice of this posture will facilitate in easing the pain related to natural childbirth.","Don’t attempt Titli Asana, if you are suffering from a recent injury, surgery, or in any pre-existing medical condition. Consult a good doctor and yoga expert before doing any type of yogic activities.",Upavistha Titli Asana
"1. This pose also increases the elasticity of the hips and hamstring muscles. Stretching the upper and lower body simultaneously, Uttana Shishosana is beneficial in improving overall posture.

2. Activates abdominal muscles
The core muscles are also stimulated while stretching the lower back. The abdomen remains pulled in and it massages the abdominal muscles leading to their activation.

3. Improves blood circulation
Uttana Shishosana is considered as a heart-opener because the chest expands while stretching the shoulders and back. With the inhalation, the heart lifts up and on exhalation, it melts to the floor.","1. Do not practice uttana shishosana if you have an injured knee or leg.
2. While practicing this pose, if you experience the pain in the shoulders, move your hands outwards while stretching.
3. Gain some flexibility in the shoulders and arms before getting into Uttana Shishosana. As the stiffness in these regions might worsen the condition.
4. Avoid it when you are suffering from severe lower back pain.
5. Skip it during pregnancy.",uttana shishoasana
"1.Stretches and opens the muscles around the hips. Hip Opening Yoga Sequence
2. Stretches and strengthens the groin and gluteus.
3. Improves the flexibility of the knees, with deep stretches.
4. Agnistambhasana (Fire Log Pose) is a good pose to avoid arthritis. Yoga for arthritis in knees
5. As Agnistambhasana (Fire Log Pose) stretches the quadriceps and the hamstrings, it is a good cure for Irritable Leg syndrome, while also toning the thighs and calves.
6. Agnistambhasana is said to activate the Muladhara Chakra (Root). Yoga for Muladhara Chakra
7. Brings a sense of power with endurance and self confidence. Power Yoga for weight loss","1. Injury or inflammation to the knee or the hips.
2. Problems related to the lower back, or any kind of inflammation.
3. Injury of the ankles.
4. Arthritis of the knees.
5. Sciatica",agnistambhasana
"1. This mudra stretches the finer soft muscles, tendons, and ligaments of the wrist and palms.
2. Vishnu Mudra facilitates body balance and body equilibrium. The balance between the right (Pingala) and the left (Ida) nostril is essential for good health and well-being. When the right and left brain get equal prana, there is a sense of stability and harmony.
3. This mudra stimulates the lungs and heart functioning. When the fingers are aligned in Vishnu mudra, it stimulates the ulnar nerve in the wrists. The ulnar nerve transmits signals to muscles in the forearm and hand. It is also responsible for sensation in the fourth and fifth fingers (ring and little fingers) of the hand and underside of the forearm. It is involved in carrying sensations from the hand and fingers up to the spinal cord. This nerve also controls the movement of several muscles in the arm and hand.
4. The ulnar artery that supplies blood to the hand helps the doctors check the heart's pulse rate. Pulse/heart rate is the wave of blood in the artery created by the left ventricle during a cardiac cycle. The strength or amplitude of the pulse reflects the amount of blood ejected with myocardial contraction. The normal pulse rate range is 60-100 beats per minute. This mudra helps in the efficient blood circulation to the arms and nurtures the ulnar and radial arteries.
5. Vishnu Mudra facilitates deep and conscious breathing. It is a purification gesture. Adding breath retention in pranayama with Vishnu Mudra purifies the breathing.","1. Injury and Surgery: Students with injuries or recent surgeries at the fingers, wrist, or palms should avoid this pose.
2. Lack of Body-Breath Connections: Students should be guided to align to the mudra. Applying the mudra to pranayama is the next step that needs a yoga teacher's assistance.
3. Others: When Vishnu mudra is applied on the nostrils, the yoga teacher has to be diligent. The student should not press the nostrils but place them gently on the alternate nostrils.",mrigi mudra
"1. Practicing this mudra activates the heart chakra which enables a sense of vitality and calm in its practitioners. Not only this, it can support in healing past trauma and balance strong emotions and discover our inner strength to follow our heart. The calm state of mind thereby helps in grounding the scattered feelings and thoughts and brings clarity from which clear decisions can be made.
2. Regular practice of this mudra can help in improving the circulation in the heart. From an energetic point of view, it allows heat to descend from the head through the chest down into the belly, thus regulating the healthy function of all the internal organs including heart, lungs and abdominal organs.","1. Please avoid practicing this mudra if your hands/wrists are injured as it involves twisting of the wrist joints. Always listen to your body.
2. People who have PTSD should practice this under the guidance of a trained yoga teacher as sometimes holding this mudra can trigger negative memories or intense emotions from the past, and a trained yoga teacher can help such a student in navigating through these feelings.
3. Always remember the practice should not be done longer than required, which means, holding the mudra for about 20 mins, or lesser. Holding it longer can bring different results.",abhaya hridiya mudra
"1. Stretches and strengthens the muscles of the chest, shoulders, arms, legs, abdomen and the lower back
2. Tones the abdomen and lower back
3. Massages the spine and keeps the back supple
4. Helps stretch the chest
5. Improves blood circulation
6. Also works at the mind level – when you take off, you can't but stay in the present moment. Even if you want to, you can't think about any problem!
7. Can be a good workout for the abs and stomach",Do not practice this yoga posture if you have had an abdominal surgery recently or if you are pregnant.,Viparita Shalabhasana
"1. Stretches and strengthens the wrists at a higher level.
Stretches and strengthens the upper arm muscles like biceps and triceps.
Tones the upper arm muscles at a higher level.
2. Stretches and strengthens the neck muscles like the trapezius.
Improves the range of motion of the neck muscles, gaining flexibility.
Works on the thyroid glands improving its functions.
3. Stretches and strengthens the upper, middle and lower back muscles.
Improves the flexibility of the various back muscles
4. Opens and expands the chest cavity, along with the diaphragm muscles.
Keeps the leg muscles strong and well toned.","1. Injury: Avoid the practice of Ganda Bherundasana if there is any injury of the neck, shoulder, arms, wrists, ribs, hips and back.
2. Pregnant Women: Avoid the practice of Ganda Bherundasana (Chin Stand) if you are pregnant.
3. New to advance practice: As Ganda Bherundasana is an advance backbend yoga pose, those who are new to this level should take precautionary measures like using blankets, cushions and yoga blocks etc.
4. Awareness: The awareness of the body and its movement is very essential to make sure the balance is perfect.
5. Careful flow: Do not throw yourself down while releasing from Ganda Bherundasana (Chin Stand), come down one leg at a time.
6. Yoga teacher: Always take guidance and help from a yoga teacher.
7. Surgery: Avoid the practice of Ganda Bherundasana if one has undergone any surgery related to the internal organs.The deep backbend will bring pressure to the abdominal muscles that support the various organs in the body.",gandha bherudasana
"1. Strength: The practice of Karandavasana (Himalayan Duck) requires the strength of the shoulders, arms, neck, core, and hips. Thus, with repeated practice the above mentioned body parts get strong.
2. Flexibility: Flexing the hips, neck, shoulders, forearms and knees are essential while in Karandavasana (Himalayan Duck). Hence, with practice, these get stronger and flexible preparing for more challenging poses like Devaduuta Panna Asana (Fallen Angel Pose).
3. Power and Endurance: A strong physical and mental power is what takes students to go deeper with advanced poses, just like in Himalayan Duck. The physical power of the shoulders and arms, the core muscles, and the hips, are essential for this pose. For example: to stay in balance after partially bringing the hips down, engaging the core muscles to support the hips and the lower back, engaging the shoulders and arms to support the hips to stay in balance, etc. On the other hand, the power of the mind to coordinate the breathing process, to bring focus and awareness while in balance, and to understand the body movements in order to avoid injury. Therefore, with gradual improvement with Karandavasana (Himalayan Duck), the practice will move more towards the mental power after having achieved the physical power.
4. Focus and Coordination: Apart from the physical movements of the hips, knees, and feet and ankles, the breathing process plays a great role to help coordinate the smooth flow of the body movements. Thus, focus and coordinations of both the physical body and the breathing process are essential and improves with practice.
Some of the other benefits derived with the practice of Karandavasana (Himalayan Duck) are almost similar to Vrschikasana (Scorpion Pose).","1. Injury and Surgery: Of course students should avoid the practice of Karandavasana (Himalayan Duck) if they have undergone a surgery related to any part of the body. They should also take care if they have injured their spine, shoulders, arms, neck, elbows, hips, knees, and lower back. Therefore care should be taken whether injured or recovering from a surgery.
2. Flexibility: Flexing the hips and shoulder are the key to get into Himalayan Duck, hence, the practice of the same should be done only if the students are comfortable with Pincha Mayurasana and Padmasana (Lotus Pose).
3. Physical Weakness: Physical weakness from illness or otherwise is a contraindication, and hence best to avoid this practice. As the physical stamina along with breath coordination is essential, it can be taxing for those who are recovering from an illness. or those who are otherwise weak.
4. Pregnant Women: Women who are pregnant or even those who are in their postpartum should avoid the practice of Karandavasana (Himalayan Duck).",karandavasana
"This asana brings a rich supply of blood to the brain.
It is a preliminary pose for sirshasana, as it enables the brain to adapt to the influx of blood while the crown become accustomed to
supporting the weight of the body.","Not to be performed by persons suffering from high blood pressure or vertigo.
pregnant women are also prohibited .",moordhasana
"1. This yoga pose helps to increase the blood flow in our body and improves the Level of hemoglobin in blood. It removes toxin foo the blood and other benefits with proper blood flow.
2. This yoga pose is very good for the people who are suffering with a problem called nervous trembling.
3. Dwi Pada Srisasana actives the heat inside your body and helps your digestion to work properly.
4. This yoga pose is best to make your body more flexible.
5. This yoga pose is very good for people suffering from diabeties and also being used as a treatment in many yoga teachers training in India.
6. As good amount of proper breathe is included in this pose and thus helps to treat lung diseases and sinuses.","Not to be performed by pregnant womens , person having hip surgery , high , surgery. and neck pain, elder people should also avoid",dwi pada sirsasana
"1. This pose strengthens the legs and core. It stretches the arms and opens the hips and hamstrings.
2. It also improves balance. It's not a position you will often find yourself in daily life, but you will be more ready to meet any balance challenges that come your way.
3. Traditionally, it is said to open the sacral chakra and the root chakra.","1. Avoid this pose if you have any injury to your legs, knees, hips, back, or shoulder. 
2.As a balancing pose, it should be avoided during pregnancy and by those who have high blood pressure. If you experience any pain in your inner thigh or upper arm, it is possible you have tweaked a muscle or nerve. Release the pose.",swarga dwijasana
"1) The movement of gases are regulated. Oxygen enters the body in sufficient quantity and polluted air comes out of the body.
2) This Ashwathasa asana provides beauty and health to the body.
3) By performing this Ashwathasana asana, all the diseases goes away from the body.",Pregnant women should avoid it,ashwathasana
"1) It aids better circulation of blood.
2) Tones the usually relaxed abdominal and pelvic muscles.
3) The thoracic area opens up and improves breathing
4) Helps in correcting the faulty posture of rounded or drooping shoulders","1) Kyphosis and other spinal injuries.
2) Frozen shoulder and arthritis.
3) Recent surgery in the abdominal region.",Yastikasana
"1) It creates flexibility of your hip and knee joints.
2) The muscles of your legs are strengthened.
3) It enhances the balancing capacity of your body.
4) It is excellent for women’s health.
5) It strengthens your lower back muscles.

Therapeutic

1) It helps relieve flat feet pain.
2) It helps to maintain spinal curvature.

Psychological

1) It brings about a balanced state of mind.
2) It brings your mind to the present moment.
3) It brings about a sense of humility and gratitude.
4) It creates awareness and concentration","1) In cardiac conditions, do not retain and suspend your breath.
2) Stiff joints and vertigo.
3) Moderate and severe arthritis of knees.
4) Acute deep vein thrombosis, sprained ankle and sciatica pain.",nataprathanasana
"1) A good preventive for sciatica
2) Tones the back, abs and arm muscles
3) Opens up the chest and groin
4) Tones the uterine muscles in females, so it is very useful in preventing painful cycles if practiced regularly
5) Consistent practice helps reduce abdominal fat","Do not practice this asana if you are pregnant, have low blood pressure, extreme lower back pain due to slip disc, headaches or migraine (during the attack), or had a recent abdominal surgery, such as for active hernia.",Chakki Chalanasana
"1) Improves digestion.
2) Stretches and opens the front of the body. It also strengthens the back and shoulders.
3) Relieves the body of lower back ache.
4) Improves flexibility of the spine and also improves posture.
5) Helps overcome menstrual discomfort.","Back injury or neck injury, high or low blood pressure: Perform this pose only with the supervision of an experienced teacher.",ushtrasana
"1) Clears up Congestion: The stretch of the spinal bone promotes proper growth and clears up congestion of the spinal nerves at the points at which they emerge from the spinal column.
2) Improves Digestion: It stretches the abdominal muscles and hence tones these muscles improving digestion.
3) mImproves Pulmonary Functions: The chest is expanded thus giving room for clear passage for breathing from the diaphragm. This in turn cures asthma and heavy breathing.
4) Stimulates Nervous System: Helps to give control over muscular movement and stimulates the entire nervous system of the body.","You should avoid this pose (or reach out to an experienced teacher), if you have any of the following:
1) Neck pain
2) Shoulder pain",talasana
"1) Inspires purity and perseverance by representing the lotus flower floating above the muddy waters of desire, fear, and attachment
2) Reminds you of the natural beauty of your soul
3) Calms the mind","1) Injury and Surgery: Students with injuries to the palms, wrists, and fingers need to avoid this mudra. Students who have undergone wrist, finger, or palm surgery should avoid this practice.
2) Others: Students who are very carefree, taking life easy, and are not having any purpose need to avoid this practice. It creates an imbalance in their perspective. For example: If a person is very generous, kind, or compassionate, their heart chakra is already active. The practice of this mudra may make them extra carefree and imbalance their practical approach to life situations, challenges, and surroundings.",padma mudra
"1) Cosmic Egg Yoga Pose or Brahmandasana is more challenging than Wind Release Pose since the feet are off the ground, and so it strengthens the pelvic area.
2) Core muscles are engaged all the time and hence, it improves the core strength and prepares for other poses like Navasana.
3) Holding the pose for a longer period of time calms the mind and balances the emotions.
4) This pose is beneficial, and can be practiced by both kids and teenagers.","1) Yoga teachers must instruct the students to maintain balance when they take their feet off the ground. Losing balance can be dangerous and students might injure themselves.
2) If some students are not confident enough to take their feet off the ground, teachers may guide them to use props or walls.",brahmandasana
"1) Neti helps to maintain the nasal hygiene by removing the dirt and bacteria trapped along with the mucus in the nostrils.
2) Neti de-sensitizes the sensitive tissues inside the nose, which can alleviate rhinitis, allergies and some asthmas.
3) Several health problems like sinusitis, migraine, headaches, ear problems like tinitis and middle ear infections can be reduced by doing Neti.
4) It can alleviate upper respiratory complaints, sore throats, tonsils and dry coughs.
5) It can clear the eye ducts and improve vision.","If the nose is blocked with cold or bleeding or infected internally, then avoid this kriya .",Jala Neti ( Shatkarma )
"1) Sheetkrama Kapalbhati cleans the mucous from the nasal cavity and throat.
2) In Gheranda Samhita, it is mentioned that this practice removes the wrinkles of the face and makes the face glow. It also mentions that the person who practices Sheetkrama kapalbhati can overcome disease and old age.
3) It removes the Kapha Dosha (as per Ayurveda) and gives good health and vigour to the body.
4) Spiritual benefits include activating some energy centers in the brain which have trigger points in the nasopharynx. It is said to activate the Bindu Chakra at the back of the head. When this center is awakened, nectar or Amrit flows and makes the body immortal.","Sheetkrama Kapalabhati should not be practiced by pregnant or menstruating women. It is also contraindicated for individuals with high or low blood pressure, heart disease, hernia, gastric ulcer, epilepsy, vertigo, migraine headaches, significant nosebleeds, detached retina, glaucoma, history of stroke, and for anyone who has undergone recent abdominal surgery. If you experience vertigo during or after this practice, please discontinue until you can consult with a qualified yoga teac",sheetkrama kapalbhati
"1) Vastra dhauti removes impurities from the intestinal tract, thereby detoxifying the stomach and esophagus regions.
2) It helps to remove gas, acidity, indigestion and enlargement of spleen.
3) It helps to relieve asthma, bronchitis, cough and other ‘Kapha’ or phlegm related problems.","1) Do not practise when there is injury in pharynx, esophagus and stomach.
2) Should not be attempted by those who are suffering from hernia, severe abdominal and chest pain, headache, fever, high blood pressure (HBP), heart problems, any serious digestive disorder and acute condition of any diseases.
3) Ladies should not practise during menses and pregnancy.",vastra dhauti
"1) Trataka is good for the eyes. It strengthens the muscles surrounding the eyes and helps to get rid of mild eye problems like short sightedness.
2) Trataka removes insomnia. Practicing this few minutes before sleep can improve the quality of sleep.
3) Trataka removes distractions in the mind. It can make the mind calm and steady, thereby increasing the power of concentration.
4) It improves mental and nervous stability","1) Migraine: As this practice involves constant staring without blinking, students who are new to this may overdo it. This when done by migraine patients will aggregate the irritation.

2) Lack of control over the senses: Those who have issues in controlling their senses, may have problems when Trataka (Candle Gazing) is done. Working on improving the various sense organs with the activation of the nerves through yoga poses practice becomes essential before the Trataka (Candle Gazing) practice.

3) Trauma sensitive related issues: Patients suffering from trauma should be introduced to Trataka (Candle Gazing) gradually, as this could cause fear of staring, fear of the dark (while closing eyes), lack of self control, irritation with eyes watering etc.",trataka
"1. Stretches and Strengthens: With this hip opener, in Nectar Of The Moon Pose I, the hamstrings, quadriceps, psoas, core, and gluteus maximus are stretched and strengthened. It helps with the flexibility of these muscles supporting the hips for further challenging poses.
2 Heart Opener: The stretching of the arms and shoulders helps expand the chest and open the heart center.
3. Grounding: Since Nectar Of The Moon Pose I is a partial lunge with a gentle twist, it helps to connect deeper to the ground, rooting a deeper sensation of being connected to the earth.
4. Spine and Lower Back: This pose elongates the spine and strengthens the base of the spine while also using the core muscles in the posture, for better support.
5. Awareness, Focus and Balance: Balancing on arms and hips needs awareness that helps with focus and balance.This focus and balance will further help with more challenging yoga poses.
6. Tones: The deep stretching of the muscles like the hamstrings, quadriceps, gluteus maximus, and core muscles tones the body. The glutes have a great role in the movements of the lower limbs, hence the stronger the buttock muscles the stronger and well toned legs. These toned buttock muscles also supports the abdominal muscles keeping them toned.","1. Injury: Any kind of chronic injury to the back, hips, shoulders, knees and pelvis, is contraindication and best to avoid.
2. Women: While this pose is generally safe for pregnant women to practice, care should be taken though during the last trimester under the guidance of a yoga teacher. Since this puts pressure at the pelvis and lower abdomen, it may bring discomfort.
3. Abdominal organs: Students recovering from any kind of surgery related to the abdominal organs should refrain from this practice. Pressure at the abdomen, hips and psoas muscles during the healing process from any surgery is not safe.
4. Sciatica, Piriformis syndrome, Blood Pressure, etc: Any specific ailment can act as contraindicated. Therefore, care should be taken with the practice and yoga teachers should be aware of the students' ailments. Where required modifications of the pose can be incorporated to suit the students needs and comfort.",somachandrasana
"1. Gherandasana Ii benefits the following muscles and hence can be included in yoga sequences with the corresponding muscle(s) focus:
Arms and Shoulders
Biceps and Triceps
Core (Abs)
2. Stretches the entire front of the body, ankles, thighs and groins, abdomen and chest, and throat, and deep hip flexors (psoas). Strengthens the back muscles.","Pregnant womens , person having knee surgery , leg surgery , and pain in neck or any kind of lsurgery in lower part of the body shold be contraindicated.",Gherandasana
"1. Helps in stretching legs, hamstrings, arms, chest, back, and shoulder muscles
2. Strengthens the muscles by improving blood flow
3. Helps in learning how to cultivate a calm and chaos-free mind
4. Improves the meditative state
5. Maintains the five chakras of muladhara, svadisthana, manipura, anahata and visuddha
6. Effectively improves body’s stability and coordination","1. Do not perform this yoga, if you have heart issues or have any neck, back, or shoulder injury. 
2. Pregnant women and those who have just given birth must not do this pose.
I3. f you notice any pain or sprain during this yoga, slowly stop it.
4. Do not eat a heavy meal at least an hour before this yoga. 
5. Have patience and perform each step correctly and slowly to avoid any injury. 
6. This is not yoga for beginners. So, if you are new to yoga, do not try this at your home workouts.",kapilasana
"
1) It stretches your legs, ankles, knees, shoulders, lungs, waist, spine, chest and groins region.
2) It increases your stamina level and stimulates your abdominal organs.
3) It offers therapeutic relief from infertility, constipation, menstrual discomfort, sciatica, osteoporosis and lower backaches.","1) Avoid doing this asana if you suffer from insomnia, low or high blood pressure and headache.
2) Avoid looking at your stretched arm if experiencing a neck problem. Instead look down or straight.",Utthita Trivikramasana
"It relieves the pain of hands and feet( It is helpful in rheumatism). It gives strength to liver and wrists.
When we will practice this yoga , our hand will increase strength . This yoga removes us our hand leg pain . It helps us nerve . It can comfortable for all work .It helps us our mind satifatustion . It increase our body growth . It helps us breath . It increase our meditation . It increase us our eye power to strength.",Heart patients/high Blood pressure patients and those who feels giddiness should not perform this asana and do it slowly.,omkarasana
"1. This asana provides a deep muscular massage to the abdomen, toning the digestive organs.
2. Manipura chakra and samana are activated.
3. A sense of balance and concentration is developed.
4. This asana alleviates disorders of the large intestine and stimulates the digestive fire.","Injuries to wrists, elbows, or shoulder joints.
women in their four month of pregnancy should avoid going it. 
",kashyapawsana
"1. Bhunamanasana stretches and improves the flexibility of the shoulders, spine, and lower back, stimulating the nerves.
2. This asana strengthens and improves the flexibility of the lumbar and thoracic parts of the spine while maintaining its mobility.
3. Regular practice of the spinal twist prostration pose can correct the alignment of the hip joints.
4. This asana is also believed to improve a sluggish and fatty liver.","1. Bhunamanasana should not be practiced by people suffering from Spondylitis or Injury of the Lumbar Spine or the Sacrum.
2. People with hypertension (high blood pressure), hyperthyroidism, or heart-related issues should also avoid this asana.
3. Pregnant and menstruating women should seek advice from a doctor or an expert before practicing this yoga.",bhunamanasana
"1) Stretches, Strengthens and Lengthens: Mandalasana (Circle Pose) have the arms and head in a fixed position, but with the lower body being active creating a circle with the feet. This dynamic movement engages the muscles of the legs, psoas, pelvis, core, and back. However, while these muscles stretch, lengthen and contract, the main strength comes from the muscles of the neck, shoulders, arms, and upper back. In the process the spine remains active, moving in all directions.

2) Flexibility and Range of Motion: Circle Pose involves the lower body rotation, this works on the flexibility of the spine, neck, hips, shoulders, knees and ankles. The 360 degree range of motion of the lower body is only possible with the flexible muscles mentioned above, however, with time, these very involved muscles gain better range of motion, making the practice of Mandalasana even more smooth and comfortable.

3) Awareness, Balance and Emotion: In addition to the physical benefits, the practice of Mandalasana impacts the body at the emotional level. Apart from the strength and flexibility of the involved muscles and joints, the awareness of breath-body-mind connections plays a very important role. With this awareness, students would be safe from any injury during the dynamic movement. When the breath-body-mind is in sync, students will have better control over their thoughts during this practice, and with time, the same control can be achieved for activities related to the day (when off the mat). When the physical body is under control, there is a sense of sthiram and sukham that helps set the mind towards emotional well being too. It promotes blood circulation to the brain thereby giving the mind better clarity. Performance of this pose requires a greater amount of concentration; this will improve concentration and promote mental balance.","1) Injury and Surgery: The practice of Mandalasana (Circle Pose) puts pressure at the neck, hips, shoulders, chest, knees, and back. While getting into the pose may not be difficult for advanced level practitioners, moving while grounding the head and shoulders can be tricky for the neck and back. Hence, any student with a history of an old injury or surgery related to any part of the body (especially the neck and hips) should not be allowed to try this pose, at all! 

2) Physical Strength and Weak Body: The practice of Circle Pose demands a lot of physical strength along with breath awareness. In addition, the state of mind should also be balanced and relaxed in order to transit through the dynamic movement of the feet impacting the rest of the body. Thus, even if students are otherwise strong and have the capability, this pose demands the right balance in the breath-body-mind sync. Hence, extra physical strength and awareness is required to even try to attempt this pose. Initially, yoga teachers can begin to teach at the wall (resting the legs on the corner side of the wall), to help students slowly gain strength and confidence.",Mandalasana
"Positive effects on the musculoskeletal system. It stretches the hamstring and calf muscles in the backs of the legs, and builds strength in the shoulders.","Sprinters would develop ""speed and lightness in the legs"", and that the pose would soften calcaneal spurs, strengthen the ankles, counteract stiffness and arthritis in the shoulders, strengthen the abdominal muscles, and slow the heart.",Adho Mukha Shvanasana
"makes your shoulders, wrists and arms strong. It enhances your sense of balance and enables you to get a better balance. The asana enhances the blood circulation in the body. The Handstand Pose calms your nerves and brain, keeps you relaxed","People with spine, hip, ankle, wrist, knee, and shoulder surgeries or injuries should avoid this pose.",Adho Mukha Vrikshasana
"Back bending will strengthen your back and abdominal muscles and enhance your spine, helping relieve pain.The bow pose stimulates the reproductive organs and helps in improving menstrual disorders.","Avoid it while recovering from a recent surgery around the shoulders, spine, arms, or hips.People with a herniated disk or lower back issues must avoid this asana.Women during pregnancy and menstruation must avoid this pose.",Akarna Dhanurasana
"Tones and Better Blood Circulation: The practice of Ananthasana (Side Reclining Leg Lift Pose) stretches the muscles of both the upper body and the lower body thereby toning and reducing the excess fat at the tummy, hips, chest, legs, and arms.","Do not do this asana is you are suffering from any injury or severe pain in Knee, neck, or shoulders or, If you are having any Spine issues or Spondylitis, you should also not perform this asana.",Anantasana
"Strengthens the quadriceps, gluteus maximus, and hamstrings.Engages the deep core muscles, which help create stability.Can help alleviate pain cause by sciatica. Opens the hip flexors and strengthens the hip extensors.","Those with high blood pressure or heart problems, injuries to the lower back, quadriceps, groin, knees, or hips should practice this pose with great care.For those with neck, and upper back issues, it is important not to strain the chin forward, causing compression in the neck muscles and upper spine.",Anjaneyasana
"Strengthens ankles, knees and legs.Roots thighbones to help alleviate backpain.Strengthens abdomen, buttocks and spine.Opens chest and shoulders.","Avoid this yoga asana if you're suffering from neck, spinal or hip injury, ulcers or hernia.Avoid performing Ardha Chakrasana if you have high blood pressure.Be extra careful when attempting this asana if you have vertigo.",Ardha Chandrasana
"It is a great posture and exercise for arm balancing. Increases strength of arms and shoulders, strengthens biceps and triceps.Increases strength of abdomen, knees and chest.Improves stability, flexibility and mobility of the back and spine.Relieves backache.","The shape of the pose can cause lower back pain from the excessive arching this pose encourages. If you have a hyper-mobile lower back or lower back injury, practice with caution and be sure to tone your belly (transverse abdominus) to protect your lower back.If you have a herniated vertebral disc or spondylolisthesis, it is likely best to avoid this pose.",Ashtanga Namaskara
"Develops nervous control.Reverses the flow of Apana.Directs the energy to Manipura chakra.Strengthens the wrists, leg, and arm muscles.Strengthens the abdominal muscles.","Injury of the shoulders, arms, wrists, neck, hips, knees, lower back, ankles, feet and pelvis, are all contraindications, hence should be avoided. People with Carpal Tunnel Syndrome should also avoid practising this pose.",Astavakrasana
"Strengthens and improves flexibility in the inner thighs, groins and the knees.Helps prepare the hips and groins for meditative seated poses, which require more flexibility in these areas.Helps to sooth menstrual discomfort and digestive complaints.","Not to be practiced if there in injury at the knees, neck and hips.Someone suffering from severe sciatica.For someone suffering from lower back pain, going into supine position would be a challenge.",Baddha Konasana/ Bhadrasana
"Arms strengthen, core to help hold you up,glutes and adductors,shoulder stabilizers.It helps make your wrists stronger.Stretches your upper back and groin.Your spine is toned and strengthened.","This asana should not be practiced in case of high blood pressure,people suffering from heart diseases, while having shoulder pain, wrist or shoulder injury or carpal tunnel syndrome, during pregnancy.",Bakasana/ Kakasana
The balasana yoga or the asana helps release any tension in the chest. It is also why people trust yoga for better sleep. It relaxes the back and spine and enables people to trust in yoga for good sleep. It alleviates the stress felt by your shoulders and hands.,"if you are suffering from Diarrhea, you should avoid Balasana.a high blood pressure patient should avoid this asana.If you are having a recent or deep injury in your feet, knees, thighs, spine or neck, do not perform it at all.",Balasana
"Practicing Bhairavasana lengthens the spine which stretches the back muscles and makes them supple and flexible.Strengthens the leg muscles, improves digestion, stretches Oblique muscles, soothes the nervous system.","Anyone with injury in and around the spine, hips, knee, neck shoulders, or wrist must avoid it.People suffering from a hernia must not try it out.Do not practice this pose if you have sciatica pain.",Bhairavasana/ Ankushasana
"Relieves pain and stiffness in the neck, shoulders, and the lower back.Helps keep the spine and shoulders supple.Eases a painful, stiff, sprained, or fused lumbar spine.Reduces discomfort in the dorsal spine area.Increases the flexibility of the back and hips.","High blood pressure, low blood pressure, diarrhea, insomnia, headache",Bharadvajasana
"Opens up the hip joints.Provides deep stretch to the legs and muscles therein.Strengthens and stretches the lower back, stretches deep hip flexors.Strengthens the back muscles, provides deep stretch and flexibility to the lower and middle back.",Suffering from any health conditions related to the stomach.Not to be done when pregnant.If there is injury at the knee and the lower back.Go slow with the pressure at the hips and the shoulders.,Bhekasana
"Bhujangasana is very useful to keep your back healthy and fit. In this asana, you bend your neck and head backwards while the rest of the body lies straight on the floor upside down. This back-bending helps soften the firm muscles of the shoulder, chest, and neck.","People suffering from a hernia, back injuries, headaches, and recent abdominal surgeries should not perform this asana.Pregnant women should not perform this asana.",Bhujangasana
"Practicing Bhujapidasana can build strength in your arms, shoulders, wrists, hands, core, and inner thighs. It also helps improve your balance and increases the flexibility in the hip joints.","Practitioners who have undergone abdominal surgery, injuries in wrist, shoulder, elbow, knee, and neck should refrain from doing Bhujpidasana. Patients with the condition of cervical spondylitis and high blood pressure should avoid practicing this asana.",Bhujapidasana
"Improves the flexibility of the spine. Improves the prana in the body while flexing the spine. Relieves tensions around the lower back, middle back, neck and shoulders.Engages the core muscles, making it strong.Strengthens the arms, shoulders and the wrists.","Injury of the shoulders, wrists, neck, hip, knee and the back, blood pressure, migraine, spondylitis, arthritis of the knee and wrists.",Bidalasana/ Marjariasana
"Similar to plank exercises, this asana aligns your whole body and builds strength in your erector spinae, the muscles on either side of your spine. This helps improve core strength, posture, and stability. Mastering Chaturanga can help you build functional strength.","Wrist injuries and recent surgeries, carpal tunnel syndrome, slipped discs, along with other spinal issues, pregnancy",Chaturanga/ Dandasana
"This seated posture strengthens the back muscles and improves your posture. It also stretches your upper body, including your shoulders and chest.",Staff Pose (Dandasana) should be avoided by people with knee and ankle injuries and people with a very weak core and stiff Hamstrings.,Dandasana
"In this asana, back bending will strengthen your back and abdominal muscles and enhance your spine, helping relieve pain.The bow pose stimulates the reproductive organs and helps in improving menstrual disorders.","Dhanurasna should not be performed by people suffering from high blood pressure, hernia, colitis, peptic ulcer or heart ailment.It should also be avoided if pregnant.",Dhanurasana
"Make Lower Body Stronger, Strengthen Core and Back, Increases Blood Circulation","Too much pressure is on the abdominal area as the entire body is balancing, so people suffering from ulcers in stomach or someone with Hernia should avoid this pose. Women who are pregnant should avoid this.",Durvasasana
"It relaxes the whole spine, especially the muscles of the lumbar spine. Helpful for abdominal cramps and strengthens all abdominal muscles. It cleans and tones the liver and spleen and strengthens the uterus and rectum.","Do not perform garbha pindasana if you are suffering from sciatica or other spinal problems. If you have an injury in the ankles, knees, hips, or back, skip this asana. Perform garbha pindasana only if you can achieve padmasana with ease.",Garbha Pindasana
"Improves concentration levels, balance.Stretches out the muscles of the ankles, calves, thighs, hips, upper back, shoulders and arms.Loosens the joints of the arms, legs and hips.Can help prevent and treat health issues like asthma, sciatica and back pain.","Avoid getting into this pose if you have any knee, elbow, ankle and wrist injury. Not for women in later term pregnancy.",Garudasana
"Gomukhasana stretches muscles in the ankles, knees, chest and shoulders which not only strengthens them but also improves the overall body posture.","If you are suffering from neck, shoulder and/or knee pains, sciatica, you must not practice this asana. Pregnant women must not fold forward for the first trimester.",Gomukhasana
"It is a good pose for meditation and Tantra Yoga practices. It awakens the Kundalini energy by redirecting the apana upwards to the higher Chakras.It makes the legs, joints of legs, feet and low back flexible, makes feet and legs supple.Good for your back and posture.","People with issues in their knees and lower back should avoid this pose. Furthermore, those who have sciatica pain and hernia should consult their doctor before attempting this posture.",Gorakshasana
"Halasana stretches your spine and stretches, strengthens, and tones your back muscles. It helps prevent and relieve tightness in your neck, shoulders, and back. The pose also strengthens your shoulders, arms, and legs. Practicing Halasana enhances flexibility, which improves muscle and joint mobility.","Those suffering from back problems or slipped disc, weak or injured cervical muscles, weak legs, weak hamstring muscles or calf muscles should avoid Halasana.Pregnant women or women during their menstruation time should avoid Halasana.",Halasana
"Hanumanasana Stretches and strengthens groin region, hamstrings and thigh muscles.It stimulates the digestive and reproductive organs, by boosting their functioning.Monkey Pose Makes hips flexible if practice daily.Stretches back muscles also.Helps to release tension and stress.","People recovering from an injury of the joints of the coccygeal (tailbone), hips, pelvis, knees, ankles, should avoid this practice. Pregnant women should avoid this practice, since it puts pressure to the groin, pelvis, and abdomen. It can also lead to varicose vein in the groin, and legs.",Hanumanasana
"It calms the brain and eliminates mild depression, stretches the spine, liver, spleen, hamstrings, groins, and shoulders, stimulates the kidneys and liver, reduces pain in the waist and legs, helps to get rid of belly fat, improves digestion, relieves symptoms of menopause,effectively strengthens rib bones.","Never practice janusirsasana when you’re suffering from an upset stomach.Avoid it in case of asthma. Injury to the hips, knees, back, or shoulders is also a point of concern for practicing this asana. Pregnant women must avoid performing this asana.",Janusirsasana
"Helps keep oneself centered with awareness of the belly that includes the abs and core muscles, and maintaining balance with hip stability. The focus with this stretch is twisting the spine, back muscles, shoulders, chest, hips and neck.","People with an injury of the hips, spine, shoulders, neck, knees, ankles, or rib cage should avoid the practice of this supine twist. Students recovering from an abdominal surgery, hip replacement surgery, suffering from a herniated disc, etc., should take care and avoid this practice.",Jathara Parivartanasana
"Stretches the entire front of the body, the ankles, thighs and groins, bdomen and chest, and throat.Stretches the deep hip flexors (psoas)Strengthens back muscles.Improves posture.Stimulates the organs of the abdomen and neck.","Do not practice this pose if you’ve had recent surgery in the hips, knees, lower back, or abdomen.Pregnant women must refrain from this asana after the second trimester.People with Sacroiliitis or other sacroiliac issues must not try it.",Kapotasana
"Karnapidasana stretches and strengthens your back bone, gives strength to the lungs and beneficial for asthma patients, stimulates the abdominal organs, and thyroid gland, stretches the shoulders and spine,controls hypertension,reduce the symptoms of menopause.","Practitioners with heart conditions should avoid or practice for a short period of time.In the case of Slipped disc, Sciatica, neck or spine injury, and asthma practitioners should avoid this asana as the concerning areas get influenced.People with the condition of herniated disk and those who have undergone surgery in the past few months avoid practice this asana.Pregnant women and during the menstrual cycle refrain from doing Karnapidasana.",Karnapidasana
"Builds muscles strength at the arms, shoulders, chest, abdomen, core, hips, spine and hamstrings, works well in activating the internal organs while strengthening the abdominal muscles. As this pose is dedicated to Sage Koundinya, the practitioner builds self confidence on his own body and mind.","It could cause the hip to slip out of place, inflammation, or pain. Care should be taken while releasing from the posture. Since the weight of the body is not evenly distributed on the wrists and elbows, any jerk when coming out of this twisted arm balance can injure the wrists and shoulders.",Koundinyasana
"Stretches your back, hips, and hamstrings. Stimulates your heart and abdominal organs. Therapeutic for flat feet and persistent gas (flatulence)",If you have any serious knee or ankle problems or menstruation avoid the Ardha Virasana (Half Hero Pose) leg position in this pose unless you have the assistance of an experienced instructor.,Kraunchasana
"Strengthens the entire body with the use of the muscles like; biceps and triceps, core muscles, gluteus, and pelvic floor muscles.Improves digestion and tones the abdominal muscles supporting the internal organs.","Injury to the hips, knees, wrists, shoulders, and back is a contraindication, hence best to avoid the practice of Kukkutasana (Cock Pose). People with issues like Carpal Tunnel Syndrome, arthritis, blood pressure, spondylitis, etc., should avoid this practice.",Kukkutasana
"Kurmasana lengthens your spine,relaxes your head, neck and shoulders. It is an effective remedy for all back disorders.The asana releases the tight knots in the lumbar and sacral regions of your body.The asana effectively opens up your shoulders and strengthens them.","Those suffering from sciatica and slipped disk should avoid this asana.Those having hernia and chronic arthritis should not do Kurmasana.
",Kurmasana
"Strengthens the arms, wrists and shoulders.Tones the abdominal muscles.Opens the chest.Generates control and balance.Improves concentration.","Arm balance like Lolasana (Pendant Pose) challenges the core muscles, the shoulders, hips, wrists, pelvic muscles, and the entire back, hence any injury to any part of the body (muscles and joints) is a contraindication. Students who are recovering from a surgery should avoid this practice.",Lolasana
"Makarasana offers deep relaxation for your shoulders and spine. It helps to cure knee pain and also addresses any lung-related issues including asthma. It helps in curing slip disc, spondylitis, and sciatica. The stretches help relax the hip muscles.",Pregnant women should avoid this pose: The pressure at the abdomen may not be safe and hence women who are deep into their pregnancy should avoid this pose.,Makarasana
"It will help stretches your hips and relax the lower back, glutes and hamstrings. Better blood circulation also helps keep your reproductive organs healthy. Helps tone the body: Malasana helps bring muscle tone in your glutes, tights and around your belly as it engages all the muscles concerned.","People with recent or chronic lower back or knee pain, ligament tear at the knee or ankle, knee-arthritis, a weak bone density, severe sciatica, hip replacement surgery, or any other condition that can bring discomfort or pain should avoid this pose.",Malasana
"Prevent Diabetes, improve Digestive System, relieve stress and anxiety, strengthen the Back, Hips, Knees, and Ankles, improve Heart Health and Circulation, reduce fat from belly, hips, and abdomen.","Women who are pregnant should completely avoid this pose, due to pressure at the lower abdomen.Any kind of ulcer in the body more so with peptic ulcers, one should avoid this pose.",Mandukasana
"This pose stretches the shoulders, back, hamstrings, and hips. It is a great stretch for runners to help relieve tight hamstrings. It is also regarded as a calming pose and one that can help you with introspection.","Avoid if having any hamstring, shoulder or back injuries or hernia or any abdominal issue.",Marichyasana
Stretches and stimulates the organs of your belly and throat. Strengthens your upper back and the back of your neck. Relieves stress and irritation. Improves posture.,Individuals suffering from high or low blood pressure should avoid this posture. Neck injuries or any part of the lower back or middle back can make it difficult to practice this Fish Pose and hence should be avoided.,Matsyasana
Helps in the agility of the spine.The poses and postures of this yoga elongate the spine.Restoration of the natural alignment of the spine.Releases the lower back muscles and provides relief from lower back pain.Aids in maintaining normal rotation of your spinal cord.,"People suffering from severe back or neck pain should practice with caution, and with close supervision. Those with slip disc problems should avoid this pose completely.Those with internal organ issues may find this pose difficult and painful.",Matsyendrasana
"This pose is a part of Hatha yoga that improves mind-body coordination and offers great stretching of hips, back, calves etc. Besides this, it makes your body stronger and flexible. Here, we will discuss various
such benefits, steps and precautions for performing Durvasasana.","You should avoid Durvasana, If you have any injuries in your hips, knees, neck, legs or back. Women must avoid the practice of this asana during their pregnancy and menstrual cycle. If you're suffering from severe headache, hernia or osteoporosis should avoid this posture. Avoid its practice if you've any recent surgery on your back or waist, spinal column ailments.",Durvasasana
"relieves depression, relieves anxiety, relieves fatigue, improves posture improvement, recovery after sports, relieves lower back pain.","severe lower back pain, Injured knees, Pregnancy, Soulders injured, Neck injured.",Dwi Hasta Kulpa Janu Shirshasana
"Rejuvenates the spine
Improves spinal flexibility
Encourages detoxification
Improves digestion
Relaxes the mind",Avoid this pose if you have a knee or back injury.,Paripurna Matsyendrasana
"High Blood Pressure, anxiety, relieves fatigue, improves posture improvement, recovery after sports, relieves lower back pain","Wrist injuries and recent surgeries, carpal tunnel syndrome, slipped discs, along with other spinal issues, pregnancy",Marichyasana
"relieves lower back tightness, relieves lower back pain","if you are suffering from Diarrhea, you should avoid Balasana.a high blood pressure patient should avoid this asana.If you are having a recent or deep injury in your feet, knees, thighs, spine or neck, do not perform it at all.",Ardha Mula Matsyendrasana
"High Blood Pressure, anxiety, relieves fatigue, improves posture improvement, recovery after sports, relieves lower back pain","Avoid it while recovering from a recent surgery around the shoulders, spine, arms, or hips.People with a herniated disk or lower back issues must avoid this asana.Women during pregnancy and menstruation must avoid this pose.",Adho Mukha Shvanasana
"anxiety, relieves fatigue, improves posture improvement, recovery after sports, relieves lower back pain","Wrist injuries and recent surgeries, carpal tunnel syndrome, slipped discs, along with other spinal issues, pregnancy",Urdhva Mukha Shvanasana
"High Blood Pressure, anxiety, relieves fatigue, improves posture improvement, recovery after sports, relieves lower back pain.","Wrist injuries and recent surgeries, carpal tunnel syndrome, slipped discs, along with other spinal issues, pregnancy",Chamatkarasana
"This energy-boosting pose stretches your chest and lungs. It also strengthens your arms, wrists, legs, buttocks, abdomen and spine.","Injured knees, Pregnancy, Soulders injured, Neck injured",Urdhva Dhanurasana
"Crow Pose and Crane Pose improve focus, and stretch your buttocks (glutes), your back, and the palm sides of your wrists (wrist flexors). These poses also strengthen your core, upper back, chest, front of your hips (hip flexors), back of your thighs (hamstrings), arms, shoulders, forearms, and back of your wrists (wrist extensors).",Suffering from any health conditions related to the stomach.Not to be done when pregnant.If there is injury at the knee and the lower back.Go slow with the pressure at the hips and the shoulders.,Bakasana
"Boosts confidence and helps treat depression
Relieves arthritis
Stretches the shoulders, arms, wrists, and fingers
Helps to treat spinal disorders
Tones and activates the torso, back, abdomen, and pelvis
Strengthens the knee joints
Reduces sciatic pain
Corrects flat feet","Heart diseases
Stress related headaches
Migraines
Low blood pressure
Insomnia
Osteoarthritis of the knees
Bulimia
Diarrhea
Leukorrhea
In case you have high blood pressure, do not hold the pose for more than 15 seconds.
if you have had polio, are knock-kneed, or have a problem with your balance, keep your feet 8 in (20 cm) apart.
if you are prone to backaches, have a slipped disk, or a prolapsed uterus, keep the tips of the big toes together and keep your heels apart.",Tadasana Urdhva Baddha Hastasana
"Improves the digestive system.

Strengthens the abdominal muscles. 

Massages the internal organs.

Improves blood circulation.

Relieves tension in the lower back.

Stimulates the reproductive organs.

Burns belly fat.","severe lower back pain, Injured knees, Pregnancy, Soulders injured, Neck injured.",Parivritta Namaskar Stiti Utthita Vayu Muktyasana
"Strengthens and improves flexibility in the inner thighs, groins and the knees.Helps prepare the hips and groins for meditative seated poses, which require more flexibility in these areas.Helps to sooth menstrual discomfort and digestive complaints.","This Posture is not for a pregnant one who should avoid this practice.
Those who are having knee injuries or ailments also should avoid this posture.
People who have lower back pain degenerated disc, sciatica pain should not attempt this posture. If at all they want to have this practice, it should be done under competent guidance.",Gupta Padmasana
"This seated posture strengthens the back muscles and improves your posture. It also stretches your upper body, including your shoulders and chest.",Suffering from any health conditions related to the stomach.Not to be done when pregnant.If there is injury at the knee and the lower back.Go slow with the pressure at the hips and the shoulders.,Dandasana
"Strengthens the back muscles
Relieves the tired back instantaneously
Gives a good stretch to the chest, neck and spine
Calms the brain, reducing anxiety, stress and depression
Opens up the lungs and reduces thyroid problems
Helps improve digestion
Helps relieve the symptoms of menopause and menstrual pain
Helpful in asthma, high blood pressure, osteoporosis, and sinusitis",Avoid doing this pose if you are suffering from neck and back injuries.,Setu Bandhasana
"Arms strengthen, core to help hold you up,glutes and adductors,shoulder stabilizers.It helps make your wrists stronger.Stretches your upper back and groin.Your spine is toned and strengthened.","High blood pressure, low blood pressure, diarrhea, insomnia, headache",Pada Garudasana in Baddha Hasta Salamba Sarvangasana
"Feathered Peacock improves postural and body awareness, circulation (both lymphatic and venous), and your posture. It can boost energy and fight fatigue and build confidence and empowerment. Feathered Peacock mainly strengthens your core, back, chest, arms, shoulders, thighs, and buttocks (glutes).","severe lower back pain, Injured knees, Pregnancy, Soulders injured, Neck injured.",Picha Mayurasana
"This asana induces relaxation and alleviates tiredness, tension and anxiety. It stimulates the kidneys. Good for diabetes, back ache, sciatica, rheumatism. Relives general stiffness in the shoulders and neck, extends latissimus dorsi fully, Relieves and prevents cramps in the legs. Chest is opened and the leg muscles become supple.",Avoid this pose if you have a knee or back injury.,Hasta Gomukhasana
"High Blood Pressure, anxiety, relieves fatigue, improves posture improvement, recovery after sports, relieves lower back pain","Wrist injuries and recent surgeries, carpal tunnel syndrome, slipped discs, along with other spinal issues, pregnancy",Sukhasana
Vyaghrasana helps boost energy in the body and hence can be included in flow yoga sequences.,"
The practice of this pose can be harmful or can cause more pain if one is suffering from severe sciatica, or in the case of slipped disc, or injury at the knees, hips, wrists or shoulders. Pregnant women should take complete guidance and support with the practice of this pose.",Vyaghrasana
"Arms strengthen, core to help hold you up,glutes and adductors,shoulder stabilizers.It helps make your wrists stronger.Stretches your upper back and groin.Your spine is toned and strengthened.","Wrist injuries and recent surgeries, carpal tunnel syndrome, slipped discs, along with other spinal issues, pregnancy",Niralamba Vyaghrasana
Stretches and stimulates the organs of your belly and throat. Strengthens your upper back and the back of your neck. Relieves stress and irritation. Improves posture.,If you have any serious knee or ankle problems or menstruation avoid the Ardha Virasana (Half Hero Pose) leg position in this pose unless you have the assistance of an experienced instructor.,Eka Hasta Eka Pada Bitilasana
"It is a good pose for meditation and Tantra Yoga practices. It awakens the Kundalini energy by redirecting the apana upwards to the higher Chakras.It makes the legs, joints of legs, feet and low back flexible, makes feet and legs supple.Good for your back and posture.","Avoid it while recovering from a recent surgery around the shoulders, spine, arms, or hips.People with a herniated disk or lower back issues must avoid this asana.Women during pregnancy and menstruation must avoid this pose.",Matsyasana
"Positive effects on the musculoskeletal system. It stretches the hamstring and calf muscles in the backs of the legs, and builds strength in the shoulders.","Wrist injuries and recent surgeries, carpal tunnel syndrome, slipped discs, along with other spinal issues, pregnancy.",Uttana Padasana
"Mayurasana provides good stretch to the arms and back.The asana strengthens the forearms, elbows, legs, back (spine), torso and wrist joints.It helps in improving the posture and is a good remedy for posture induces health issues especially those pertaining to limbs, spine and joints.","Avoid Mayurasana if you have wrist or elbow injuries, or if you have high blood pressure, hernia, or ulcers. Pregnant or menstruating women should also avoid this pose.",Mayurasana
"Practicing Siddhasana can improve your posture, lengthen your spine, and open your hips, chest, and shoulders. Since you can maintain this pose for long periods of time, it's also an ideal position for meditating. It's also an excellent exercise for increasing flexibility in your hips and groin/inner thigh muscles.","The crossing of the legs and the internal rotation of the hips play a crucial role when seated in Swastikasana.For those with arthritis of the knees, hips, and feet should avoid sitting on the floor.",Siddhasana
"Practicing this asana gives strength to your chest, ankles, hips, and legs.This asana increases your metabolism and helps in weight loss.It gives your groin, abdominal organs, and thighs a good stretch.Your posture is improved, and balance is increased.It helps better your digestion.",So to be avoided by anyone having injury anywhere in the body. Someone suffering from slip disc should avoid this completely. As a lot of pressure is felt at the lower back. Someone with carpal tunnel syndrome should avoid this pose as the wrists are twisted to grab the toes to help bring the leg high.,Natarajasana
"Helps stretch your hamstrings.Helps to relieve tension.Abdominal muscles are toned and strengthened.Improves digestion and balance.Enhances self-assurance.Improves the strength of your spine and hip flexors.The kidneys, thyroid, and prostate glands, as well as the intestines, are all stimulated.","Avoid this pose if you have any chronic lower back or abdominal conditions. Women who are menstruating and who are pregnant should not do this pose.People with long tail bones will have difficulty doing this pose, instead, use a strap around the upper back and the feet to keep the back lifted. Or you can keep the palms in cup shape by the sides of the hips to maintain balance.",Navasana
"makes your shoulders, wrists and arms strong. It enhances your sense of balance and enables you to get a better balance. The asana enhances the blood circulation in the body. The Handstand Pose calms your nerves and brain, keeps you relaxed","People with spine, hip, ankle, wrist, knee, and shoulder surgeries or injuries should avoid this pose.",Uttana Padasana
"Back bending will strengthen your back and abdominal muscles and enhance your spine, helping relieve pain.The bow pose stimulates the reproductive organs and helps in improving menstrual disorders.","Avoid it while recovering from a recent surgery around the shoulders, spine, arms, or hips.People with a herniated disk or lower back issues must avoid this asana.Women during pregnancy and menstruation must avoid this pose.",Ardha Baddha Parivritta Malasana
"Tones and Better Blood Circulation: The practice of Ananthasana (Side Reclining Leg Lift Pose) stretches the muscles of both the upper body and the lower body thereby toning and reducing the excess fat at the tummy, hips, chest, legs, and arms.","Do not do this asana is you are suffering from any injury or severe pain in Knee, neck, or shoulders or, If you are having any Spine issues or Spondylitis, you should also not perform this asana.",Padmasana
"Strengthens the quadriceps, gluteus maximus, and hamstrings.Engages the deep core muscles, which help create stability.Can help alleviate pain cause by sciatica. Opens the hip flexors and strengthens the hip extensors.","Those with high blood pressure or heart problems, injuries to the lower back, quadriceps, groin, knees, or hips should practice this pose with great care.For those with neck, and upper back issues, it is important not to strain the chin forward, causing compression in the neck muscles and upper spine.",Urdhva Dhanurasana In Shirshasana
"Strengthens ankles, knees and legs.Roots thighbones to help alleviate backpain.Strengthens abdomen, buttocks and spine.Opens chest and shoulders.","Avoid this yoga asana if you're suffering from neck, spinal or hip injury, ulcers or hernia.Avoid performing Ardha Chakrasana if you have high blood pressure.Be extra careful when attempting this asana if you have vertigo.",Karnapidasana
"It is a great posture and exercise for arm balancing. Increases strength of arms and shoulders, strengthens biceps and triceps.Increases strength of abdomen, knees and chest.Improves stability, flexibility and mobility of the back and spine.Relieves backache.","The shape of the pose can cause lower back pain from the excessive arching this pose encourages. If you have a hyper-mobile lower back or lower back injury, practice with caution and be sure to tone your belly (transverse abdominus) to protect your lower back.If you have a herniated vertebral disc or spondylolisthesis, it is likely best to avoid this pose.",Viparita Shalabhasana
"Develops nervous control.Reverses the flow of Apana.Directs the energy to Manipura chakra.Strengthens the wrists, leg, and arm muscles.Strengthens the abdominal muscles.","Injury of the shoulders, arms, wrists, neck, hips, knees, lower back, ankles, feet and pelvis, are all contraindications, hence should be avoided. People with Carpal Tunnel Syndrome should also avoid practising this pose.",Paschimottanasana
"Strengthens and improves flexibility in the inner thighs, groins and the knees.Helps prepare the hips and groins for meditative seated poses, which require more flexibility in these areas.Helps to sooth menstrual discomfort and digestive complaints.","Not to be practiced if there in injury at the knees, neck and hips.Someone suffering from severe sciatica.For someone suffering from lower back pain, going into supine position would be a challenge.",Nakrasana
"Arms strengthen, core to help hold you up,glutes and adductors,shoulder stabilizers.It helps make your wrists stronger.Stretches your upper back and groin.Your spine is toned and strengthened.","This asana should not be practiced in case of high blood pressure,people suffering from heart diseases, while having shoulder pain, wrist or shoulder injury or carpal tunnel syndrome, during pregnancy.",Laghuvajrasana
The Vishama Ardha Shayana Ashtavakrasana yoga or the asana helps release any tension in the chest. It is also why people trust yoga for better sleep. It relaxes the back and spine and enables people to trust in yoga for good sleep. It alleviates the stress felt by your shoulders and hands.,"if you are suffering from Diarrhea, you should avoid Balasana.a high blood pressure patient should avoid this asana.If you are having a recent or deep injury in your feet, knees, thighs, spine or neck, do not perform it at all.",Vishama Ardha Shayana Ashtavakrasana
"Practicing Bhairavasana lengthens the spine which stretches the back muscles and makes them supple and flexible.Strengthens the leg muscles, improves digestion, stretches Oblique muscles, soothes the nervous system.","Anyone with injury in and around the spine, hips, knee, neck shoulders, or wrist must avoid it.People suffering from a hernia must not try it out.Do not practice this pose if you have sciatica pain.",Sukhasana
"Relieves pain and stiffness in the neck, shoulders, and the lower back.Helps keep the spine and shoulders supple.Eases a painful, stiff, sprained, or fused lumbar spine.Reduces discomfort in the dorsal spine area.Increases the flexibility of the back and hips.","High blood pressure, low blood pressure, diarrhea, insomnia, headache",Parivritta Agnistambhasana
"Opens up the hip joints.Provides deep stretch to the legs and muscles therein.Strengthens and stretches the lower back, stretches deep hip flexors.Strengthens the back muscles, provides deep stretch and flexibility to the lower and middle back.",Suffering from any health conditions related to the stomach.Not to be done when pregnant.If there is injury at the knee and the lower back.Go slow with the pressure at the hips and the shoulders.,Bharadvajasana
"Narasimhasana in Prasarita Janu Virasana is very useful to keep your back healthy and fit. In this asana, you bend your neck and head backwards while the rest of the body lies straight on the floor upside down. This back-bending helps soften the firm muscles of the shoulder, chest, and neck.","People suffering from a hernia, back injuries, headaches, and recent abdominal surgeries should not perform this asana.Pregnant women should not perform this asana.",Narasimhasana in Prasarita Janu Virasana
"Practicing Vyaghrasana can build strength in your arms, shoulders, wrists, hands, core, and inner thighs. It also helps improve your balance and increases the flexibility in the hip joints.","Practitioners who have undergone abdominal surgery, injuries in wrist, shoulder, elbow, knee, and neck should refrain from doing Bhujpidasana. Patients with the condition of cervical spondylitis and high blood pressure should avoid practicing this asana.",Vyaghrasana
"Improves the flexibility of the spine. Improves the prana in the body while flexing the spine. Relieves tensions around the lower back, middle back, neck and shoulders.Engages the core muscles, making it strong.Strengthens the arms, shoulders and the wrists.","Injury of the shoulders, wrists, neck, hip, knee and the back, blood pressure, migraine, spondylitis, arthritis of the knee and wrists.",Hasta Garudasana in Virasana
"Similar to plank exercises, this asana aligns your whole body and builds strength in your erector spinae, the muscles on either side of your spine. This helps improve core strength, posture, and stability. Mastering Chaturanga can help you build functional strength.","Wrist injuries and recent surgeries, carpal tunnel syndrome, slipped discs, along with other spinal issues, pregnancy",Shirshasana
"This seated posture strengthens the back muscles and improves your posture. It also stretches your upper body, including your shoulders and chest.",Eka Pada Niralamba Sarvangasana should be avoided by people with knee and ankle injuries and people with a very weak core and stiff Hamstrings.,Eka Pada Niralamba Sarvangasana
"In this asana, back bending will strengthen your back and abdominal muscles and enhance your spine, helping relieve pain.The bow pose stimulates the reproductive organs and helps in improving menstrual disorders.","Baddha Hasta Padmasana should not be performed by people suffering from high blood pressure, hernia, colitis, peptic ulcer or heart ailment.It should also be avoided if pregnant.",Baddha Hasta Padmasana
"Make Lower Body Stronger, Strengthen Core and Back, Increases Blood Circulation","Too much pressure is on the abdominal area as the entire body is balancing, so people suffering from ulcers in stomach or someone with Hernia should avoid this pose. Women who are pregnant should avoid this.",Parivritta Sukhasana
"It relaxes the whole spine, especially the muscles of the lumbar spine. Helpful for abdominal cramps and strengthens all abdominal muscles. It cleans and tones the liver and spleen and strengthens the uterus and rectum.","Do not perform garbha pindasana if you are suffering from sciatica or other spinal problems. If you have an injury in the ankles, knees, hips, or back, skip this asana. Perform garbha pindasana only if you can achieve padmasana with ease.",Supta Dwi Hasta Padasana
"Improves concentration levels, balance.Stretches out the muscles of the ankles, calves, thighs, hips, upper back, shoulders and arms.Loosens the joints of the arms, legs and hips.Can help prevent and treat health issues like asthma, sciatica and back pain.","Avoid getting into this pose if you have any knee, elbow, ankle and wrist injury. Not for women in later term pregnancy.",Prasarita Padottanasana
"Bakasana in Shirshasana stretches muscles in the ankles, knees, chest and shoulders which not only strengthens them but also improves the overall body posture.","If you are suffering from neck, shoulder and/or knee pains, sciatica, you must not practice this asana. Pregnant women must not fold forward for the first trimester.",Bakasana in Shirshasana
"It is a good pose for meditation and Tantra Yoga practices. It awakens the Kundalini energy by redirecting the apana upwards to the higher Chakras.It makes the legs, joints of legs, feet and low back flexible, makes feet and legs supple.Good for your back and posture.","People with issues in their knees and lower back should avoid this pose. Furthermore, those who have sciatica pain and hernia should consult their doctor before attempting this posture.",Parivritta Anjaneyasana Namaskar
"Pada Gomukhasana in Lolasana stretches your spine and stretches, strengthens, and tones your back muscles. It helps prevent and relieve tightness in your neck, shoulders, and back. The pose also strengthens your shoulders, arms, and legs. Practicing Halasana enhances flexibility, which improves muscle and joint mobility.","Those suffering from back problems or slipped disc, weak or injured cervical muscles, weak legs, weak hamstring muscles or calf muscles should avoid Halasana.Pregnant women or women during their menstruation time should avoid Halasana.",Pada Gomukhasana in Lolasana
"Utthita Dwi Pada Viparita Dandasana Stretches and strengthens groin region, hamstrings and thigh muscles.It stimulates the digestive and reproductive organs, by boosting their functioning.Monkey Pose Makes hips flexible if practice daily.Stretches back muscles also.Helps to release tension and stress.","People recovering from an injury of the joints of the coccygeal (tailbone), hips, pelvis, knees, ankles, should avoid this practice. Pregnant women should avoid this practice, since it puts pressure to the groin, pelvis, and abdomen. It can also lead to varicose vein in the groin, and legs.",Utthita Dwi Pada Viparita Dandasana
"It calms the brain and eliminates mild depression, stretches the spine, liver, spleen, hamstrings, groins, and shoulders, stimulates the kidneys and liver, reduces pain in the waist and legs, helps to get rid of belly fat, improves digestion, relieves symptoms of menopause,effectively strengthens rib bones.","Never practice janusirsasana when you’re suffering from an upset stomach.Avoid it in case of asthma. Injury to the hips, knees, back, or shoulders is also a point of concern for practicing this asana. Pregnant women must avoid performing this asana.",Vishvavajrasana
"Helps keep oneself centered with awareness of the belly that includes the abs and core muscles, and maintaining balance with hip stability. The focus with this stretch is twisting the spine, back muscles, shoulders, chest, hips and neck.","People with an injury of the hips, spine, shoulders, neck, knees, ankles, or rib cage should avoid the practice of this supine twist. Students recovering from an abdominal surgery, hip replacement surgery, suffering from a herniated disc, etc., should take care and avoid this practice.",Eka Pada Baddha Malasana
"Stretches the entire front of the body, the ankles, thighs and groins, bdomen and chest, and throat.Stretches the deep hip flexors (psoas)Strengthens back muscles.Improves posture.Stimulates the organs of the abdomen and neck.","Do not practice this pose if you’ve had recent surgery in the hips, knees, lower back, or abdomen.Pregnant women must refrain from this asana after the second trimester.People with Sacroiliitis or other sacroiliac issues must not try it.",Eka Pada Raja Kapotasana
"Urdhva Hastasana in Ushtrasana stretches and strengthens your back bone, gives strength to the lungs and beneficial for asthma patients, stimulates the abdominal organs, and thyroid gland, stretches the shoulders and spine,controls hypertension,reduce the symptoms of menopause.","Practitioners with heart conditions should avoid or practice for a short period of time.In the case of Slipped disc, Sciatica, neck or spine injury, and asthma practitioners should avoid this asana as the concerning areas get influenced.People with the condition of herniated disk and those who have undergone surgery in the past few months avoid practice this asana.Pregnant women and during the menstrual cycle refrain from doing Karnapidasana.",Urdhva Hastasana in Ushtrasana
"Builds muscles strength at the arms, shoulders, chest, abdomen, core, hips, spine and hamstrings, works well in activating the internal organs while strengthening the abdominal muscles. As this pose is dedicated to Sage Koundinya, the practitioner builds self confidence on his own body and mind.","It could cause the hip to slip out of place, inflammation, or pain. Care should be taken while releasing from the posture. Since the weight of the body is not evenly distributed on the wrists and elbows, any jerk when coming out of this twisted arm balance can injure the wrists and shoulders.",Sukha Matsyendrasana
"Improves digestion. This is because Padmasana yoga provides the abdominal portion of the body with a gentle massage, thereby boosting digestion.Helps relax the mind and alleviates stress. Eases childbirth. Helps reduce menstrual pain and cramps.","Not to be done if there is any form of knee injury, injury in the ankle or calf, if suffering from any back or spine discomfort, if suffering from sciatica infections or weakness in the sciatic nerves.",Padmasana
"Stretches adductor muscle, calves and hamstrings.Parighasana makes your body lightens and energizes your whole body.Gate pose stretches intercostal muscles between ribs.Opens your shoulders and chest; and also stretches muscles in torso.","In case of mild knee injuries (or rehab), one can use blanket or a rolled up mat underneath the knees.Ankle/Rib Cage Injury: In such cases, one must avoid doing the pose until the injury has healed fully.",Parighasana
"Strengthens and stretches the legs, knees, and ankles. Stretches the groins, spine, waist and shoulders. Expands the chest and lungs. Stimulates abdominal organs.","It shouldn’t be performed during high or low blood pressure, headache,migraines, insomnia, cervical spondylosis, neck injury,groin injury.",Utthita Parsvakonasana
"builds strength in your shoulders, arms, and chest",Injury in arms or legs or wrists.,PHALAKASANA(Plank)
"create more flexibility in your lower body, and it’s great for anyone who needs some extra strength in their lower body",Heart Problems,ANJANEYASANA(Low Lunge)
increases blood flow to your digestive system. It may help to build confidence and empowerment,Neck Injury,DHANURASANA(Bow)
relieve back pain and help build confidence and empowerment,Neck Injury and should not be practised if one is suffering from back injury,USTRASANA(Camel)
"warms up your spine, shoulders, and hips to prepare for a rigorous yoga asana practice","Blood Pressure, Shoulder Injury",BITILASANA(Cow)
"improves balance and can build cardiovascular health and resilience. It primarily strengthens your core, thighs, and ankles.","Blood Pressure, Respirator Complications, Ankle or Knee Injury",UTKATASANA(Chair)
"warms up your spine, shoulders, and hips. It improves posture, and counteracts the effects of sitting and computer work","Blood Pressure, Migrane, Spondylitis",MARJARYASANA(Cat)
"can boost energy, fight fatigue, and build confidence. It improves posture and counteracts the effects of prolonged sitting and computer work","Pregnant, Back Injury, Head Ache",BHUJANGASANA(Cobra)
"improves balance and focus, and postural and body awareness. It stretches around your shoulders, upper back, and thighs, as it strengthens your core, thighs, legs, and ankles.","Elbow Injury, Knee Injury, Ankle Injury",GARUDASANA(Eagle)
"improves postural awareness, creates a foundation for meditation practices, and can help manage stress","Knee Pain, Major Back Pain or Spinal Issues",SUKHASANA(Easy)
"Stretches the ankles, groins and back torso,tones the belly",Low back or knee injuries,MALASANA(Garland)
"calms the brain and helps relieve stress and mild depression. It also relaxes the body, reduces headache, fatigue, and insomnia, and helps to lower blood pressure",Distracted mind,SAVASANA(Corpse)
"Stretches and stimulates the muscles of the belly and front of the neck,the organs of the belly and throat and improves posture","Pregnant, Neck Injury, Migraine",MATSYASANA(Fish)
"Stretches the thighs, knees, and ankles and the arches,improves digestion and relieves gas and the symptoms of menopause","Heart Problems, Head Ache, Knee Injury",VIRASANA(Hero)
Stretches the hamstrings and stimulates the abdominal organs and heart,"Menstruation, Knee Injury",KROUNSHASANA(HERON)
"improve focus, and stretch your buttocks (glutes), your back, and the palm sides of your wrists (wrist flexors). These poses also strengthen your core, upper back, chest, front of your hips (hip flexors), back of your thighs (hamstrings), arms, shoulders, forearms, and back of your wrists (wrist extensors).","Wrist Issues,Shoulder Issues and Knee Issues",BAKASANA(Crow)
"creates a solid foundation for meditation practices. Settling into the pose activates the relaxation response (parasympathetic nervous system) and deactivates the stress response (sympathetic nervous system). Lotus Pose may help lower or regulate blood pressure. Physically, you can count on it to open the hip joints and stretch the front of the thighs (quadriceps), the groin, and the ankles.","Knee or Ankle Injury,Spinal Issues",PADMASANA(Lotus)
"stretches your entire lower body, including your thighs, hamstrings and groin. It also stimulates the abdominal organs and engages your core.","Pregnant, Knee or Hip Injury",HANUMANASANA(Monkey)
"Handstand builds strength in the shoulders, back, and abdomen, while uplifting your mood and increasing confidence.","Pregnant, Blood Pressure, Shoulder or Hand or Arm Issues",ADHO MUKHA VRKSASANA(Handstand)
"Locust Pose improves posture and counteracts the effects of prolonged sitting and computer work. It may help relieve lower back pain, can counteract slouching and kyphosis (abnormal curvature of the spine), and strengthens your back muscles, especially the muscles supporting your spine.","Pregnant, Back Injury, Head Ache",SALABHASANA(Locust)
"Dancer Pose improves balance and focus, postural awareness, proprioception (a sense of your body’s position and movement in space), and body awareness. It can boost energy, fight fatigue, and build confidence. It strengthens your core and back muscles, and stretches your chest and shoulders. On the standing leg, it strengthens the front of your hip (hip flexor), your thigh (while also stretching the back of your thigh/hamstring), shin, and ankle. On the lifted leg, it strengthens your glutes and back of your thigh (hamstring)","Blood Pressure, Balance Issues",NATARAJASANA(Dancer)
"Mountain Pose acts as the foundation for other poses. Mentally, it tests your focus and concentration. On a physical level, it improves your posture, strengthens your thighs, knees, and ankles, firms your abdomen and buttocks, relieves sciatica, and reduces flat feet.","Blood Pressure, Pregnancy",TADASANA(Mountain)
"Strengthens the wrists, arms, and abdomen",Ankle or Knee Injury,TOLASANA(Scale)
"This calming pose reduces stress and fatigue. Additionally, it stretches your shoulders and spine—and can be therapeutic for backaches, headaches, insomnia, and sinusitis.","Pregnant, Back Injury, Head Ache",HALASANA(Plow)
"This twist strengthens your core and thighs. It also stretches your shoulders, back, quadriceps, and ankles.","Shoulder,Back,Knee Injury",PASASANA(Rope)
"This seated posture strengthens the back muscles and improves your posture. It also stretches your upper body, including your shoulders and chest.",Knee or Ankle Injury,DANDASANA(Staff)
"This standing posture can help improve your balance, as well as your postural and body awareness. In addition to its physical benefits, this pose can assist in calming and relaxing the mind—relieving anxious thoughts and feelings.","Knee Injury, Balance Issue",VRKSASANA(Tree)
"Extended Triangle is good for lengthening the spine and strengthening the thighs and torso. This pose also stretches the hips, groin, hamstrings, calves, shoulders, chest, and spine.","Neck Injury, Back Injury",TRIKONASANA(Triangle)
The balasana yoga or the asana helps release any tension in the chest. It is also why people trust yoga for better sleep. It relaxes the back and spine and enables people to trust in yoga for good sleep. It alleviates the stress felt by your shoulders and hands.,"Blood Pressure, Knee Injury, Diarrhea",BALASANA(Child)
"Downward-Facing Dog Pose tones the arms and legs, opens and strengthens the shoulders in flexion, lengthens the hamstrings, stretches the calves, and prepares the body for heating.",None,ADHO MUKHA SWANASAN (Downward dog)
"Bharadvaja’s Twist improves postural and body awareness and can help stimulate proper digestion by facilitating movement through the digestive tract (peristalsis). This pose may help relieve constipation through the benefits of movement and stimulation of the lower abdominal area, and relieve bloating and gas","Diarrhoea,Blood Pressure",BHARADVAJASANA
"Revolved Triangle strengthens and stretches the legs, opens the chest to improve breathing, relieves mild back pain, and improves your sense of balance.",None,Parivrtta Trikonasana (Revolved Triangle Pose)
"Extended Triangle is good for lengthening the spine and strengthening the thighs and torso. This pose also stretches the hips, groin, hamstrings, calves, shoulders, chest, and spine.",None,Utthita Trikonasana (Extended Triangle Pose)
This posture improves digestion by stimulating the abdominal organs.,None,Parivrtta Parsvakonasana (Revolved Side angle Pose)
"Half Moon Pose is good for strengthening both legs evenly, teaching coordination, and helping you focus.",None,Ardha Chandrasana (Half Moon Pose)
"Bound Angle Pose can help you recover after running or other activities. It improves postural and body awareness and stretches your groins, inner thigh muscles (adductors), and front of your thighs (quadriceps).",None,Konasana (Bound Angle Pose)
Stretches the spine and shoulders,Knee injury,Uttana Shishosana (Extended Puppy Pose)
"Revolved Head-to-Knee stretches the spine, shoulders, and hamstrings, stimulates your abdominal organs, such as the liver and kidneys, and improves overall digestion.",None,Parivrtta Janu Sirsasana (Revolved Head-to-Knee Pose)
"This pose stretches your hips, thighs, hamstrings, groins and calves.",None,Supta Padangusthasana (Reclining hand to big toe pose)
"Revolved Head-to-Knee stretches the spine, shoulders, and hamstrings, stimulates your abdominal organs, such as the liver and kidneys, and improves overall digestion.",None,Parivrtta Janu Sirsasana (Revolved Head-to-Knee Pose)
Stretches the hip and groins,"Low back injury, Knee injury",Agnistambhasana (Fire Log pose)
"Extended Side Angle Pose improves balance, boosts energy, and fights fatigue. It improves posture and counteracts the effects of prolonged sitting and doing computer work, and may help build confidence and a sense of empowerment.",Knee injury,Utthita Parsvakonasana (Extended Side Angle Pose)
"Legs Up the Wall Pose is calming and relaxing. It improves circulation and can help reduce swelling lower extremities by redirecting lymph and other fluids from your ankles, knees, and pelvic organs to your upper body and head. It activates the relaxation response (parasympathetic nervous system) and deactivates the stress response (sympathetic nervous system).",None,Viparita Karani (Legs Up the Wall Pose)
"Stimulates abdominal organs like the ovaries and prostate gland, bladder, and kidneys. Stimulates the heart and improves general circulation. Stretches the inner thighs, groins, and knees. Helps relieve the symptoms of stress, mild depression, menstruation and menopause",Groin or knee injury: Only perform this pose with blanket supports under the outer thighs (see Modifications & Props).,Supta Baddha Konasana (Reclining Bound angle pose)
"Stretches the abdomen, thighs and deep hip flexors (psoas), knees, and ankles. Strengthens the arches. Relieves tired legs. Improves digestion. Helps relieves the symptoms of menstrual pain.","If you have any serious back, knee, or ankle problems, avoid this pose unless you have the assistance of an experienced instructor.",Supta Virasana (Reclining Hero pose)
"In addition to calming your mind and relieving stress, this pose stretches your spine, shoulders, and hamstrings. It also stimulates the liver, kidneys, ovaries, and uterus—and can help improve digestion.",None,Paschimottanasana (Seated Forward Bend)
"Standing Forward Bend calms the brain and helps relieve stress. This pose also stimulates the liver and kidneys, and stretches the hamstrings, calves, and hips.",None,Uttanasana (Standing Forward Bend)
"Stretches the front torso, Strenghthens the back and improves posture, Stimulates the belly","With any neck injury, don’t lift the head to look forward; otherwise same as those of Uttanasana",Ardha Uttanasana (Standing half forward bend)
This calming pose strengthens and stretches your legs and spine. It also tones the abdominal organs and can help relieve mild backaches.,None,Prasarita Padottanasana (Wide-Legged Standing Forward Bend)
"Opens up chest, lung, and shoulder areas, Opens the front of the legs and hip flexors, Builds strength in shoulders and upper back.","Carpal Tunnel Syndrome, Rotator Cuff injuries",Camatkarasana (Wild thing)
"A challenging arm balance, this pose strengthens the wrists, arms, belly, and legs. It also stretches the backs of the legs and improves your sense of balance.",None,Vasisthasana (Side Plank Pose) 
"In addition to strengthening your arms and wrists, this pose can improve your sense of balance. It also helps tone your abdominal muscles and stretch your spine.",None,Parsva Bakasana (Side Crow or Side Crane)
"Strengthens the wrists and arms, tones the belly, improves balance","Shoulder, elbow, wrist and low back injuries",Bhujapidasana (Shoulder Pressing pose)
"Strengthens the wrists and arms, tones the belly",Any wrist or lower back injury,Eka Pada Koundinyanasana I
"Strengthens the wrists and arms, tones the belly and spine",Any wrist or lower back injury,Eka Pada Koundinyanasana II
"Strengthens your core, chest, arms, thighs and back of the wrists (wrist extensors). Stretches the palm sides of your wrists (wrist flexors), which counteracts the effects of typing.","Avoid or modify if you have wrist arthritis, wrist pain, or carpal tunnel. Avoid if you are pregnant. Avoid if you have a shoulder injury, including a rotator cuff injury. Avoid if you have any abdominal pain, concerns, or a hernia. Avoid or modify if you have back pain or concerns. Don’t force your body into the pose; instead, move slowly and mindfully in and out of the pose. If you have any pain with the pose or other limitations, try pose variations and modifications or visualize doing the full expression of the pose in any position. Always ask your health care team if you are unsure of what you can and cannot do with your particular health concerns. Also, seek a qualified yoga instructor or yoga therapist to help you individually adapt the pose for safety.",Mayurasana (Peacock)
"Firefly pose stretches the hamstring, groin, and back torso; improves hip flexibility; opens the chest; and helps you find new strength and perspective.",None,Tittibhasana (Firefly Pose)
"Eight-Angle Pose improves postural and body awareness, boosts energy, and can help build confidence.",None,Astavakrasana (Eight-Angle Pose)
"Four-Limbed Staff Pose boosts energy, fights fatigue, and builds confidence and empowerment. It also strengthens your core, shoulders, arms, wrists, thighs, and ankles.",None,Chaturanga Dandasana (Four-Limbed Staff Pose)
"Half Frog Pose stretches the front of thighs (quadriceps) and ankles, plus it gently strengthens your back.",None,Ardha Bhekasana (Half Frog pose)
"Stretches the entire front of the body, the ankles, thighs and groins, bdomen and chest, and throat. Stretches the deep hip flexors (psoas). Strengthens back muscles. Improves posture. Stimulates the organs of the abdomen and neck.","High or low blood pressure, Migraine, Insomnia, low back or neck injury",Kapotasana (King Pigeon pose)
"Strenghtens the spine, firms the buttocks, helps relieve stress, stimulates abdominal organs, stretches lungs and chest.","Back injury, Headache",Niravalasana (Sphinx Pose)
"This energy-boosting pose stretches your chest and lungs. It also strengthens your arms, wrists, legs, buttocks, abdomen and spine.",None,Urdhva Dhanurasana (Wheel pose)
"Dancer Pose improves balance and focus, postural awareness, proprioception (a sense of your body’s position and movement in space), and body awareness. It can boost energy, fight fatigue, and build confidence. It strengthens your core and back muscles, and stretches your chest and shoulders. On the standing leg, it strengthens the front of your hip (hip flexor), your thigh (while also stretching the back of your thigh/hamstring), shin, and ankle. On the lifted leg, it strengthens your glutes and back of your thigh (hamstring). Dancer Pose also stretches the front of your hip (hip flexor), front on your thigh (quadriceps), and ankle.",None,Natarajasana (Dancer Pose)
"This pose stretches your thighs, inner hips, and buttocks in different ways in your bent and straight legs.",None,Eka Pada Rajakapotasana (One-Legged King Pigeon Pose)
"This posture stretches the entire front of your body—your throat, chest and abdomen—as well as the deep hip flexors (psoas) and quads. As a backbend, it also strengthens your back muscles.",None,Eka Pada Rajakapotasana II (One-Legged King Pigeon Pose II)
Stretches the entire front body and opens the chest,"Wrist, shoulder, low back or neck injuries",Dwi Pada Viparita Dandasana (Upward facing two-foot staff pose)
"As a posture-improving pose, Upward-Facing Dog strengthens your spine, arms, and wrists. It also stimulates the abdominal organs and stretches your chest, lungs, shoulders, and abdomen.",None, Urdhva Mukha Svanasana (Upward-Facing Dog Pose)
"This twist strengthens your core and thighs. It also stretches your shoulders, back, quadriceps, and ankles.",None,Pasasana (Rope pose)
"Wide-Angled Seated Forward Bend lengthens the hamstrings and stretches the back, thighs and calves. It can increase mental calmness and decrease anxiety.",None,Upavistha Konasana (Wide-Angled Seated Forward Bend)
"Pose Dedicated to the Sage Marichi I stretches your back, shoulders, and chest. For some yogis, it can also help relieve low back tightness and low back pain.",None,Marichyasana (Pose Dedicated to the Sage Marichi I)
"Half Lord of the Fishes is good for stretching your outer hips and thighs, opening your shoulders and chest, building strength in your upper back, lengthening your spine, and stretching the front of your thighs. It can also help stimulate digestion.",None,Ardha Matsyendrasana (Seated Twist Pose)
"This shoulder-stretching pose massages your abdominal organs, including your liver and kidneys. Additionally, this pose is a great way to relieve mild backaches and hip pain.",None,Marichyasana III
"Gate Pose can boost energy and fight fatigue. It may help build confidence and empowerment. Gate Pose improves posture and counteracts the effects of sitting for extended periods of time. On the extended knee side, it stretches the back of your thighs (hamstrings), groins, inner thighs (adductors), calf muscles, ankle, and foot. Your quadriceps and front of your hips (hip flexors) are also strengthened. On the bent knee side, it mostly stretches your outer hips (abductors), stretches and strengthens the front of your hips (hip flexors) and thigh (quadriceps) as you stabilize. On the shortened side of your torso, Gate Pose strengthens your side body, including abdominal obliques and muscles alongside your spine. On the lengthened side of torso, it stretches your side body, including the abdominal obliques. It also stretches large back muscles, including the latissimus dorsi, and the muscles alongside your spine, including the erector spinae.",None,Parighasana (Gate pose)
"Half Moon Pose is good for strengthening both legs evenly, teaching coordination, and helping you focus.",None,Ardha Chandrasana (Half Moon Pose)
"Calms the brain. Stimulates the liver and kidneys. Stretches the hamstrings, calves, and thighs. Strengthens the thighs, knees, and ankles. Stretches the back of the leg, the front thigh and groin.",None,Urdhva Prasarita Eka Padasana (Standing Split)
"Warrior I stretches your chest, lungs, shoulders, neck, belly and groin. It also strengthens your shoulders, arms, and back muscles, as well as your calves, ankles, and thighs.",None,Virabhadrasana I (Warrior I)
The standing posture opens your hips and strengthens and stretches your legs and ankles.,None,Virabhadrasana II (Warrior II)
"As a belly-stretching pose, Upward Salute can help improve your digestion. It is also a great pose for stretching the shoulders and arms.",None,Urdhva Hastasana (Upward Salute)
"In addition to strengthening your standing ankle and legs, this balancing pose tones your abdomen and improves your posture. It also strengthens your shoulders and the muscles of your back.",None,Virabhadrasana III (Warrior Pose III)
"Calms the brain and helps relieve stress and mild depression. Stimulates the thyroid and prostate glands and abdominal organs. Stretches the shoulders and neck. Tones the legs and buttocks. Improves digestion. Helps relieve the symptoms of menopause. Reduces fatigue and alleviates insomnia. Therapeutic for asthma, infertility, and sinusitis.",None,Salamba Sarvangasana (Supported Shoulderstand)
"Upward Plank Pose strengthens your arms, wrists, and legs, while stretching your shoulders, chest, and front ankles.",None,Purvottanasana (Upward Plank pose)
"Feathered Peacock improves postural and body awareness, circulation (both lymphatic and venous), and your posture. It can boost energy and fight fatigue and build confidence and empowerment. Feathered Peacock mainly strengthens your core, back, chest, arms, shoulders, thighs, and buttocks (glutes).",None,Pincha Mayurasana (Forearm Balance Pose)
Gently stretches the inner groins and the back spine. Calms the brain and helps relieve stress and fatigue.,None,Ananda Balasana (Happy Baby)
Peace and energizes body.,None,Kumbhaka Pranayama (Breath Retention)
Lowers heart rate and reduces stress and anxiety. Said to synchronize the two hemispheres of the brain. Said to purify the subtle energy channels (nadis) of the body so the prana flows more easily during pranayama practice.,None,Nadi Shodhana Pranayama (Channel cleaning breath)
Quiets the brain. Slows and smooths the flow of breath,None,Ujjayi Pranayama (Conqueror's breath)
Increases flexibility.,None,Mrigi Mudra (Deer seal)
"Relieves tension in the chest and face. An often-overlooked benefit of Simhasana is that it stimulates the platysma, a flat, thin, rectangular-shaped muscle on the front of the throat. The platysma, when contracted, pulls down on the corners of the mouth and wrinkles the skin of the neck. Simhasana helps keep the platysma firm as we age.",None,Simhasana (Lion pose)
Prevents the retained breath from “leaking out” of the torso through the bottom of the pelvis. Enlivens the entire spine to support the sitting position.,None,Mula Bandha (Root bond)
"Traditionally, Surya Bhedana is said to stimulate the brain and increase body heat. Chandra Bhedana isn’t usually listed among formal pranayamas in traditional texts; but it’s reasonable to assume that its effects are opposite that of Surya Bhedana: it quiets the brain and cools the body.",None,Surya/Chandra Bhedana Pranayama (Single nostril breath)
Energizes nervous system.,None,Kapalabhati Pranayama (Skull shining breath)
Increases breath awareness and control.,None,Svara Yoga Pranayama (Yoga of sound breath)
"Inspires purity and perseverance by representing the lotus flower floating above the muddy waters of desire, fear, and attachment. Reminds you of the natural beauty of your soul. Calms the mind.",None,Padma Mudra (Lotus seal)
Connects you to your heart’s truth. Builds courage to follow your heart. Rejuvenates one’s vital force. Reduces fragmented thoughts. Reduces scattered energy. Imparts a powerful sense of vitality and calm.,None,Abhaya Hridaya Mudra (Fearless heart seal)
"Energizing, elicits vitality that resides within our prana. Boosts focus.",None,Prana Mudra (Life force seal)
"Energizes, Increases fire element in the body, Builds heat.",None,Linga Mudra (Upright seal)
Peace of soul,None,Tattva Mudra (Truth seal)
Calms and focuses the mind. Encourages a positive attitude.,None,Dharmachakra Mudra (Wheel of Dharma seal)
Lengthens and strengthens the back of the legs.,"Knees Injury,Back and Shoulder Issues.",Padangushthasana(Big Toe)
Calms the brain and helps relieve stress and anxiety. Stimulates the liver and the kidneys. Stretches the hamstrings and the calves. Strengthens the thighs. Improves digestion. Helps relieve the symptoms of menopause. Helps relieve headaches and insomnia.,"Blood Pressure,Back Injury,Heart Disease",Padahastasana(Gorilla)
Increases the flexibility of the spine and back and stretches the shoulders. Strengthens the legs. Increases flexibility of the hip and knee joints. Improves balance. Opens the groin. Stretches the hamstrings.,"Ankle,Shoulder Injury",Svarga Dvijasana(Bird of Paradise)
"Creates flexible strength. Promotes stability in the front and back of the torso. Tones the lower body. Stretches the chest, lungs, shoulders, arms, neck, belly, groins (psoas) and the muscles of the back. Strengthens and stretches the thighs, calves and ankles.","Blood Pressure,Knee or Hip Injury.",Ashta Chandrasana(Crescent Lunge)
"Strengthens the core and arms. Stretches the spine, hips and hamstrings.",Knee and Hip Injury.,Durvasana
"Improves posture and balance. Increases flexibility in hip joints, knees, and ankles. Stretches the hamstrings and strengthens the abdominal muscles.",Organ Injuries,Trivikramasana
"Stretches the spine, hips and hamstrings.",Knee and Hip Injury.,Richikasana
"Strengthens the glutes, hips, thighs, calves, and ankles. Opens the hips and chest, stretches the thighs, and elongates the spine",Knee and Hip Injury.,Utkata Konasana(Goddess)
"Calms the brain. Stretches the spine, the shoulders, the hips and the hamstrings. Strengthens the legs.","Blood Pressure,Migraine,Kneee Injury",Parshvottanasana(Pyramid)
"Stretches the calves, and thighs. Strengthens the thighs, knees, and ankles. Improves balance.",Back Injury,Shiva Squat
"Strengthens and lengthens the body. Aligns the spine. Strengthens legs, ankles, abdomen and back.",Spine.Abdomen Injury,Utthita Tadasana(Star)
"Stretches the arms, hips and legs. Strengthens the arms, shoulders and hip mobility.","Pregnancy,Menstruation,Shoulder Injury",Akarna Dhanurasana(Archer)
"Strengthens the abdomen, hip flexors, and spine. Stimulates the kidneys, thyroid and prostate glands, and intestines. Helps relieve stress. Improves digestion","Pregnancy,Menstruation,Diarrhea,Headache",Navasana(Boat)
"Strengthens the abdomen, hip flexors and spine. Stimulates the kidneys, thyroid, prostate glands and intestines. Helps relieve stress. Improves digestion.","Pregnancy,Menstruation,Diarrhea,Headache",Ardha Navasana (Half Boat)
Stretches the lower back and adductor muscles.,"Pregnancy,Menstruation,Diarrhea,Headache",Butterfly Pose
"Stretches the spine and kidneys, compresses the stomach to improve digestion","Pregnancy,Menstruation,Diarrhea,Headache",Caterpillar Pose
"Improves flexibility of hips, knees, ankles. Strengthens spine and back muscles and improves balance.",Knee and Abdomen Injury,Pindasana(Embryo)
Opens the hips. Strengthens the back muscles by elongating the spine. Improves alignment of the spine; thereby improving posture. Calming and centering pose that improves concentration and facilitates meditation. Ameliorates stress and anxiety.,Knee and Ankle Injury.,Agnistambhasana(Fire Log)
"Strengthens arms, wrists and ankles. Stretches the upper back. Strengthens the abdominal muscles.",Lower Back Injury,Pashasana(Noose)
"Stretches the thighs, groin, psoas, abdomen, chest, shoulders, and neck. Stimulates the abdominal organs. Opens the shoulders and chest.","Migraine,Weak Functioning Organs,Neck or Shoulder Injury",Ardha Kapotasana(Half Pigeon)
"Stretches the thighs, groins (psoas), abdomen, chest, shoulders and neck. Stimulates the abdominal organs. Opens the shoulders and chest.","Migraine,Weak Functioning Organs,Neck or Shoulder Injury or Knee Injury",Eka Pada Raja Kapotasana(Mermaid)
"Stretches the ankles, hips and thighs","Knee Injury,Migraine",Shoelace Pose
Opens and stretches the hips and legs. Strengthens the spine and knee joints.,"Knee,ankle or Hip Injury",Skandasana(Side Lunge)
"Stretches the thighs, ankles, knees, and feet. Improves posture and tones the pelvic muscles.","Intestinal Ulcer,Spinal Cord Condition,Knee Issues",Vajrasana(Thunderbolt)
Strengthens the spine and rib cage in a lateral flexion. Stretches the oblique stomach muscles and intercostal muscles between the ribs.,Distracted Mind.,Banana Pose
"Stretches the chest, neck, and spine. Stimulates abdominal organs, lungs, and thyroids. Rejuvenates tired legs. Improves digestion. Helps relieve the symptoms of menopause. Relieves menstrual discomfort when done supported. Reduces anxiety, fatigue, backache, headache, and insomnia. Therapeutic for asthma, high blood pressure, osteoporosis, and sinusitis.","Surgery,Hips or Back Injury",Setu Bandha Sarvangasana(Bridge)
"Stretches and strengthens the hamstrings, hip flexors, calves and spinal muscles.","Pregnancy,Lower Back,Shoulder and Knee Injury",Yoga Nidrasasana(Sleeping Yogi)
"Stretches the back muscles and spine. Stimulates the kidneys, abdominal organs, urinary bladders and intestines. Releases stress. If the knee is straightened, it stretches the hamstrings and strengthens the legs.","Spondylitis,Neck,Back,Shoulder,Knee Injury",Supta Matsyendrasana(Supine Spinal Twist)
"Stretches the back muscles and spine. Relaxes the lower back, spine and hips.","Hips,Spine,Shoulder,Neck,Knees Injury",Jathara Parivartanasana(Supine Belly Twist)
Releases the back and the spine. A good counterpose after a backbend.,"Surgery,Ankle or Knee Injury",Pavanamuktasana(Wind Removing)
Relaxes the body.,Stiff Neck or Neck Injury,Advasana(Reverse Corpse)
Relaxes the body and calms the mind.,Stiff Neck or Neck Injury,Pranama
"Stretches the chest, psoas, quadriceps and ankles.","Migraine,Back,Hips,Knees Injury",Bhekasana(Frog)
"Stretches the entire front of the body, ankles, thighs and groins, abdomen and chest, and throat, and deep hip flexors (psoas). Strengthens the back muscles.","Migraine,Back,Hips,Knees,Neck Injury",Gherandasana
"Strengthens muscles of spine, buttocks, and backs of the arms and legs. Stretches the shoulders, chest, belly, and thighs.","Intestinal Tuberculosis,Peptic Ulcer,Back Injury",Sarpasana(Snake)
"Strengthens the spine. Stretches the chest, the lungs, the shoulders and the abdomen. Stimulates the abdominal organs. Opens the heart and the lungs.","Chest,Ribs or Neck Injury",Salamba Bhujangasana(Sphinx)
Stretches the insides and backs of the legs and the groin. Stretches the shoulders. Strengthens the back and abdominal muscles.,"Shoulder,Back,Hips and Arm Injury",Kurmasana(Tortoise)
"Increases abdominal strength. Warms up the joints, muscles of arms and the legs.",Back and Knee Injury,Chakravasana(Box)
"Calms the brain and helps relieve stress and mild depression. Energizes the body. Stretches the shoulders, hamstrings, calves, arches, and hands. Strengthens the arms and legs. Helps relieve the symptoms of menopause. Relieves menstrual discomfort when done with the head supported. Helps prevent osteoporosis. Improves digestion. Relieves headache, insomnia, back pain, and fatigue. Therapeutic for high blood pressure, asthma, flat feet, sciatica, and sinusitis. Warms up the ankles and the toes.","Chronic Arm,Back or Shoulder Injury",Ardha Pincha Mayurasana(Dolphin)
Stretches the neck and shoulders and lengthens and realigns the spine. It also strengthens the arms and upper body,"Surgery,Knee Injury",Astangasana(Eight Point)
Strengthens the arms and wrists. Tones the abdomens.,"Blood Pressure,headache,shoulder,back or wrist injury",Chaturanga Dandasana
"Stretches the hip flexors, hamstrings, and quadriceps. Improves flexibility in hip ligaments and strengthens muscles in your legs.","Knee,Ankle,Shoulder,Elbow,Wrist Injury",Uttana Pristhasana(Lizard)
"Opens and lengthens the hip flexors, quadriceps and thoracic spine. Strengthens the arms.","Knee,Hip or Neck Injury",Crooked Monkey Pose
Creates a deep release and internal balance.,"Diarrhea,Menstruation,Neck Injury",Karnapidasana(Deaf Man's)
Improves focus and balance. Stretches the shoulders and armpits. Strengthens the abdominal muscles and shoulders.,"Arm Injury,Headache",Shayanasana(Elbow Balance)
"Strengthens core, arms, shoulders, elbows and wrists. Improves flexibility of hips, knees and ankles.","Hips,Knees,Shoulders,Back or Wrists Injury",Kukkutasana(Rooster)
"Strengthens core, arms, and shoulders. Improves flexibility of hips, knees and ankles.","Hips,Knees,Shoulders,Back Injury",Karandavasana(Himalayan Duck)
Strengthens the core and arms.,"Shoulders,Hips,Wrists or Pelvic Muscle injury",Lolasana(Pendant)
Stretches the entire front body and opens the chest. Tones the internal organs. Revitalizes the central nervous system.,"Arms,Hips,Knees Injury",Dvi Pada Viparita Dandasana(Inverted Staff)
Stretches the shoulders and spine,"Pregnancy,Menstruation,Back Issues",Supta Konasana(Supine Angle)
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
,,
